DD2 - V.#12 - #551 Retreats to start!


How­ever, that white light ac­tu­ally as be­fore sta­ble and rigid con­tin­u­a­tion re­volves and drills into in­ward. The rapid­ness of the speed, mak­ing one praise to the heav­ens. Sends out cut­ting teeth sour frica­tive. 但是,那白光却依旧稳定而执着的继续向内旋转、钻入。其速度之快,令人叹为观止。更是散发出牙酸的摩擦声。 Rays rapid in the di­rec­tion of this spo­ken parts light well up from im­pe­r­ial palace, tries to de­stroy it di­rectly. 一道道光芒飞速从皇宫内部朝着这道白光的方向涌来,试图将它直接摧毁。 But is also this short time, the white light co­ag­u­lated sud­denly. It looks like a fly­ing shut­tle sinks to below sud­denly, al­though has not bored through, but ac­tu­ally card on Soul Guid­ance Pro­tec­tive Cover of Bright Cap­i­tal City im­pe­r­ial palace. 但也就是这短暂的时间,白光突然凝固了一下。紧接着,它就像是一个飞梭骤然向下一沉,虽然没有钻透,但却卡在了明都皇宫的魂导护罩上。 Soul En­gi­neer that while in the im­pe­r­ial palace is re­spon­si­ble for guard­ing re­laxed, sud­denly, the slen­der white light drills from its state-of-art place to­gether sud­denly, falls into the im­pe­r­ial palace in­stan­ta­neously. 正当皇宫内负责守卫的魂导师们松了口气的时候,突然,一道更加纤细的白光从它的尖端处骤然钻出,瞬间落入皇宫内部。 A solid palace under it, it is ac­tu­ally a drill en­ters, has not sent out in­clud­ing a sound. 一座坚实的宫殿就在它下方,它却是一钻而入,连一点声音都没有发出。 „It is not good!” “不好！” Xu Tian­ran has stood in front of own im­pe­r­ial palace wit­nesses all changes that in the sky is hav­ing, when that spo­ken parts light in­stan­ta­neous flash, but below in­stance, he felt that was not won­der­ful. 徐天然一直站在自己的寝宫门前目睹着天空中发生的一切变化,当那道白光瞬闪而下的瞬间,他就感觉到了不妙。 The in­tense pur­ple light bursts out from him sud­denly, Pur­ple gold color Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice has al­most cov­ered his whole body in­stan­ta­neously. Mean­while, pur­ple ray puts greatly, Xu Tian­ran roll up sud­denly, is pro­tected one­self by Pur­ple gold color light bar­rier that on one­self sends out. 强烈的紫光骤然从他身上迸发而出,一件紫金色的人形魂导器几乎是瞬间覆盖了他全身。与此同时,紫色光芒大放,徐天然自己骤然蜷缩起来,让自己身上散发出的紫金色光罩护住自身。 All these re­ally came are too quick, quickly to de­gree eyes can­not take it all. 这一切来得实在是太快了,快到令人目不暇接的程度。 In Xu Tian­ran makes the flash after body rolling up move­ment, earth-shak­ing power! 就在徐天然作出身体蜷缩动作后的一瞬间,山摇地动！ „Bang!” “轰隆隆！” Fierce thun­der­ing bursts out from the un­der­ground of im­pe­r­ial palace di­rectly, the Bai Se (White Color) light beam has shot up to the sky from the ground to­gether. 剧烈的轰鸣直接从皇宫的地下迸发而出,紧接着,一道白色光柱就已经从地面冲天而起。 This light beam just started is not big, only then the arm is thick or thin, but it ac­tu­ally at an ex­cep­tional pace out­ward ex­pands. More­over is cen­tered on it, just like the mighty waves Bai Se (White Color) halo over­lap­ping bursts out and spreads out­ward. 这道光柱刚开始的时候并不大,只有手臂粗细,但它却以惊人的速度向外扩张。而且以它为中心,一圈圈宛如波涛般的白色光晕层层叠叠的向外迸发、扩散。 In the im­pe­r­ial palace, each build­ing shone guard shield golden light, tried to re­sist the im­pact of this white light. 皇宫内,每一座建筑都亮起了一道护罩金光,试图抵挡这白光的冲击。 How­ever, the might of this white light was re­ally too strong, just like eas­ily ac­com­plished gen­eral, swal­lowed in which build­ings. 但是,这白光的威力实在是太强了,宛如摧枯拉朽一般,就将一座座建筑吞噬其中。 These palace body­guards. In the face of the strik­ing power of its this ter­ror, does not have the means re­sis­tance, in­stan­ta­neously van­ishes in puff of smoke. 那些宫廷侍卫们。在它这恐怖的攻击力面前,根本没办法抵抗,就瞬间灰飞烟灭。 How­ever, at this time. Sun-Moon Em­pire back­ground also ap­pears. 不过,在这个时候。日月帝国的底蕴也随之显现出来。 light shadow shine un­ceas­ingly in im­pe­r­ial palace, these light shadow any­thing color has, but ac­tu­ally all shoots to­ward the white light mighty waves of that pro­lif­er­a­tion. Changes into bar­ri­ers, full is weak­en­ing the white light ter­ror pres­tige en­ergy. 一道道光影不断在皇宫内亮起,这些光影什么颜色的都有,但却全都朝着那扩散的白光波涛射去。化为一道道屏障,全力的削弱着白光恐怖的威能。 Mean­while, im­pe­r­ial palace Soul Guid­ance Pro­tec­tive Cover also in­ward con­tracts. That 16 golden light beams also to­ward the white light stran­gle to death, but, changes into an­other bar­rier, many white light mighty waves will pre­vent. 同时,皇宫内部的魂导护罩也向内收缩。那16根金色光柱也同时朝着白光绞杀而至,化为又一道屏障,将更多的白光波涛阻挡在内。 Po­si­tion that this white light drops, is the Sun-Moon Em­pire im­pe­r­ial palace Core Area ter­ri­tory. 这白光落下的位置,正是日月帝国皇宫核心区域。 Xu Tian­ran feels at this time, is in­com­pa­ra­bly sharp ter­ror Soul Power is at­tack­ing own body. 徐天然此时感觉到的,就是一股股无比锋锐的恐怖魂力在侵袭着自己的身体。 On him the rays ex­plode un­ceas­ingly, that is Sun-Moon Em­pire Wor­ship Hall Soul En­gi­neer for var­i­ous De­fen­sive Soul Guid­ance De­vice of his care­ful man­u­fac­ture. 他身上不断有一道道光芒爆开,那都是日月帝国供奉堂的魂导师们为他精心制作的各种防御魂导器。 Al­though Xu Tian­ran had been swept by that Bai Se (White Color) mighty waves. But is re­ly­ing on the de­fenses of these force even­tu­ally, in ad­di­tion Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice es­caped. 徐天然虽然被那白色波涛扫过。但终究凭借着这些强力的防御,再加上自己身上的人形魂导器逃过一劫。 But when he drills from the white light, Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice pre­sented many fis­sures. Whole body dust. His pair of ar­ti­fi­cial leg, be­cause with­stands the huge ex­plo­sive force to burst, mak­ing him only be able to crawl to crawl. 但当他从白光中钻出来的时候,身上的人形魂导器已经出现了多处裂痕。满身的尘土。就连他那双假腿,都因为承受巨大的爆炸力而破裂,令他只能是匍匐着爬了出来。 Out­side Bright Cap­i­tal City city. 明都城外。 The Huo Yuhao body some­what sways is giv­ing He Caitou the huge sil­ver ar­tillery tube on shoul­der. 霍雨浩身体有些摇晃着将肩膀上的巨大银色炮筒递给和菜头。 „Re­treats!” “撤退！” 300 heavy ar­tilleries rapid well up to­ward 18 Gate of the Dead. Mean­while. A golden halo also from both sides bright, changes into to­gether light bar­rier, cov­ers all heavy ar­tilleries and 18 leaves of Gate of the Dead com­pletely. 300台重炮迅速朝着18道亡者大门涌去。与此同时。一层金色光晕也从两侧亮起,化为一道光罩,将所有重炮和18扇亡者大门全部笼罩在内。 Huo Yuhao bites the tip of tongue, hits mind. Tang Wu­tong pours into Soul Power to his within the body un­ceas­ingly, this sta­bi­lizes lives in his body con­di­tion. 霍雨浩一咬舌尖,强打精神。唐舞桐不断将魂力注入到他体内,这才稳定住他的身体状态。 Mer­maid Princess Li Ya qui­etly ap­pears, she re­leased Mer­maid Con­trol once again, dis­tor­tion halos pro­lif­er­ated from her. Pro­tects in Soul Guid­ance Pro­tec­tive Cover all com­pletely be­comes slurred. 人鱼公主丽雅悄然出现,她又一次释放出了人鱼之控,一圈圈扭曲光晕从她身上扩散开来。将魂导护罩保护内的一切全部变得模糊不清。 While they com­plete these, the dis­tant place, rays raised from the Bright Cap­i­tal City di­rec­tion, cov­ers to­ward here. 就在他们完成这些的同时,远处,一道道光芒已经从明都方向升起,朝着这边覆盖过来。 Here must un­ex­pect­edly be Bright Cap­i­tal City! Sun-Moon Em­pire cap­i­tal, now first under heaven big city. 这里必竟是明都啊！日月帝国首都,当今天下第一大城。 After suf­fer­ing one after an­other se­ri­ous at­tack, the counter-at­tack of Bright Cap­i­tal City came fi­nally. 在遭受了接连沉重的打击之后,明都的反击终于来了。 Al­though they do not have the di­rec­tion of upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice. Did not have the means to find Huo Yuhao their exact lo­ca­tion, but in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball lift-off from for­mer 14,400 suc­ces­sively surely the di­rec­tion, can judge prob­a­bly. There­fore, gives Huo Yuhao them, is the rug bom­bard­ment. The goal must sup­press them. In order to guard against them to con­tinue to at­tack again. 尽管他们没有高空探测魂导器的指引。没办法找到霍雨浩他们的具体位置,但从之前先后14400枚定装魂导炮弹升空的方向,也能判断出大概了。所以,给予霍雨浩他们这边的,就是地毯式轰击。目标就是要压制他们。以防他们再继续攻击。 But all these, ac­tu­ally all within the com­pu­ta­tion of Huo Yuhao, the link­age de­fense guard shield, come from that side Soul Guid­ance Array place to Sun-Moon Em­pire East Sun City as well as grab­bing of Bright Strug­gle Moun­tain Range. 而这一切,却全都在霍雨浩的计算之内,联动防御护罩,来自于对日月帝国东阳城以及明斗山脉那边魂导阵地的劫掠。 The self-sat­is­fied work of this link­age de­fense Sun-Moon Em­pire, at this time with the sup­port of milk bot­tle, ac­tu­ally gives the Tang Sect peo­ple to pro­tect. 这联动防御正是日月帝国的得意之作,此时在奶瓶的支持下,却给唐门众人以保护。 Heavy ar­tillery Soul En­gi­neer Corp re­moves first, fort Soul En­gi­neer Corp Soul En­gi­neer and Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp Soul En­gi­neer is re­spon­si­ble for bring­ing up the rear. Huo Yuhao they fi­nally. 重炮魂导师团先撤,炮台魂导师团的魂导师们和唐门魂导师团的魂导师负责断后。霍雨浩他们在最后。 Rug cov­ered the at­tack no doubt to cover here big piece re­gion, be­cause at­tacked ex­tremely scat­tered, was nat­u­rally im­pos­si­ble to at­tack any­thing with em­pha­sis. 地毯式覆盖攻击固然笼罩了这边大片的区域,但因为攻击太过分散,自然不可能重点打击什么。 Oc­ca­sion­ally thun­der to ap­pear above the link­age de­fense guard shield, is ac­tu­ally not able its vac­il­la­tion. 偶尔有一道道轰鸣出现在联动防御护罩上方,却根本无法将其动摇。 300 heavy ar­tilleries passed Gate of the Dead rapidly. 300门重炮已经迅速的通过亡者大门。 18 leaves of front doors, made the speed that they re­treated pro­mote one time. Only takes ten min­utes, they can all evac­u­ate. As for other peo­ple, speed of evac­u­a­tion will be faster. 18扇大门,足足让他们撤退的速度提升了一倍。只需要十分钟,他们就能够全部撤离。至于其他人,撤离的速度就会更快了。 In the Bright Cap­i­tal City im­pe­r­ial palace, under that large ex­plo­sion, is one piece in con­fu­sion. Over one-fifth im­pe­r­ial palaces turned into ruins. 明都皇宫内,在那大爆炸之下,已是一片狼藉。超过1的皇宫变成了废墟。 light shadow sep­a­rately from im­pe­r­ial palace di­rec­tion lift-off, three, di­rectly soared Tang Sect to fly. The rapid­ness of speed, just like thun­der. 一道道光影分别从皇宫方向升空而起,其中就有三道,直奔唐门这边飞了过来。速度之快,宛如电闪雷鸣。 Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion has been cov­er­ing the Bright Cap­i­tal City di­rec­tion. Re­gard­ing each re­sponse in Bright Cap­i­tal City as­pect clear is grasp­ing. 霍雨浩的精神探测一直笼罩着明都方向。对于明都方面的每一个反应都清楚的掌握着。 Feels these three forms to lift off, his look also one cold. On these three, is send­ing out ex­tremely pow­er­ful Soul Power fluc­tu­a­tion. 感受到这三道身影升空,他的神色也不禁一凛。这三位身上,都散发着极其强盛的魂力波动。 Nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer! Sun-Moon Em­pire Wor­ship Hall nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer! 九级魂导师！日月帝国供奉堂的九级魂导师！ gold and sil­ver bi-color light beam does not have the omen falls to­gether from the dis­tant place upper air sud­denly, out­ra­geously bom­bard­ment above Tang Sect here link­age de­fense guard shield. 一道金银双色光柱毫无预兆的从远处高空骤然而落,悍然轰击在了唐门这边的联动防御护罩之上。 Im­me­di­ately, the en­tire guard shield was ex­ag­ger­ated the gold and sil­ver bi-color. Link­age De­fen­sive Soul Guid­ance De­vice makes grat­ing sound im­me­di­ately, Soul Power that in the in­ter­nal milk bot­tle stores up col­lapses. 顿时,整个护罩都被渲染成了金银双色。联动防御魂导器顿时发出刺耳的声音,内部奶瓶中储存的魂力狂跌。 This is...... 这是…… Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle. 日月神针。 Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin came! 星空斗罗叶雨霖来了！ Huo Yuhao brow micro wrin­kle, but ac­tu­ally happy does not fear. 霍雨浩眉头微皱,但却怡然不惧。 He al­ready judged, this of­fen­sive starts sud­denly, they are away from Sun-Moon Em­pire Bright Cap­i­tal City also to have ten li (0.5km) again. This dis­tance, re­gard­ing the pow­er­houses of nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer ranks. In a flash. There­fore, they re­treat, might be at­tacked very much. 他早就判断出,这次攻势就算发动的再突然,他们距离日月帝国明都也只有十里而已。这个距离,对于九级魂导师级别的强者来说。转瞬即至。所以,他们撤退的时候,很有可能会遭受打击。 This also why a Tang Sect pow­er­house keeps the final im­por­tant rea­son. 这也是为什么唐门一众强者留到最后的重要原因。 Huo Yuhao sink­ing sound track: „The op­po­site party has three nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. I and Wu­tong block Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin. First Se­nior Brother you are re­spon­si­ble for left that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer, Third Se­nior Brother. You are re­spon­si­ble for right that. Fifth Se­nior Sis­ter and Ji brother, you as­sist First Se­nior Brother. Guyi and Qi­uqiu, you as­sist Third Se­nior Brother. Fourth Se­nior Sis­ter, you take charge every­body to re­treat. Sec­ond Se­nior Brother, ar­tillery fire cover, mo­men­tar­ily reen­force­ment. Walks!” 霍雨浩沉声道:“对方有三名九级魂导师。我和舞桐拦住星空斗罗叶雨霖。大师兄您负责左侧那位九级魂导师,三师兄。你负责右面那位。五师姐、季兄,你们辅助大师兄。骨衣、秋秋,你们辅助三师兄。四师姐,你负责指挥大家撤退。二师兄,炮火掩护,随时增援。走！” Three nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer de­struc­tive power, must ab­solutely over three Ti­tled Douluo. One-to-one, Ti­tled Douluo does not fear. But if gives the Soul En­gi­neer full dis­tance and time, their de­struc­tive power will be ex­tremely ter­ri­fy­ing. There­fore can­not see that they wan­tonly at­tack. Oth­er­wise Soul Guid­ance Pro­tec­tive Cover was bro­ken, does not know that many Soul En­gi­neer will die in their hands. 三位九级魂导师的破坏力,绝对要超过三位封号斗罗。一对一,封号斗罗不惧。但如果给魂导师们充分的距离和时间,他们的破坏力就将是极其恐怖的。所以绝不能眼看着他们肆意攻击。否则魂导护罩被破,不知道有多少魂导师会死在他们手中。 Now re­gard­ing Shrek three Soul En­gi­neer Corp. Most im­por­tant is the time. Huo Yuhao can cer­tainly order Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp to ac­cept a chal­lenge. Three nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer pos­si­bly are not the le­gion matches who 200 Soul En­gi­neer com­pose. 现在对于史莱克三支魂导师团来说。最重要的就是时间。霍雨浩当然可以命令唐门魂导师团应战。三位九级魂导师也不可能是200名魂导师组成的军团的对手。 But now ac­tu­ally hardly does not spell, once tied down, wants to walk to be pos­si­ble again with­out enough time. 但现在却不是硬拼的时候,一旦被缠住,再想走可就来不及了。 Must know that this dis­tance, was that side Bright Cap­i­tal City in the at­tack range of near­est Soul Guid­ance Array place. There­fore. Huo Yuhao took the bull by the horns, leads every­body di­rect se­lec­tion the frontage fight. 要知道,这个距离,还是明都那边距离最近的魂导阵地的攻击范围内。所以。霍雨浩当机立断,带领大家直接选择了正面战斗。 Al­though three nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer are strong, but their strengths ab­solutely are not weak. Who won whom de­feated/car­ry­ing is very dif­fi­cult say­ing that only then they car­ried on the fight the words, with­drew to be eas­ier. After all every­body is co­or­di­nat­ing to­gether for many years, was al­ready tacit fully. 三名九级魂导师虽强,但他们的实力也绝对不弱。谁胜谁负还很难说,而只有他们进行战斗的话,脱身起来就容易多了。毕竟大家在一起配合多年,早已默契十足。 Ye Yulin com­plex­ion solemn look­ing out not far away below that ray dis­tor­tion light bar­rier. The sit­u­a­tion in light bar­rier can­not see clearly com­pletely, al­though in­side has the light shadow twin­kle. Can dis­tin­guish to have many peo­ple, but ac­tu­ally could not see that ac­tu­ally they are mak­ing any­thing. 叶雨霖脸色冷峻的遥望不远处下方那光芒扭曲的光罩。光罩内的情况完全看不清,里面虽然有光影闪烁。能够辨别出有很多人在,但却看不出他们究竟在做什么。 Ye Yulin has not ap­proached, al­though this for­mi­da­ble Starry Sky Douluo has the self-con­fi­dence to one­self very much, but at­tacked from be­fore in­clud­ing the im­pe­r­ial palace de­fense can punc­ture him to un­der­stand that the over­all strengths of these sneak at­tack were not ab­solutely weak. A that final white light, is nine lev­els in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball in­evitably surely. More­over specif­i­cally aims at of safety mask. Oth­er­wise, by the pres­tige en­ergy of im­pe­r­ial palace safety mask, pos­si­bly was bored through? 叶雨霖没有过于靠近,这位强大的星空斗罗虽然对自己很有自信,但从之前这边袭击连皇宫防御都能打穿他就明白,这些偷袭者的整体实力绝对不弱。那最后的一道白光,必然是九级定装魂导炮弹。而且还是专门针对防护罩的那种。否则的话,以皇宫防护罩的威能,又怎么可能被钻透呢？ How­ever, be­cause just that nine lev­els in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to use the mas­sive en­er­gies in punc­ture surely, after en­ter­ing in the im­pe­r­ial palace. The might that erupts has not reached the true nine lev­els to in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely the might, oth­er­wise, loses can only be more se­ri­ous. 不过,也正因为那枚九级定装魂导炮弹在穿刺方面使用了大量的能量,进入皇宫内之后。爆发起来的威力才没有达到真正九级定装魂导炮弹的威力,不然,损失只能是更惨重。 He flies with an­other two nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer, the most vital duty is to con­strain these peo­ple, so long as and other Bright Cap­i­tal City here have traded the hand, can launch at­tack whole-heart­edly to them, must catch the whole lot in a drag­net the enemy who these take to the Bright Cap­i­tal City heavy loss. 他和另外两位九级魂导师飞出来,最重要的任务就是拖住这些人,只要等明都这边换过手来,就能够对他们进行全力以赴的攻击,务必要将这些带给明都巨大损失的敌人一网打尽。 Said hon­estly that in the Ye Yulin heart too many angers, the loss has not been a coun­try, he con­se­crates. What he is more is cu­ri­ous, is ac­tu­ally cu­ri­ous is who can ac­tu­ally or­ga­nize the so pow­er­ful of­fen­sive, has the sur­prise at­tack to Bright Cap­i­tal City. These peo­ple have al­most wiped out Bright Cap­i­tal City above all upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice! Sup­pressed Bright Cap­i­tal City four Soul Guid­ance Array have not been able to move. In a mo­ment ago dur­ing that time, use in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball quan­tity surely ab­solutely over a thou­sand. This is not the small in­flu­ence can achieve, per­haps is the strength of coun­try. 坦白说,叶雨霖心中并没有太多愤怒,损失是国家的,他只是供奉。他更多的是好奇,好奇究竟是什么人竟然能够组织出如此强悍的攻势,对明都产生突袭。这些人可是几乎打掉了明都上空所有高空探测魂导器啊！还压制的明都四个魂导阵地无法动弹。就在刚才那段时间,动用的定装魂导炮弹数量绝对上千。这绝不是小势力能够做到的,恐怕是国家的力量。 But the Sun-Moon Em­pire as­pect com­pletely ig­no­rants re­gard­ing a such strength un­ex­pect­edly, was shipped these many to in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball by oth­ers un­clear to Bright Cap­i­tal City by surely, launches this at­tack, even if the use in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely, can­not cer­tainly be away from Bright Cap­i­tal City to be too far. Ac­tu­ally do these peo­ple how achieve? 而日月帝国方面竟然对于一支这样的力量茫然无知,被人家运送了这么多定装魂导炮弹到明都旁边都不清楚,发起这种攻击,就算是使用定装魂导炮弹,也一定不能距离明都太远。这些人究竟是如何做到的？ Under Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle strikes, Ye Yulin also starts from the sky through ab­sorb­ing the milk bot­tle re­stores Soul Power. His Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle might is ex­tremely pow­er­ful, but also has its issue, that was the con­sump­tion is too big. Also at this time, he saw sev­eral forms to fly sud­denly from that link­age de­fense guard shield, two peo­ple wel­comed in their di­rec­tion. 日月神针一击之下,叶雨霖也开始在空中通过吸收奶瓶来恢复魂力。他这日月神针威力极其强大,但也有其问题,那就是消耗太大了。也就在这个时候,他看见数道身影骤然从那联动防御护罩中飞出来,其中两个人朝着自己的方向迎来。 coldly snorted, the Ye Yulin right hand to air­borne flings, dozens ray rapid lift-offs, these rays as if gen­eral that grows vol­un­tar­ily from him. After each ray rises into air­borne, rapidly in­creases, changes into bunch of glares, just likes Star Dou is or­di­nary, float above the Ye Yulin top of the head. 冷哼一声,叶雨霖右手向空中一甩,数十道光芒迅速升空而起,这些光芒仿佛都是从他身上自行生长出来的一般。每一道光芒升入空中后都是迅速变大,化为一团团强光,犹如星斗一般,悬浮在叶雨霖头顶上方。 The Starry Sky Douluo name is not Bai Jiao, by bat­tle ef­fi­ciency. Dur­ing Ye Yulin in Sun-Moon Em­pire all con­se­crates is ex­is­tence of being among the best. 星空斗罗的名字绝不是白叫的,论战斗力。叶雨霖在日月帝国所有供奉之中都是名列前茅的存在。 Dozens Star Dou from the sky con­dense, his Spir­i­tual Power has locked the enemy. 数十颗星斗在空中凝聚完毕,他的精神力就已经锁定来敌。 But at this mo­ment, sud­denly, in­tense warn­ing omen raises in the heart. Saw that in that two peo­ple, in per­son eyes the Pur­ple gold col­ored light glow dodges. 但就在这时,突然间,一股强烈的警兆在心中升起。眼看着,那两个人之中,一个人眼中紫金色光芒一闪。 Trig­ger­ing mind De­fen­sive Soul Guid­ance De­vice has al­most had the func­tion in­stan­ta­neously. The Ye Yulin chest place, a neck­lace erupts the daz­zling glare, the mind bar­rier ap­pears be­fore his body to­gether in­stan­ta­neously. 触发式精神防御魂导器几乎是瞬间产生了作用。叶雨霖胸口处,一枚项链爆发出刺目强光,一道精神屏障瞬间出现在他身前。 „Clang!” In­tense metal clan­gour re­sounds, Ye Yulin sub­con­scious low­er­ing the head looks that what mak­ing him be sur­prised, on one­self that nine lev­els of sober neck­lace, pre­sented many chaps traces. “铿！”强烈的金属铿锵声响起,叶雨霖下意识的低头看去,令他大吃一惊的是,自己那九级的清醒项链上,已经出现了许多龟裂的痕迹。 Good strength big mind at­tack. 好强大的精神攻击。 Al­though his sober neck­lace has blocked the most at­tack, but in the Spir­i­tual Power re­bel­lion com­ple­men­tary waves that flash pro­duces. Made Ye Yulin lose the abil­ity of fixed match tem­porar­ily. But that two matches erupt the un­equalled speed, ar­rived in his hun­dred me­ters range in a flash. 他的清醒项链虽然挡住了绝大部分攻击,但在那一瞬间产生的精神力暴动余波。还是令叶雨霖暂时失去了锁定对手的能力。而那两个对手爆发出无与伦比的速度,转瞬间就到了他近前百米范围之内。 Ye Yulin is ex­cels at fight nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer, is not flus­tered fac­ing this sit­u­a­tion, a right hand for­ward fin­ger. Im­me­di­ately, dozens rays burst out from his top of the head star light. Weaves a big net in his body front hook, blocks the path that two peo­ple all can go for­ward com­pletely. 叶雨霖乃是擅长于战斗的九级魂导师,面对这种情形并不慌张,右手向前一指。顿时,数十道光芒从他头顶上方的星光中迸发而出。在他身前钩织成一张大网,将那两个人所有可以前进的道路全部封死。 Mean­while, Ye Yulin own body in­stan­ta­neously ex­plodes draws back, speed won­der­ful quick in­com­pa­ra­ble, changes into to­gether the rem­nant shade un­ex­pect­edly, dur­ing breath, ar­rived at about 500 me­ters. 与此同时,叶雨霖自己的身体则是瞬间爆退,速度奇快无比,竟是化为一道残影,一次呼吸之间,就已经到了500米开外。 De­fense, strain and fend­ing. This is one ex­cels at the qual­ity that Soul En­gi­neer of long-dis­tance at­tack must have. 防御、应变、闪避。这是一位擅长于远程攻击的魂导师所必须具备的素质。 Fires into Ye Yulin, with­out doubt Huo Yuhao and Tang Wu­tong. 冲向叶雨霖的,无疑正是霍雨浩和唐舞桐。 Huo Yuhao kept in Mer­maid Princess Li Ya Soul Guid­ance Pro­tec­tive Cover, man­ages the Spir­i­tual Dis­tur­bance do­main, keep­ing out­side these nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer from see­ing truly the por­trait of own army. 霍雨浩将人鱼公主丽雅留在了魂导护罩内,主持精神干扰领域,让外面这几位九级魂导师无法真正看到自己大军的真容。 Their sev­eral flushed. 他们几个则是冲了出来。 Ye Yulin is very strong, rays that spreads across, are flood­ing the for­mi­da­ble de­struc­tive power. Huo Yuhao does not dare to rush hardly. Only can draw Tang Wu­tong to stop slightly. Ye Yulin in light of this has also spread out with them. 叶雨霖真的很强,那纵横交错的一道道光芒,都充斥着强大的破坏力。霍雨浩也不敢硬闯。只能是拉着唐舞桐略微停顿了一下。叶雨霖也就此与他们重新拉开了距离。 The Tang Wu­tong back wings opens, in air­borne float stop. Huo Yuhao does not have to pur­sue Ye Yulin again. In the eye the god glit­ter­ing, Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion locks on this Starry Sky Douluo com­pletely. 唐舞桐背后双翼张开,在空中悬浮停顿。霍雨浩也没有再去追叶雨霖。眼中神光闪烁,精神探测完全锁定在这位星空斗罗身上。 Tang Wu­tong be­hind is hold­ing the po­si­tion of Huo Yuhao Ex­treme Ice Bat­tle God Armor waist, si­mul­ta­ne­ously the back wings bursts out in­nu­mer­able bright sphere, di­rectly soars air­borne these star light bom­bard­ments to go. 唐舞桐在身后抓住霍雨浩冰极战神甲腰间的位置,同时背后双翼迸发出无数光球,直奔空中那些星光轰击而去。 Ye Yulin in dis­tant place sta­ble under per­sonal ap­pear­ance. In the eye is shin­ing, goal has locked in­stan­ta­neously them, Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle in upper air starts the suf­fi­cient en­ergy. 叶雨霖在远处稳定下身形。眼中寒光四射,目标瞬间就锁定了两人,在更高空之中的日月神针开始充能。 He can also cer­tainly see, these two to one­self close Soul Mas­ter are the Ti­tled Douluo lev­els, par­tic­u­larly that wears dark blue Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice is makes him be sur­prised. 他当然也看得出,这两个向自己接近的魂师都是封号斗罗层次,尤其是那个身穿深蓝色人形魂导器的更是令他大吃一惊。 On the vol­ume, Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice that this per­son puts on study Sun-Moon Em­pire is smaller. Ac­tu­ally does not rep­re­sent might to be weak small size. The aura that on this per­son lends, mak­ing him have the feel­ing of pal­pi­ta­tion. More­over, at his eye­sight, ac­tu­ally also can­not see on this per­son com­pletely this Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice ma­te­r­ial qual­ity is any­thing. Pro­found and in­sight­ful, just likes the gem carves. But ac­tu­ally can­not feel ex­is­tence of any Soul Power fluc­tu­a­tion. As if all are hid­ing, but also any­time may erup­tion. 论体积,这个人穿的人形魂导器要比日月帝国这边研究出来的更小。体积小却并不代表威力就弱。这个人身上散发出的气息,令他有种心悸的感觉。而且,以他的眼力,也完全看不出这个人身上这身人形魂导器的材质究竟是什么。深邃、通透,犹如宝石雕琢。但却感受不到任何魂力波动的存在。仿佛一切都在隐藏着,但又随时都有可能爆发似的。 There­fore, Ye Yulin pre­pares to at­tempt to de­stroy them with the strongest at­tack. He very much wants to have a look now, the out­come in below that light bar­rier hid­ing is any­thing. They want here, un­able to be in­escapable. Own re­in­force­ments ar­rived quickly. 所以,叶雨霖准备用自己最强的攻击来尝试毁灭他们。他现在很想看看,下面那个光罩之中隐藏的究竟是什么。他们只要还在这里,就跑不了。自己的援军很快就到了。 At the same time is think­ing, Ye Yulin through sub­poe­naing Soul Guid­ance De­vice sent out the digit of a se­ries of rep­re­sen­ta­tive po­si­tion. He be­lieves that quick, dis­tance here re­cent Soul Guid­ance Array will take to him the long-dis­tance sup­port. The tar­get is not these two peo­ple at pre­sent, but is that guard shield. 一边想着,叶雨霖通过传讯魂导器报出了一连串代表位置的数字。他相信,很快,距离这里最近的魂导阵地就会带给他远程支持。攻击目标不是眼前这两个人,而是那个护罩。 In this time, sud­denly, Ye Yulin sur­prised see­ing, one group of red-or­ange rays are pro­ject­ing from below light bar­rier sud­denly. 正在这时,突然间,叶雨霖惊讶的看到,一团橘红色的光芒突然从下面光罩之中射出。 This red-or­ange ray speed is ex­tremely fast, but ac­tu­ally un­ceas­ingly twists and is fluc­tu­at­ing in the en­tire flight. 这道橘红色光芒速度极快,但在飞行过程中却不断扭曲、变幻着。 This is...... 这是…… The Ye Yulin pupil has con­tracted fiercely, is this Guided Shot? 叶雨霖瞳孔剧烈的收缩了一下,这是诱导弹？ Did these peo­ple study un­ex­pect­edly in­clud­ing Guided Shot? This dis­cov­ery, mak­ing him be sur­prised. 这些人竟然连诱导弹都研究出来了？这一发现,令他大吃一惊。 Guided Shot specif­i­cally aims at the for­mi­da­ble Soul Guid­ance Array place. This Guided Shot it­self has to have ex­tremely in­tense Soul Power fluc­tu­a­tion, can at­tract all re­con­nais­sances in­stan­ta­neously. But most Soul Guid­ance Array in in­ter­cep­tion Soul Guid­ance De­vice are trig­ger­ing, be­cause only then the trig­ger re­sponse is quick­est. 诱导弹是专门针对强大的魂导阵地的。这诱导弹本身具备有极其强烈的魂力波动,能够瞬间吸引所有侦察。而绝大多数魂导阵地之中的拦截型魂导器都是触发性的,因为只有触发性反应才最快。 There­fore, this Guided Shot most vital func­tion, ini­ti­ates the Soul Guid­ance Array at­tack, con­sumes their strengths. Mean­while does to con­ceal to the true at­tack. 因此,这诱导弹最重要的作用,就是引发魂导阵地攻击,消耗他们的力量。同时给真正的攻击做掩饰。 Is di­rec­tion of this Guided Shot launch, not just the Bright Cap­i­tal City dis­tance the re­cent Soul Guid­ance Array place? 这一枚诱导弹发射的方向,可不正是明都距离这边最近的魂导阵地吗？ These fel­lows, is the prepa­ra­tion so un­ex­pect­edly suf­fi­cient? 这些家伙,准备竟然如此充足？ Re­ally such as Ye Yulin ex­pects. After that Guided Shot launches next one flick­ers, jet black such as the shadow of black ink also in­stan­ta­neously drills into to­gether air­borne, if not Ye Yulin is ex­tremely pay­ing at­ten­tion to that side sound, per­haps could not have seen. 果然如叶雨霖所料。那诱导弹发射后的下一瞬,一道漆黑如墨的影子也是瞬间钻入空中,如果不是叶雨霖极其关注着那边的动静,或许还真看不到。 May so. After that black shadow drills into air­borne, van­ishes in the line of sight of Ye Yulin im­me­di­ately. 可就算如此。那黑影子钻入空中后,也是立刻就消失在了叶雨霖的视线之中。 This...... 这…… It is not good! Ye Yulin al­most in­stan­ta­neously to­ward sub­poe­naing Soul Guid­ance De­vice drinks to make noise greatly, „de­fense, de­fends fully. Care­ful Guided Shot and sur­prise at­tack. First here do not at­tack.” 不好！叶雨霖几乎是瞬间朝着传讯魂导器大喝出声,“防御、全力防御。小心诱导弹和突袭。先不要攻击这边了。” Tonight the time at­tacks was too sud­den, ac­tu­ally will not make clear to pre­sent all Sun-Moon Em­pire Soul En­gi­neer this time at­tacks to be how the in­ten­sity, but also there is any fol­low­ing. There­fore, for them, what is most im­por­tant pro­tects Bright Cap­i­tal City. Kills the enemy in the sec­ondary place. 今天晚上的这次突袭来的太突然了,以至于到现在所有日月帝国的魂导师们都搞不清楚这次攻击究竟会达到怎样强度,还有什么后续。因此,对他们来说,最重要的还是守护明都。杀敌还是在次要位置的。 Has the pow­er­ful of­fen­sive of be­fore­hand sur­prise at­tack, mak­ing Ye Yulin has to be care­ful! What to do if is one round shells? 有着之前突袭的强悍攻势,令叶雨霖不得不小心啊！万一接下来又是一轮轰击怎么办？ The Huo Yuhao cor­ners of the mouth place out­lined to­gether the at­trac­tive arc, but hid in the Ex­treme Ice Bat­tle God Armor mask, no­body can see. 霍雨浩嘴角处勾勒出一道好看的弧线,只不过隐藏在冰极战神甲面罩之内,没有人能看到而已。 The right hand lifts. Dark blue light blade edge qui­etly ap­peared dur­ing he grasps, above is con­geal­ing pure white ice dew. 右手一抬。深蓝色的光刃已经悄然出现在他掌握之中,上面凝结着一层洁白的冰露。 Ice and Snow God­dess Breath, Morn­ing Dew Knife. 正是冰雪女神的叹息,晨露刀。 Tang Wu­tong holds his waist armor, from the sky re­volves sud­denly 360 de­grees, then has wasted Huo Yuhao. The goal refers. Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin. 唐舞桐抓住他腰间铠甲,猛然在空中旋转360度,然后就将霍雨浩抛费了出去。目标所指。正是星空斗罗叶雨霖。 The body of Huo Yuhao was flung hun­dred me­ters in­stan­ta­neously, his whole body burst out the in­tense white light, the whole per­son turned into bright sphere un­ex­pect­edly, from the sky erupted the un­equalled speed, flew to shoot to go to­ward Ye Yulin with light­ning speed. 霍雨浩的身体瞬间被甩出百米,紧接着,他全身都迸发出强烈的白光,整个人居然就那么变成了一颗光球,在空中爆发出无与伦比的速度,风驰电掣般朝着叶雨霖飞射而去。 Ice Me­teor! This is Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Lit­tle White) en­trusts with the Huo Yuhao abil­ity. In­stan­ta­neously when own speed pro­mo­tion to ac­cord­ing to Soul Power flight three times of max­i­mum speed, the flight time cul­ti­vate with Soul Mas­ter one­self to con­tin­u­ally re­lated. Si­mul­ta­ne­ously own Ab­solute Ice total quan­tity in erupt­ing strength­ens one time. The de­fen­sive power strength­ens one time. 冰之流星！这是冰熊王小白赋予霍雨浩的能力。瞬间将自己的速度提升到以魂力飞行时最高速度的三倍,持续飞行时间和魂师自身修为有关。同时自身极致之冰总量在爆发中增强一倍。防御力增强一倍。 Ice Me­teor most in­tre­pid is this hits. Also be only this hits. Re­ally just like at top speed gen­eral. By Huo Yuhao strength, uses this Ice Me­teor the time can also own strik­ing power pro­mote to the Ab­solute Ice Ti­tled Douluo level. Let alone pre­sent he was also wear­ing Ex­treme Ice Bat­tle God Armor. This quite there­fore Tran­scen­dent Douluo struck fully! 冰之流星最强悍的就是这一撞。也只有这一撞。真的宛如流星赶月一般。以霍雨浩本身的实力,使用这冰之流星的时候也能将自己的攻击力提升到极致之冰封号斗罗的层次。更别说现在的他还身穿着冰极战神甲了。这就相当于是一位超级斗罗的全力一击了啊！ There­fore, Huo Yuhao here Ice Me­teor Soul Abil­ity just sent out, an­other side, Ye Yulin feels an in­tense sen­sa­tion of as­phyxia. As if be­fore that Ice Me­teor has hit one­self body. 因此,霍雨浩这边冰之流星魂技才刚刚发出,另一边,叶雨霖就感觉到一股强烈的窒息感。仿佛那冰之流星已经撞击到了自己身前似的。 On the face re­veals a color with amaze­ment, this per­son so is un­ex­pect­edly for­mi­da­ble. Clearly is ex­is­tence of Tran­scen­dent Douluo level! 脸上流露出一丝骇然之色,这人竟然如此强大。分明是超级斗罗层次的存在啊！ Ye Yulin is proud to one­self very much, he al­ways does not think one meet un­able with Tran­scen­dent Douluo to con­tend. But the premise is, dis­tance! 叶雨霖对自己很自负,他从来都不认为自己会无法和超级斗罗抗衡。但前提是,距离！ Soul En­gi­neer wants to dis­play own strength, must have the dis­tance to make the guar­an­tee. But Soul Mas­ter gen­er­ally speak­ing, does not have this limit. 魂导师想要发挥出自身实力,必须要有距离作保证。而魂师一般来说,是没有这个限制的。 There­fore in cer­tain dis­tance range. Is the Soul Mas­ter world. 所以在一定距离范围内。就是魂师的天下。 Saw that rapid en­large­ment of that group of white lights in one­self eye, Ye Yulin al­most want not to think, im­me­di­ately starts had just com­pleted to gather the strength Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle. 眼看着那团白光在自己眼中迅速放大,叶雨霖几乎是想都不想,立刻发动了刚刚完成蓄力的日月神针。 Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle un­der­goes his un­ceas­ing trans­for­ma­tion, the strik­ing power be­came stronger and stronger, Tran­scen­dent Douluo how? My this Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle sends out, must make you un­able to eat surely to cap­ture walk­ing. At least can also from air­borne shoot down you. 日月神针经过他的不断改造,攻击力变得越来越强了,超级斗罗又如何？我这一下日月神针发出,定要让你吃不了兜着走。至少也能将你从空中击落。 The gold and sil­ver bi-color light beam drops from the clouds in­stan­ta­neously, that seems like in not the strong ray, ac­tu­ally em­bod­i­ment un­equalled ter­ri­fy­ing pres­tige en­ergy. 金银双色光柱瞬间从天而降,那看似并不强势的光芒中,却内蕴着无与伦比的恐怖威能。 Meets the tough head-on with tough­ness? Some prob­lem tal­ents and Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle meet the tough head-on with tough­ness. 硬碰硬？有毛病才和日月神针硬碰硬呢。 Nar­rows the eyes when Ye Yulin eyes, waits to look at this Tran­scen­dent Douluo and re­sult of Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle col­li­sion. 就在叶雨霖双眼微眯,等着看这超级斗罗和自己日月神针碰撞的结果时。 Sud­denly, that white light is qui­etly has been de­feated and dis­persed, the peo­ple in Bai Se (White Color) light group ap­pear. 突然间,那白光悄无声息的溃散了,白色光团中的人重新显现出来。 Is he doing? The pro­tec­tion of that for­mi­da­ble Soul Abil­ity, hasn't this been must com­mit sui­cide? In the Ye Yulin heart has filled puz­zled. 他在干什么？没有那强大魂技的保护,他这是要自杀吗？叶雨霖心中充满了不解。 How­ever, at this mo­ment, he no­ticed that per­son waved to­ward one­self un­ex­pect­edly. 但是,也就在这时,他看到那人竟然朝着自己挥了挥手。 Not far away . More­over the two sides fights com­pre­hen­sively have also launched. And one side, is Eter­nal De­fense Xu San­shi is bring­ing Sa­cred Angel Ye Guyi and dis­ap­pears the fight of rouge Nan Qi­uqiu. 不远处,另外两边的战斗也已经全面展开了。其中一边,就是永恒之御徐三石带着神圣天使叶骨衣和泯灭胭脂南秋秋的战斗。 Al­though Xu San­shi is only eight rings Soul Mas­ter, is not Soul En­gi­neer. But after his Mar­tial Soul since com­pletely evo­lu­tion is Black Tor­toise Shield, its de­fen­sive power, at least at pre­sent known Mar­tial Soul, sec­ond to none. 徐三石虽然只是八环魂师,也不是魂导师。但他的武魂自从完全进化为玄武盾之后,其防御力之强,至少在目前已知的武魂中,无出其右。 Is re­ly­ing on the full de­fense of Black Tor­toise Shield, is pro­tect­ing him and Ye Guyi, Nan Qi­uqiu to­ward that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer speedy ap­proaches. 凭借着玄武盾的全力防御,守护着他和叶骨衣、南秋秋朝着那名九级魂导师迅速接近。 Al­though is not Soul En­gi­neer, but ac­tu­ally does not af­fect them to equip Soul Guid­ance De­vice! 虽然不是魂导师,但却并不影响他们装备魂导器啊！ After three peo­ple, does not have Huo Yuhao and Tang Wu­tong that nine lev­els of Flight Soul Guid­ance De­vice. That thing can­not make in a short time too comes. How­ever, Soul Guid­ance Thruster after three peo­ple have. 三人身后没有霍雨浩和唐舞桐那种九级飞行魂导器。那东西短时间内是做不出太多来的。但是,在三人身后魂导推进器还是有的。 For­mi­da­ble Soul Mas­ter. Wants far ultra Soul En­gi­neer in the body in­ten­sity, they are also. There­fore, the pro­pelling force that Soul Guid­ance Thruster that they use is erupt­ing in­stan­ta­neously is ex­tremely as­ton­ish­ing. 强大的魂师。在身体强度上要远超魂导师,他们三人也是。所以,他们所使用的魂导推进器在瞬间爆发出的推动力都是极其惊人的。 Xu San­shi starts, his body in­ten­sity is strongest. There­fore, be­hind him is three eight lev­els of Soul Guid­ance Thruster. Ad­vance­ment speed that erupts sud­denly, mak­ing him meet the su­per­sonic stan­dard in­stan­ta­neously. Keeps off through Black Tor­toise Shield be­fore the body, looks like an­other me­teor in bat­tle­field, has pulled closer among the dis­tances with that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer in­stan­ta­neously. 徐三石率先发动,他的身体强度最强。所以,他背后是三个八级魂导推进器。那骤然爆发出的推进速度,让他瞬间就达到了超音速水准。通过玄武盾挡在身前,就像是战场上的另一颗流星,瞬间拉近了与那位九级魂导师之间的距离。 But this nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer strength, the book is in three nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer weak­est one. 而这位九级魂导师的实力,本就是三位九级魂导师之中最弱的一个。 Judges these nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer strongs and weaks, Huo Yuhao does not carry on the de­ter­mi­na­tion from Soul Power, be­cause nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer Soul Power are very dif­fi­cult to judge, on them has var­i­ous Soul Guid­ance De­vice to carry on am­pli­fi­ca­tion and aux­il­iary, the at­tack also uses Soul Guid­ance De­vice. There­fore. Through the Soul Power judg­ment is in­ac­cu­rate. 判断这些九级魂导师的强弱,霍雨浩并不是从魂力进行判定的,因为九级魂导师的魂力很难判断,他们身上都有各种魂导器进行增幅、辅助,攻击也是使用魂导器。所以。通过魂力判断是不准确的。 The judg­ment of Huo Yuhao, bases on Spir­i­tual Power. This nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer Spir­i­tual Power is in com­plete three weak­est one. But Soul En­gi­neer cul­ti­vates later, wants to be­come more for­mi­da­ble, Spir­i­tual Power is im­por­tant. 霍雨浩的判断,是基于精神力进行。这位九级魂导师的精神力是全部三位之中最弱的一个。而魂导师修炼到后期,想要变得更加强大,精神力至关重要。 Under the func­tion of Soul Guid­ance Thruster, Xu San­shi leads two fe­males to rush to this front not far away in­stan­ta­neously. This Soul En­gi­neer had a scare im­me­di­ately. Soul Guid­ance De­vice con­tin­u­ous at­tacks. Tries to block the step of Xu San­shi ad­vance. 在魂导推进器的作用下,徐三石带着二女瞬间冲到这位前方不远处。这位魂导师顿时吓了一跳。身上各种魂导器连续攻击。试图阻挡徐三石前进的步伐。 How­ever, the Xu San­shi Eter­nal De­fense title is not Bai Jiao, the Black Tor­toise Shield sur­face rip­ples rip­ples, the bom­bard­ment, but to var­i­ous Soul Guid­ance De­vice pres­tige can be melted im­me­di­ately most, be­fore has not af­fected his po­ten­tial, flush­ing slightly. 但是,徐三石永恒之御的称号可不是白叫的,玄武盾表面荡漾起一圈圈涟漪,轰击而至的各种魂导器威能顿时被化解大半,丝毫没有影响他的前冲之势。 That nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer fight ex­pe­ri­ences are very sim­i­larly rich, at the same time launches the at­tack, pre­vents the im­pact of Xu San­shi. Also opened Soul Guid­ance Thruster of one­self chest place, counter pushes one­self body, fly­ing up­side down, tries to spread out among with Xu San­shi back­ward. 那位九级魂导师战斗经验同样十分丰富,一边发动攻击,阻挡徐三石的冲击。同时也是开启了自己胸口处的魂导推进器,逆推自己身体,向后倒飞而出,试图拉开与徐三石之间的距离。 Dur­ing the arrange­ment of Huo Yuhao, Beibei that group of peo­ple must be more for­mi­da­ble, Beibei, Xiao Xiao and Ji Juechen. Three peo­ple all are the pow­er­houses of eight rings Soul Douluo rank, more­over is not gen­eral Soul Douluo. Three peo­ple add, ab­solutely be stronger than Ti­tled Douluo. Xiao Xiao ex­cels at the con­trol and de­fense, Ji Juechen is good at at­tack­ing, Beibei is most com­pre­hen­sive. Three peo­ple col­lab­o­rate. Even if Huo Yuhao has not de­feated their as­sur­ances. 在霍雨浩的安排之中,贝贝那一组人显然要更加强大,贝贝、萧萧和季绝尘。三人全都是八环魂斗罗级别的强者,而且都不是一般的魂斗罗。三人加起来,绝对要比一位封号斗罗更强。萧萧擅长于控制和防御,季绝尘擅长攻击,贝贝则是最为全面。三人联手。就算是霍雨浩也没有战胜他们的把握。 But Xu San­shi, seemed seemed to be weaker, can in fact, re­ally weak? 而徐三石这边,看上去似乎弱了一些,可实际上,真的弱吗？ Ye Guyi through pre­vi­ous and a Myr­iad Souls Douluo war, after clos­ing up, some time ago just from depth med­i­tate sobered. Her bat­tle ef­fi­ciency strong, only then in the Huo Yuhao heart had the judg­ment in­dis­tinctly. Her Soul Power has been 80 lev­els of de­grees, what is de­fec­tive is only eighth Soul Ring. 叶骨衣通过上次与万魂斗罗一战,闭关之后,不久前刚刚从深度冥想中清醒过来。她的战斗力有多强,只有霍雨浩心中隐约有了判断。她的魂力已经达到了80级的程度,欠缺的只是第八魂环而已。 Sa­cred Angel Mar­tial Soul, is now one of the most top Mar­tial Soul de­serv­ing, is re­ly­ing on this for­mi­da­ble Mar­tial Soul, the strength that Ye Guyi can show is ex­tremely pow­er­ful. Re­pairs to achieve eight rings, means that this Sa­cred Angel has awak­ened truly. In the fu­ture once is the nine rings Ti­tled Douluo level, its strength is not in­fe­rior to a Ab­solute Mar­tial Soul owner. 神圣天使武魂,乃是当之无愧的当今最顶级武魂之一,凭借着这强大的武魂,叶骨衣所能展现出的实力是极其强悍的。修为达到八环,也就意味着她这神圣天使已经真正的觉醒了。未来一旦达到九环封号斗罗层次,其实力绝不亚于一位极致武魂拥有者。 Al­though Nan Qi­uqiu is weaker in the strength, but also had the Soul Saint bound­ary, don't for­get, she was the An­ni­hi­la­tion Mar­tial Soul owner, the great strength of Rouge Dragon, with pro­mot­ing also to have shown to the Soul Saint bound­ary. More­over, her body, has Ex­treme Ice Bat­tle God Armor. Al­though this Ex­treme Ice Bat­tle God Armor with not hav­ing Ice Spirit Ex­treme Ice Di­vine Crys­tal builds, does not carry on the di­rec­tion with Spir­i­tual Power. But in de­fense, Xuan Ziwen ac­tu­ally pro­moted Ab­solute this set of Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice. Nan Qi­uqiu even early at­tain this set of Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice com­pared with Huo Yuhao, the use has had at one's com­mand. 南秋秋虽然在实力上弱一些,但也已经有了魂圣境界,别忘了,她可是泯灭武魂的拥有者,胭脂龙的强大,伴随着提升到魂圣境界也已经展现出来。而且,她的身上,也有着一身冰极战神甲。尽管她这身冰极战神甲是用没有冰灵的冰极神晶打造,也不是用精神力进行指引的。但在防御方面,轩梓文却将这套人形魂导器提升到了极致。南秋秋甚至要比霍雨浩更早拿到这套人形魂导器,使用的已是如臂使指。 But in this group of three peo­ple, what is most im­por­tant is Xu San­shi, Xu San­shi in­di­vid­ual strength, even must sur­pass Beibei in the role that in the bat­tle­field can play. Abil­ity that be­cause his Black Tor­toise Shield can dis­play in as­so­ci­a­tion fight, was too pow­er­ful. 而这一组三人之中,最重要的还是徐三石,徐三石的个人实力,在战场上能够起到的作用甚至还要超过贝贝。因为他的玄武盾在团体战斗中所能施展的能力,太强悍了。 Like this time. 就像此时。 When that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer re­lease their Soul Guid­ance Thruster per­sonal ap­pear­ance to ex­plode draws back. Black Tor­toise Shield in Xu San­shi hand is ac­tu­ally the ray greatly puts. Ap­pear­ance that Golden Hawks­bill Tur­tle is qui­etly be­hind him. 当那位九级魂导师释放出自己的魂导推进器身形爆退之际。徐三石手中的玄武盾却是光芒大放。黄金玳瑁悄无声息的出现在他背后。 On that Black Tor­toise Shield, the halo sud­denly be­came il­lu­sory. That nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer felt that their body seemed held by a big hand, stiffly to re­turn­ing to draw. Has not waited for him to re­spond that the sur­round­ings are dizzy, he also ap­peared in front of Xu San­shi. 那玄武盾上面,光晕骤然变得虚幻了。紧接着,那位九级魂导师就感觉到自己的身体仿佛被一只大手抓住了似的,硬生生的向回拉动。还没等他反应过来,周围已是天旋地转,他也出现在了徐三石面前。 This is the Black Tor­toise Re­place­ment pro­mo­tion ver­sion, the Black Tor­toise sum­mon. After Black Tor­toise Mar­tial Soul awak­ens truly, strong ca­pa­bil­ity that Xu San­shi has. Catches in front of the match one­self in­stan­ta­neously, more­over es­tab­lishes ab­solutely. Re­gard­less of the match is for­mi­da­ble. When he dis­plays this move, so long as the match in his hun­dred me­ters range, is un­able to re­sist. 这是玄武置换的升级版,玄武召唤。在玄武武魂真正觉醒之后,徐三石所拥有的强大能力。瞬间将对手抓到自己面前,而且是绝对成立的。无论对手有多么强大。当他施展这一招的时候,只要对手在他百米范围内,就无法抵挡。 Like Black Tor­toise Re­place­ment, this is also di­vine skill gen­eral ex­is­tence! Es­pe­cially re­gard­ing de­fense sys­tem Bat­tle Soul Mas­ter is so. To fel­low sol­dier. Can help the part­ner be out of dan­ger in­stan­ta­neously, to the enemy, can draw the match be­fore the body in­stan­ta­neously. Coped with Soul En­gi­neer can be said as the eas­i­est-to-use abil­ity. 和玄武置换一样,这也是神技一般的存在啊！尤其是对于一位防御系战魂师来说更是如此。对袍泽。可以瞬间帮伙伴脱离险境,对敌人,可以瞬间将对手拉到身前。对付魂导师可以说是最好用的能力了。 But the Black Tor­toise sum­mon of this Black Tor­toise Re­place­ment pro­mo­tion ver­sion, even if were Huo Yuhao mind En­grav­ing En­grav­ing, had Xu San­shi to use. 而这玄武置换升级版的玄武召唤,就算是霍雨浩的精神复刻都复刻不了,只有徐三石自己才能使用。 That nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer have a big shock im­me­di­ately, first opened one­self Soul Guid­ance Pro­tec­tive Cover and Paragon Pro­tect­ing Cover. A layer upon layer ray own gable just likes a giant light co­coon is or­di­nary. 那位九级魂导师顿时大惊失色,第一时间就开启了自己身上的魂导护罩、无敌护罩。一层层光芒将自身包覆的犹如一个巨大的光茧一般。 Xu San­shi while start­ing the Black Tor­toise sum­mon, fifth Soul Ring has also shone. Back, Golden Hawks­bill Tur­tle fuses with his main body in­stan­ta­neously. His whole per­son looked like turned into great tur­tle, hit ma­li­ciously in this had been en­trained by pulling to nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer light bar­rier be­fore body above. 徐三石在发动玄武召唤的同时,身上的第五魂环也亮了起来。背后,黄金玳瑁瞬间与他本体融合。紧接着,他整个人就像是变成了一只巨龟似的,狠狠的撞击在了这位被拉拽到身前的九级魂导师光罩之上。 Tur­tle God Strike! 龟神撞！ Xu San­shi fifth Soul Abil­ity. 徐三石的第五魂技。 This Soul Abil­ity strik­ing power is ex­tremely pow­er­ful. Also is Xu San­shi it­self few at­tack Soul Abil­ity, or is an at­tack and de­fense build. 这个魂技的攻击力相当强悍。也是徐三石本身为数不多的攻击型魂技,或者说是攻防一体型。 Be­fore the fierce shake and was just en­trained the predica­ment to match body by pulling, mak­ing in this nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer hearts not pre­sent the fear on own ini­tia­tive. But he dis­cov­ered quickly that the strik­ing power of match is not too for­mi­da­ble, eight rings is eight rings! 剧烈的震荡和刚刚被拉拽到对手身前的窘境,令这位九级魂导师心中不自觉的出现了恐惧。但他很快就发现,对手的攻击力并不是太强大,八环就是八环啊！ That layer upon layer light bar­rier. Pro­tected his body even­tu­ally. More­over, he also hit flew, has spread out among with Xu San­shi three peo­ple. 那一层层光罩。终究还是保护住了他的身体。而且,他还被撞击的飞了出去,拉开了与徐三石三人之间的距离。 Re­gard­ing Soul En­gi­neer, one­self has not been in­jured in fight, but also has spread out among with matches, how re­gard­less to say that is a big good deed. 对于魂导师来说,自身在战斗中没有受伤,还拉开了与对手之间的距离,无论怎么说都是件大好事。 How­ever, this thought has not ap­peared com­pletely. The sur­round­ing all once again be­come the dis­tor­tion, are not real. 不过,他这个念头还没有完全出现。周围的一切就又一次变得扭曲、不真实起来。 The ray dodges. That was hit nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer that flies to dis­ap­pear from the scene, van­ished base­less. Dis­places, is to­gether dark blue form, is not just Huo Yuhao? 光芒一闪。那位被撞飞的九级魂导师就已经鸿飞冥冥,凭空消失了。取而代之的,是一道深蓝色身影,可不正是霍雨浩么？ „Bang” gold and sil­ver bi-color light beam, bom­bard­ment ma­li­ciously in midair. That po­si­tion, should be Huo Yuhao. Re­move Ice Me­teor Huo Yuhao. May at this mo­ment, ap­pear there, shoul­dered Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle to strike hardly fully, ac­tu­ally be­fore turn­ing into Xu San­shi, hits that flew. “轰”金银双色光柱,狠狠的轰击在了半空之中。那个位置,原本应该是霍雨浩的。撤掉了冰之流星的霍雨浩。可此时此刻,出现在那里,硬扛了日月神针全力一击的,却变成了徐三石之前撞飞的那位。 Yes, all these rad­i­cally dur­ing the com­pu­ta­tion of Huo Yuhao. His Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion and Shar­ing. Does not cover in one­self here bat­tle­field, is cov­er­ing also other two sides! 是的,这一切根本就是在霍雨浩的计算之中。他的精神探测共享。绝不只是笼罩在自己这边的战场上,同时也笼罩着另外两边啊！ When Xu San­shi full speed over­runs to­ward that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer, Huo Yuhao told Xu San­shi his op­er­a­tion plan through Spir­i­tual Shar­ing. 当徐三石全速朝着那位九级魂导师冲过去的时候,霍雨浩就已经通过精神共享将他的作战计划告诉了徐三石。 Does Shrek Seven Dev­ils co­or­di­nate the what kind tacit un­der­stand­ing? Xu San­shi sum­moned with Black Tor­toise that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer drew be­fore the body, Ye Guyi and Nan Qi­uqiu have not at­tacked him. But first was hit to fly with Tur­tle God Strike by Xu San­shi. To co­or­di­nate Huo Yuhao! 史莱克七怪配合何等默契？徐三石用玄武召唤将那位九级魂导师拉到身前,叶骨衣和南秋秋都没有攻击他。而是被徐三石第一时间用龟神撞撞飞出去。就是为了配合霍雨浩啊！ Tur­tle God Strike de­liv­ered to that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer has been away from Huo Yuhao near place, Black Tor­toise Re­place­ment that Huo Yuhao mind En­grav­ing came, has ex­changed the po­si­tion with this nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle that there­upon, should he with­stand, fell on that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. 龟神撞将那位九级魂导师送到了距离霍雨浩较近的地方,霍雨浩一个精神复刻过来的玄武置换,就和这位九级魂导师互换了位置。于是乎,本应该他来承受的日月神针,就落在了那位九级魂导师身上。 All these said slowly, may in fact, but after both sides con­tact mu­tu­ally, among the elec­tric light flint oc­curred. 这一切说起来慢,可实际上,只是双方相互接触之后,电光火石之间发生的。 When Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin dis­cov­ers the in­cor­rect time, his Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle has shelled ma­li­ciously. 当星空斗罗叶雨霖发现不对的时候,他的日月神针已经狠狠的轰击了上去。 Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle was known as that pre­sent age the strik­ing power does place first five nine lev­els of Soul Guid­ance De­vice can it be that to have un­earned rep­u­ta­tion? Huo Yuhao be­fore­hand judg­ment that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer that right, Xu San­shi they face truly are in this three peo­ple weak­est one. 日月神针号称当世攻击力排名前五的九级魂导器又岂是浪得虚名？霍雨浩之前判断的没错,徐三石他们面对的那位九级魂导师确实是这次三人中最弱的一个。 On him var­i­ous guard shields under the bom­bard­ment of Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle, were al­most in­stan­ta­neously on com­pletely to shat­ter. Guard armor De­fen­sive Soul Guid­ance De­vice is also changes into frag­ment every­where to dance in the air. 他身上的各种护罩在日月神针的轰击下,几乎是瞬间就全部破碎了。身上的护身铠甲防御魂导器也是化为碎片漫天飞舞。 How­ever, what has to ac­knowl­edge, nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer sur­vival ca­pa­bil­i­ties were too strong. When this nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer in body must be em­bez­zled by Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle shortly, the body shone the sil­ver sud­denly light, then the whole per­son is trans­mit­ted to­gether 30 me­ters away. Is runs away fi­nally tribu­la­tions. 不过,不得不承认的是,九级魂导师的生存能力太强了。这位九级魂导师在身体眼看要被日月神针吞没之时,身上突然亮起一道银光,然后整个人就被传送到了30米外。总算是逃得一劫。 But so, on him pre­sented the big piece burnt black, a blood is also the in­evitable crazi­ness spurts. 但就算如此,他身上还是出现了大片的焦黑色,一口鲜血也是不可避免的狂喷而出。 A bright ray in this flick­ers to cut the ex­pan­sive sky, the Pur­ple gold color giant light beam ap­peared, has il­lu­mi­nated in a kilo­me­ter range the jet black night­time sky. 一道灿烂的光芒就在这一瞬划破长空,紫金色的巨大光柱横空出世,照亮了千米范围内漆黑的夜空。 -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------- The three-in-one big chap­ter, asked rec­om­men­da­tion ticket. 三合一大章,求推荐票。 When our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour later newly-opened cloth­ing/tak­ing time changes to 13 : 00 pm, this more con­ve­nient every­body plays in the day­time. Joins us to play the sim­plest way di­rectly to click on the fol­low­ing hand tour to down­load the but­ton in the pres­tige and plat­form. 我们冰火魔厨手游以后新开服时间改为中午13点时,这样更方便大家在白天进行游戏。加入我们游戏最简单的方式就是在威信、平台直接点击下面的手游下载按钮。 Today will play will have new edi­tion to join, in­creases is amus­ing, the thing of in­ter­ac­tion, hopes that every­body will like. 今天游戏将有新的版本加入,增加许多好玩、互动的东西,希望大家喜欢。 Joins the plat­form, ask­ing every­body to use pres­tige - top right-hand cor­ner plus sign - in­creased friend - search pub­lic num­ber - searched Tang three few, had the au­then­ti­ca­tion, was our fam­i­lies! 加入平台,请大家用威信-右上角加号-添加朋友-查找公众号-搜索唐家三少,带认证的,就是我们的家啦！

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #552 Linkage! Guiding artillery


That just re­joiced one run away nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer that as­signs even to link a piti­ful yell with enough time not to send out, the per­son had been swal­lowed by this in­tense Pur­ple gold col­ored light glow. On him sur­plus many de­fen­sive mea­sures, has not pre­vented this Pur­ple gold col­ored light glow the pos­si­bil­ity. 那位刚刚庆幸自己逃得一命的九级魂导师甚至连一声惨叫都没来得及发出,人就已经被这道强烈的紫金色光芒吞噬了。他身上剩余不多的防御手段,根本就没有阻挡住这道紫金色光芒的可能。 At­tack plan of Huo Yuhao, 霍雨浩的攻击计划, Also few Tang Wu­tong? Dragon Dance Bril­lant Sun! Fi­nally strikes. 又怎么少的了唐舞桐呢？龙舞耀阳！最后一击。 Under sev­eral peo­ple col­lab­o­rate, nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer such stiffly were killed by strik­ing. 几人联手之下,一位九级魂导师就这么被硬生生的击杀了。 The dis­cov­ery at­tack has made a mis­take Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin of ob­ject at this time the com­plex­ion em­bar­rass­edly just likes the bot­tom of the pot is or­di­nary, when par­tic­u­larly he looks help­lessly that nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer per­ished under Dragon Dance Bril­lant Sun, in his eyes also re­vealed a hes­i­tant color. 发现攻击错了对象的星空斗罗叶雨霖此时脸色难堪的犹如锅底一般,尤其是当他眼睁睁的看着那位九级魂导师就那么殒灭在了龙舞耀阳之下,他眼中也流露出了一丝犹豫之色。 But at this time, the dis­tant place Sun-Moon Em­pire Soul Guid­ance Array place sur­face, has not pre­sented him to imag­ine thun­der­ing. 而此时,远处日月帝国的魂导阵地方面,并没有出现他想象中的轰鸣。 Has gone bad, was swin­dled! 坏了,上当了！ Ye Yulin first un­der­stands that he was fall into trap. Be­fore two light shadow that raised from below, first Guided Shot real, be­hind that shadow ac­tu­ally at all was not for­mi­da­ble As­sault Soul Guid­ance De­vice. But one­self pre­sented the mis­take in the sub­con­scious judg­ment, the Soul Guid­ance Array at­tack does not have first to cover to here. 叶雨霖第一时间就明白,自己是中计了。之前从下面升起的两道光影,第一道诱导弹是真的,后面那道黑影却根本不是什么强大的攻击魂导器。而自己在下意识的判断中出现了错误,以至于魂导阵地攻击没有第一时间覆盖向这边。 Ye Yulin just wanted to in­form Soul Guid­ance Array that side, a huge pres­sure, has ac­tu­ally headed on. 叶雨霖刚想要通知魂导阵地那边,一股巨大的压力,却已是扑面而来。 Dark blue light shadow, de­lim­its an ex­quis­ite halo in the night­time sky, di­rectly soars his di­rec­tion. Ter­ri­fy­ing speed that erupts in­stan­ta­neously, is nine lev­els of Flight Soul Guid­ance De­vice can achieve ab­solutely. 深蓝色的光影,在夜空中划出一道优美的光晕,直奔他的方向而来。那瞬间爆发出的恐怖速度,绝对是九级飞行魂导器才能做到的。 Ye Yulin could not at­tend to pon­der­ing that now why in these en­e­mies will have such for­mi­da­ble nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. He al­most does not have hes­i­tant any, turns around runs. 叶雨霖现在已经顾不得去思考为什么这些敌人之中会有这么一位强大的九级魂导师了。他几乎是没有任何犹豫的,掉头就跑。 Sun-Moon Di­vine Nee­dle launches two, to his own Soul Power con­sump­tion is quite huge. Let alone. Ye Yulin looks help­lessly own com­pan­ion died in bat­tle. But the op­po­site party five peo­ple in rapid are en­cir­cling to­ward one­self. Al­though he is proud very much, but has not been proud to think the strength of own one­self can also re­sist these five strength pow­er­ful matches. 日月神针发射两次,对他自身的魂力消耗是相当巨大的。更何况。叶雨霖已经眼睁睁的看着自己同伴战死。而对方五个人正在迅速朝着自己围过来。他虽然很自负,但也没有自负到认为自己一己之力还能对抗这五个实力强悍的对手。 There­fore, his turn­ing around with­out hes­i­ta­tion runs. Nine lev­els of Flight Soul Guid­ance De­vice he also has! 所以,他毫不犹豫的掉头就跑。九级飞行魂导器他也有啊！ But at this mo­ment, rays in not far away air­borne crack, in the air, had the strange fluc­tu­a­tion of big piece in­dis­tinctly. 而就在这时,一道道光芒在不远处的空中炸响,空气中,隐约产生出了大片的诡异波动。 Bas­tards! In the Ye Yulin heart cursed an­grily one, he knows cer­tainly that this was any gad­get. This type of Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball does not have ag­gres­sively any. Its name is Ob­struct­ing Bul­let. After the ex­plo­sion, can have the in­tense dis­turb­ing wave, made all com­mu­ni­ca­tion Soul Guid­ance De­vice and Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice time-limit fail­ure. 混蛋！叶雨霖心中怒骂一声,他当然知道这是什么玩意儿。这种魂导炮弹是没有任何攻击性的。它的名字叫做干扰弹。爆炸后能够产生强烈的干扰波,令所有通讯魂导器、探测魂导器暂时失效。 Here does not have Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice, the op­po­site party goal is very sim­ple, must block his com­mu­ni­ca­tion Soul Guid­ance De­vice! In fact. He also just planned to in­form Soul Guid­ance Array that side. 这里没有探测魂导器,对方的目的很简单,就是要封锁他的通讯魂导器啊！事实上。他也正是刚刚打算通知魂导阵地那边。 Ye Yulin this time com­plex­ion al­ready , was not only ugly, has sev­eral points of alarmed and afraid. Plan­ning of enemy was re­ally too ac­cu­rate, even was it can be said that ex­quis­ite. Every one step just arranges in front of one­self. He does not dare to ne­glect, this lit­tle while could not at­tend to leav­ing be­hind these en­e­mies, first runs away the life is most im­por­tant. 叶雨霖此时的脸色已经不只是难看了,更有着几分惊惧。敌人的算计实在是太准确了,甚至可以说是精妙。每一步都刚好布置在自己前面。他不敢怠慢,这会儿已经顾不上留下这些敌人了,先逃得性命才是最重要的。 That nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer that more­over that side, by Beibei three peo­ple of cop­ing are not shortly won­der­ful, is empty shakes one move, erupts a se­ries of pow­er­ful at­tacks, com­pelled to draw back the Beibei three peo­ple, one­self also sim­i­larly were launches nine lev­els of Flight Soul Guid­ance De­vice to turn around runs. Nat­u­rally. Route that he es­capes, sim­i­larly in the Ob­struct­ing Bul­let cov­er­age scope. 另外那边,由贝贝三人对付的那位九级魂导师眼看不妙,也是虚晃一招,爆发出一连串的强悍攻击,逼退了贝贝三人,自己也同样是展开九级飞行魂导器掉头就跑。当然。他逃跑的路线,也同样是在干扰弹的覆盖范围之内。 Huo Yuhao eight peo­ple sym­bolic pur­sued. Then rapidly re­turns, fell to­ward below link­age de­fense guard shield. 霍雨浩八人象征性的追了一下。然后就迅速返回,朝着下方的联动防御护罩落了下去。 After their this in­ter­cep­tion, with the for­mer col­li­sion, most heavy ar­tilleries has with­drawn un­dead Demi-plane. 经过他们这次的拦截,与之前的碰撞,绝大多数重炮都已经撤回了亡灵半位面。 Three nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. Two run falls from the sky. This col­li­sion is noth­ing less than splen­did. The Tang Sect peo­ple smile. Huo Yuhao was con­cen­trates Spir­i­tual Power to hurry to main­tain al­ready some­what il­lu­sory 18 leaves of Gate of the Dead. 三位九级魂导师。两跑一陨落。这次的碰撞不可谓不精彩。唐门众人相视一笑。霍雨浩则是集中精神力赶忙维持住了已经有些虚幻的18扇亡者大门。 Be­fore these Gate of the Dead is also main­tain­ing by Mer­maid Princess Li Ya, she some­what could not sup­port shortly, Huo Yuhao re­turned luck­ily promptly. 之前这些亡者大门也是由人鱼公主丽雅在维持的,她眼看就有些撑不住了,幸好霍雨浩及时返回。 Two nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer broke through the range of Ob­struct­ing Bul­let re­lease fi­nally. They re­late Soul Guid­ance Array im­me­di­ately that side. The Soul Guid­ance Array long-dis­tance fire suf­fi­cient en­ergy, the goal, points to Shrek Acad­emy here link­age de­fense guard shield. 两位九级魂导师终于冲过了干扰弹释放的范围。他们立刻联系上了魂导阵地那边。魂导阵地远程炮火充能,目标,直指史莱克学院这边的联动防御护罩。 This time they, are run­ning against the time. Sun-Moon Em­pire im­pe­r­ial palace, had more forms to leap in air­borne. Flew to­ward the city out­side. 此时的他们,是在和时间赛跑。日月帝国皇宫方面,已经有更多的身影腾起在空中。朝着城外飞了出来。 Just like such of Huo Yuhao judg­ment, this time, Sun-Moon Em­pire im­pe­r­ial Soul En­gi­neer Corp is not at luck­ily, oth­er­wise, im­pe­r­ial Soul En­gi­neer Corp joins the fight, they are ab­solutely im­pos­si­ble to be in­escapable. 正如霍雨浩判断的那样,幸好这一次,日月帝国的皇家魂导师团不在,否则的话,皇家魂导师团加入战斗,他们绝对不可能跑得了。 Dis­tant place. Bright Cap­i­tal City! The daz­zling in­can­des­cent light beam shoots up to the sky to­gether in­stan­ta­neously. That in­tense ray has al­most il­lu­mi­nated en­tire half Bright Cap­i­tal City in­stan­ta­neously. The white light soars to the heav­ens, will even have the feel­ing that a dark night and day­time in­vert in­stan­ta­neously to near per­son. 远方。明都！一道刺目的白炽光柱瞬间冲天而起。那强烈的光芒几乎是瞬间照亮了整个半个明都。白光冲天,离得近的人甚至会有种黑夜与白昼瞬间颠倒的感觉。 Sur­round­ing all shone white gloomy, has not com­pleted the evac­u­a­tion Huo Yuhao sev­eral peo­ple of faces is also so. 周围的一切都被映照的白惨惨的,就连尚未完成撤离的霍雨浩几人的面庞也是如此。 Huo Yuhao com­plex­ion big change, at this time, re­treated to carry on the last act im­me­di­ately. Heavy ar­tillery Soul En­gi­neer Corp all re­treats, the pre­sent is fort Soul En­gi­neer Corp and Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp Soul En­gi­neer re­treats in the col­lec­tive, but also re­quires time. 霍雨浩顿时脸色大变,此时,撤退已经进行到了尾声。重炮魂导师团全部撤退完毕,现在是炮台魂导师团和唐门魂导师团的魂导师们在集体撤退,还需要一点时间。 Al­though Huo Yuhao and the oth­ers do not know the white light pres­tige that dis­tant place that raises in­stan­ta­neously can be for­mi­da­ble, but a lit­tle he is at least clear, this spo­ken parts light, def­i­nitely was Bright Cap­i­tal City pro­tects a side Soul En­gi­neer Corp link­age As­sault Soul Guid­ance De­vice to as­sume an awe-in­spir­ing pose. Under from that Xuan im­pos­ing man­ner, this shoots down, surely is earth-shak­ing. Even if no as­sis­tance of High En­ergy Com­pres­sion Array Soul Guid­ance De­vice, per­haps is not good to with­stand. 虽然霍雨浩等人并不知道远方那瞬间升起的白光威能会有多么强大,但至少有一点他是清楚的,这道白光,肯定是明都守护一方的魂导师团联动攻击魂导器发威了。从那煊赫的气势来看,这一击落下,必定是石破天惊。就算是没有高能压缩阵列魂导器的辅助,恐怕也绝不好承受。 The sky turned into Bai Se (White Color), the clouds turned into Bai Se (White Color). Dis­tant place Bright Cap­i­tal City that side Bai Se (White Color) light beam van­ished, but Bai Se (White Color) in sky even more is in­tense. 天空变成了白色,云朵变成了白色。远处明都那边的白色光柱消失了,可天空中的白色却越发强烈起来。 Huo Yuhao both eyes like the elec­tric­ity, are star­ing at the dis­tant place upper air. In the upper air, one group at least has di­am­e­ter hun­dred me­ters huge Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere, is draw­ing to­gether the as­ton­ish­ing parabola, flew to­ward them. 霍雨浩双目如电,凝视着远处高空。高空之中,一团至少有直径百米的巨大白色光球,正划出一道惊人的抛物线,朝着他们这边飞了过来。 „I go!” Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion and Shar­ing has been con­nect­ing part­ners, he saw, the part­ners nat­u­rally also saw. Xu San­shi is al­most with­out hes­i­ta­tion must soar. “我去！”霍雨浩的精神探测共享一直连接着伙伴们,他看到了,伙伴们自然也就看到了。徐三石几乎是毫不犹豫的就要腾空而起。 In Shrek Seven Dev­ils strongest de­fense sys­tem Bat­tle Soul Mas­ter, Black Tor­toise Shield as well as the owner of Golden Hawks­bill Tur­tle spirit, he knows that he is duty-bound. 身为史莱克七怪中最强的防御系战魂师,玄武盾以及黄金玳瑁魂灵的拥有者,他知道,自己责无旁贷。 The heart of Jiang Nan­nan al­most clutched to tighten in­stan­ta­neously, she also pre­pared si­mul­ta­ne­ously to jump. At this time, she was im­pos­si­ble to pre­vent Xu San­shi, she also knows that she could not pre­vent ab­solutely, can­not pre­vent. Then, she ac­com­pa­nies him to­gether! 江楠楠的心几乎是瞬间就揪紧了,她也准备同时腾身而起。在这个时候,她是不可能阻止徐三石的,她也知道,自己绝对阻止不了,也不能阻止。那么,她就陪他一起！ „wait a mo­ment.” Huo Yuhao moves side­ways, ar­rived at be­hind them, both hands hold on the arm of Xu San­shi and Jiang Nan­nan sep­a­rately, has not made them fly. “等一下。”霍雨浩一闪身,就到了两人背后,双手分别拉住徐三石和江楠楠的手臂,没让他们飞起来。 „Yuhao!” The Xu San­shi star­tled anger oc­curred si­mul­ta­ne­ously bel­lows. Can hes­i­tate at this time? Once hes­i­tant, likely is the ru­inous dis­as­ter. “雨浩！”徐三石惊怒交加的大吼一声。在这种时候怎么能犹豫呢？一旦犹豫,很可能就是毁灭性的灾难。 „Point of de­scent is not right!” The Huo Yuhao sink­ing sound shouted to clear the way. “落点不对！”霍雨浩沉声喝道。 In this time, that huge Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere has been drop­ping from the clouds, en­trains an en­chant­ing Bai Se (White Color) tail smoke to di­rectly soar them to come, the speed is not quick, but the op­pres­sion strength of that ter­ror, ac­tu­ally the com­mand was in every­one in link­age de­fense guard shield to feel the huge pres­sure. 正在这时,那巨大的白色光球已经从天而降,拉拽着一条炫丽的白色尾烟直奔他们这边而来,速度并不是很快,但那恐怖的压迫力,却令身在联动防御护罩中的每个人都感受到了巨大的压力。 Al­most is sev­eral gar­ish free time, that huge Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere has dropped from the clouds, hit ma­li­ciously in being away from Tang Sect link­age de­fense guard shield ground about 200 me­ters away. 几乎就是几次扎眼的工夫,那巨大的白色光球已是从天而降,狠狠的撞击在距离唐门联动防御护罩大约200米外的地面上。 The earth first is slight shakes, pre­sents fierce shiv­er­ing, the Tang Sect peo­ple at pre­sent are snow white. Not fierce thun­der­ing, ground and ter­ror that shock-wave only then melts. 大地先是轻微的一震,紧接着,就呈现出剧烈的颤抖,唐门众人眼前已是一片雪白。没有剧烈的轰鸣,只有融化的地面和恐怖的冲击波。 Just likes rag­ing waves great wolf gen­eral Bai Se (White Color) shock-wave hit ma­li­ciously on Tang Sect here link­age de­fense guard shield, mak­ing the safety mask burst out in­tense rip­ples. 犹如狂涛巨狼一般的白色冲击波狠狠的撞击在唐门这边的联动防御护罩上,令防护罩迸发出一圈圈强烈的涟漪。 „DDD!” Grat­ing alarm sound along with it re­sound­ing, this is the link­age de­fense guard shield car­ry­ing ca­pac­ity was close to the limit the sig­nal. “滴滴滴！”刺耳的警报声随之响起,这是联动防御护罩承受力已经接近极限的信号。 At this time, the fort Soul En­gi­neer Corp also re­main­ing last peo­ple must re­treat, Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp and Shrek Seven Dev­ils and the oth­ers also in against rain shade. 此时,炮台魂导师团还剩下最后一点人就要撤退完毕,唐门魂导师团和史莱克七怪等人还在防雨罩内。 „The Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp prepa­ra­tion, lis­ten­ing to me to di­rect, the link­age at­tack prepa­ra­tion starts! Other peo­ple ac­cel­er­ate to evac­u­ate! First Se­nior Brother, you walk first.” The Huo Yuhao sound spreads to every­one ear in­stan­ta­neously. “唐门魂导师团准备,听我指挥,联动攻击准备发动！其他人加速撤离！大师兄,你们先走。”霍雨浩的声音瞬间传入每个人耳中。 The Beibei anger shouted to clear the way: „It is not good, Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp is I di­rects, you walk first.” 贝贝怒喝道:“不行,唐门魂导师团是我指挥的,你先走。” Huo Yuhao has turned round sud­denly, the dou­ble pupil stares at Beibei, dig­ni­fied [say / way]: „First Se­nior Brother, I can stay be­hind with Dong'er, di­rect Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp, please be­lieve me, I will not crack a joke with my lover. Only then I stay be­hind, can bring Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp to be out of dan­ger. Be­lieves me, now Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp not in Bright Cap­i­tal City.” 霍雨浩猛然回过身,双眸凝视贝贝,凝重的道:“大师兄,我会和冬儿一起留下,指挥唐门魂导师团,请相信我,我不会拿自己的爱人开玩笑。只有我留下,才能带着唐门魂导师团脱离险境。相信我,现在日月皇家魂导师团并没有在明都之中。” The ap­pren­tic broth­ers many years, Beibei is in­tel­li­gent, he un­der­stood in­stan­ta­neously the mean­ing of Huo Yuhao, deep star­ing his eyes, „we were wait­ing for you. Every­body re­moves with me.” At the same time was say­ing, he sev­eral other per­son of as well as Ji Juechen and the oth­ers waves to­ward Shrek Seven Dev­ils, re­turned to the body to fire into 18 leaves of Gate of the Dead. 师兄弟多年,贝贝又是何等聪明,他瞬间就明白了霍雨浩的意思,深深的凝视了他一眼,“我们等着你。大家跟我撤。”一边说着,他朝着史莱克七怪其他几人以及季绝尘等人一挥手,率先返身冲向了18扇亡者大门。 Also at this time, the Bright Cap­i­tal City di­rec­tion, is an in­tense white light shoots up to the sky. That daz­zling halo il­lu­mi­nates Bright Cap­i­tal City once more, the ter­ri­fy­ing op­pres­sion strength also in­stan­ta­neously ap­peared in Tang Sect here link­age de­fense guard shield. 也就在这个时候,明都方向,已经又是一道强烈的白光冲天而起。那刺目光晕再次照亮明都,恐怖的压迫力也瞬间出现在了唐门这边的联动防御护罩内部。 Every­one knows, Tang Sect link­age de­fense guard shield with­out the sup­port of Soul En­gi­neer, and it­self qual­ity was also in­fe­rior of op­po­site party Soul Guid­ance Array place, is im­pos­si­ble to sup­port this has struck. 谁都知道,唐门联动防御护罩在没有魂导师的支持,并且本身品质也远不如对方魂导阵地的情况下,是决不可能撑过这一击的。 That a mo­ment ago rea­son that struck the de­vi­a­tion , be­cause did not have lock­ing of upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice, can only be sim­ple sent out by the judg­ments of sev­eral nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. The er­ro­neous 200 me­ters, this time, was only im­pos­si­ble to hit again lean­ing. 刚才那一击之所以偏离,是因为没有高空探测魂导器的锁定,只能是简单的凭借几位九级魂导师的判断发出。误差仅有200米,这一次,是决不可能再打偏了。 „Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp, lifts off along with me.” Huo Yuhao gives a loud shout, holds the hand of Wang Dong'er to jump in­stan­ta­neously, flies to­ward the upper air. “唐门魂导师团,随我升空。”霍雨浩大喝一声,拉着王冬儿的手瞬间腾身而起,率先朝着高空飞去。 ------------------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- First apol­o­gized to every­body, yes­ter­day car­toon sent in af­ter­noon, was re­ally sorry. Every­body trans­mits: Peer­less Tang Sect 123, can con­sult the car­toon in our pres­tige plat­form. 首先向大家道歉,昨天漫画在下午才发出来,实在是抱歉了。大家发送:绝世唐门123,在我们威信平台中就可以查阅漫画了。 Also, yes­ter­day was three chap­ters of salvos, when every­body en­gag­ing in fierce bat­tle monthly ticket, I only want to ask the rec­om­men­da­tion ticket, but must trou­ble every­body to sup­port. 11 times, will have the per­sis­tent erup­tion. 10.1 my sym­bol, has thanked every­body's sup­port dili­gently, there­fore, re­quest­ing earnestly every­body to rec­om­mend the ticket and monthly ticket sup­ports the point. Thanks. 还有,昨天是三章连发哦,在大家都鏖战月票的时候,我只想求点推荐票,还要麻烦大家支持。11的时候,会有持续爆发的。10.1我会一直努力码字,来感谢大家的支持,所以,恳请大家推荐票和月票都支持点。谢谢。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #552 Linkage! Guiding artillery


Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp, is in Shrek Acad­emy three Soul En­gi­neer Corp most for­mi­da­ble one, not only equips well, cul­ti­vates for is also high­est, com­pletely com­prised of six rings above Soul Mas­ter. More­over is Shrek Acad­emy di­rect sub­or­di­nate is. Re­gard­ing Huo Yuhao, they, not only re­spects, has the re­spect of being filled with. Es­pe­cially in the be­fore­hand fight, Huo Yuhao has been lead­ing their vic­to­ri­ous en­e­mies time and time again, there­fore, when Huo Yuhao is­sues the order, al­though they look that the light beam of dis­tant place raised once more, no­body hes­i­tates, all lifts off under the Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion di­rec­tion of Huo Yuhao in­stan­ta­neously. 唐门魂导师团,乃是史莱克学院三支魂导师团中最为强大的一支,不仅装备最好,修为也是最高,全部由六环以上魂师组成。而且都是史莱克学院的嫡系所在。对于霍雨浩,他们不只是敬仰,更有着满心的崇敬。尤其是在之前的战斗中,霍雨浩已经带领着他们一次又一次的战胜敌人,因此,当霍雨浩下达命令的时候,尽管他们看着远方的光柱已经再次升起,却没有一个人犹豫,全都在霍雨浩的精神探测指引下瞬间升空而起。 Rises into air­borne, Huo Yuhao has not es­caped im­me­di­ately, but looks out huge bright sphere that Bai Se (White Color) light beam lifts off later con­denses be­comes. 升入空中,霍雨浩没有立刻远遁,而是遥望那白色光柱升空之后凝聚而成的巨大光球。 Under, Soul Guid­ance Array , a Tang Sect nu­mer­ous high level broke in 16 leaves of Gate of the Dead with fort Soul En­gi­neer Corp Soul En­gi­neer at the final mo­ment. 下方,魂导阵地之中,唐门一众高层已经和炮台魂导师团的魂导师们在最后时刻冲入了16扇亡者大门。 „Link­age Guid­ing Can­non, prepa­ra­tion!” “联动导引炮,准备！” Each Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp Soul En­gi­neer have made the uni­form move­ment, a yel­low small ar­tillery shoul­ders on the shoul­der. 每一位唐门魂导师团的魂导师们都做出了整齐划一的动作,一门黄色小炮扛在肩膀上。 „Cen­tered on me, guid­ing in­ten­sity 100%.” “以我为中心,导引强度100。” Huo Yuhao shoul­der, sim­i­larly many a like this small ar­tillery, stated dif­fer­ently, this cal­iber seems, only then less than 100 mil­lime­ters small ar­tillery is ac­tu­ally the golden color. 霍雨浩肩头,也同样多了一门这样的小炮,不同的是,他这门口径看上去只有不到100毫米的小炮却是金色的。 golden light sud­denly to launch, ac­tu­ally lifted off less than 30 me­ters, from the sky stag­nates, in this golden light beam peak, con­gealed rapidly golden bright sphere. 金光暴射而出,却只是升空了不足30米,就在空中凝滞,在这道金色光束顶端,迅速凝结出了一个金色光球。 At this time, that the dis­tant place Bright Cap­i­tal City di­rec­tion launches rolled Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere to rise the peak, started to fall to­ward here. 此时,远处明都方向发射出来的那团白色光球已经上升到了最高点,开始朝着这边落了过来。 200 yel­low color rays al­most launch in two sec­onds com­pletely, not to­ward Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere that drops, but all falls above bright sphere of that golden light beam peak, in Huo Yuhao has launched. 200道黄色光芒几乎是在两秒内全部发射而出,并不是朝着那落下的白色光球,而是全都落在了霍雨浩发射出的那道金色光束顶端的光球之上。 In the Huo Yuhao eye the god glit­ter­ing, this flick­ers, his mind in­ten­sity pro­motes Ab­solute in­stan­ta­neously. The small ar­tillery that the shoul­der car­ries moved in­stan­ta­neously. Im­me­di­ately, the cal­iber sur­passes ten me­ters bright golden color light beam elec­tric­ity to shoot to­gether. 霍雨浩眼中神光闪烁,这一瞬,他的精神强度瞬间提升到极致。肩头扛着的小炮瞬间甩动了一下。顿时,一道口径超过十米的灿金色光柱电射而出。 Bai Se (White Color) and golden color, are al­most from the sky blend in­stan­ta­neously, com­pared with huge Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere, that golden light beam seems noth­ing. How­ever. When the golden light hit above the white light, that Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere from the sky has stopped un­ex­pect­edly. Above were many a golden light mem­brane. 白色与金色,几乎是瞬间在空中交融,和巨大的白色光球相比,那金色光柱似乎算不了什么。但是。当金光命中在白光之上时,那白色光球居然在空中停顿了一下。紧接着,上面多了一层金色光膜。 The cheers are al­most re­sound Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp in­stan­ta­neously. 欢呼声几乎是瞬间就在唐门魂导师团这边响起。 Huo Yuhao cross­wise flings, that rolled Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere by far to fly. Di­rectly soars the Bright Cap­i­tal City di­rec­tion to fly to shoot to go. 霍雨浩横向一甩,那团白色光球就已经远远的飞了出去。直奔明都方向飞射而去。 Yes, this is Guid­ing Can­non. One of Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp link­age As­sault Soul Guid­ance De­vice. For­mi­da­ble Guid­ing Can­non, its ex­is­tence, more to cope with these tops in­stalls the soul big shell surely. But this time, Huo Yuhao ac­tu­ally re­sists link­age As­sault Soul Guid­ance De­vice of enemy with it. 是的,这就是导引炮。唐门魂导师团的联动攻击魂导器之一。强大的导引炮,它的存在,更多是为了对付那些顶级的定装魂大炮弹的。而这一次,霍雨浩却用它对抗敌人的联动攻击魂导器。 Guid­ing Can­non it­self not any strik­ing power, but is also most has tough one Soul Power man­i­fes­ta­tion most gen­tly. 导引炮本身没有任何攻击力,但却是最为柔和也最具韧性的一种魂力表现形式。 Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere of that ter­ror di­rectly soars at the same time that Bright Cap­i­tal City flies, Huo Yuhao then looked down a ground. 那恐怖的白色光球直奔明都飞去的同时,霍雨浩这才低头看了一眼地面。 From the air­borne bird's eye view is most di­rect-view­ing, he no­ticed that is ter­ror­ist at­tack strength that first Bright Cap­i­tal City link­age As­sault Soul Guid­ance De­vice erupts. A cen­tral depth ex­ceeds 200 me­ters, the di­am­e­ter kilo­me­ter. Only has the en­docrater that be­fore­hand Tang Sect the link­age de­fense guard shield range has. 从空中俯瞰是最为直观的,他看到的,是第一颗明都联动攻击魂导器爆发出来的恐怖攻击力。一个中心深度超过200米,直径千米。仅有之前唐门这边联动防御护罩范围存在的巨坑。 „Walks!” Huo Yuhao waves, bring­ing 200 Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp Soul En­gi­neer to turn around walks. But at this time, fol­low­ing 16 leaves of Gate of the Dead just closed. “走！”霍雨浩一挥手,带着200名唐门魂导师团的魂导师们掉头就走。而此时,下面的16扇亡者大门才刚刚闭合。 All within the com­pu­ta­tion of Huo Yuhao, when he leads Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp to lift off, has been sep­a­rated from Bright Cap­i­tal City Soul Guid­ance Array to launch that bright sphere at­tack cat­e­gory. Is im­pos­si­ble to be at­tacked. 所有的一切都在霍雨浩的计算之内,当他带领着唐门魂导师团升空的时候,就已经脱离了明都魂导阵地发射那枚光球的攻击范畴。是不可能被攻击到的。 But if he chooses re­treats from Gate of the Dead im­me­di­ately. Ac­tu­ally ab­solutely im­pos­si­ble be­fore the sec­ond round of ter­ri­fy­ing shell falls re­treats. 可如果他选择是从亡者大门那边立刻撤退。却绝对不可能在第二发恐怖炮弹落下来之前撤退完毕。 That side Bright Cap­i­tal City, the biggest prob­lem does not have for­mi­da­ble Soul En­gi­neer Corp to exist now, with­out them, does not have the pur­suit strength. But the Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp strength per­haps and Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp has the dis­par­ity, but com­pared with gen­eral Soul En­gi­neer Corp, wanted to be too many for­mi­da­ble. More­over, Bright Cap­i­tal City ma­jor­ity of upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice was de­stroyed. The de­tec­tion abil­ity is lim­ited. Huo Yuhao can def­i­nitely bring Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp to es­cape, why this was also he a mo­ment ago said to Beibei, Sun-Moon flower coun­try Soul En­gi­neer Corp not, Beibei agreed im­me­di­ately he re­mained. Be­cause only then he stays be­hind, can have the Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp true evac­u­a­tion. 明都那边,现在最大的问题就是没有一支强大的魂导师团存在,没有他们在,就没有追击的力量。而唐门魂导师团的实力或许和日月皇家魂导师团有差距,但和一般的魂导师团相比,还是要强大太多了。而且,明都大部分高空探测魂导器被毁。侦查能力有限。霍雨浩完全可以带着唐门魂导师团远遁,这也是为什么他刚才对贝贝说,日月花国家魂导师团不在的时候,贝贝立刻就同意了他留下来。因为只有他留下,才能带着唐门魂导师团真正撤离。 The ter­ri­fy­ing Bai Se (White Color) light group di­rectly soars Bright Cap­i­tal City to go, Huo Yuhao deeply be­lieved. The might of this gad­get can com­pare fa­vor­ably with one nine lev­els to in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball ab­solutely surely. Bright Cap­i­tal City Soul Guid­ance Array place, is he has seen ab­solutely most for­mi­da­ble. 恐怖的白色光团直奔明都而去,霍雨浩深信。这玩意儿的威力绝对可以媲美一颗九级定装魂导炮弹。明都的魂导阵地,也绝对是他见过的最强大的。 If this gad­get falls in Bright Cap­i­tal City, that...... 如果这玩意儿落在明都内部,那么…… In this time, is the Bai Se (White Color) light beam shoots up to the sky to­gether, more­over is flies up at angle spa­tially into. That fly­ing shoots at the Bright Cap­i­tal City di­rec­tion Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere. In­stan­ta­neously by this spo­ken parts light hit. 正在这时,又是一道白色光柱冲天而起,而且是斜飞入空。那飞射向明都方向的白色光球。瞬间就被这道白光命中。 „Bang!” The large ex­plo­sion re­sounds in the upper air, the sky turned into an in­can­des­cent color com­pletely, this time, en­tire Bright Cap­i­tal City was il­lu­mi­nated. “轰隆隆！”大爆炸在高空响起,天空完全变成了一片白炽色,这一次,整个明都都被照亮了。 „Was a pity!” Huo Yuhao de­pressed claps the palm of the hand, help­less shak­ing the head. Can­not give Bright Cap­i­tal City that side big­ger at­tack even­tu­ally. “可惜了！”霍雨浩郁闷的一拍巴掌,无奈的摇了摇头。终究还是没能给明都那边一次更大的打击。 How­ever, after this strikes, for them, the time was also enough. Locks with­out upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice, but the Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp re­treat­ing speed is ex­tremely also fast in­com­pa­ra­ble, Bright Cap­i­tal City Soul Guid­ance Array im­pos­si­ble to pose the threat to them. 不过,这一击之后,对他们来说,时间也足够了。在没有高空探测魂导器锁定,而唐门魂导师团撤退速度又极快无比的情况下,明都魂导阵地已经不可能对他们构成威胁了。 As for also has high level Soul En­gi­neer to pur­sue, that pos­si­bly has. How­ever, a mo­ment ago Guid­ing Can­non strikes to be pos­si­ble, not only to di­rect that Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere, is a de­ter­rent! For­mi­da­ble Soul En­gi­neer Corp takes to the de­ter­rent of match. 至于还有高阶魂导师追出来,那不是没可能。但是,刚才导引炮的一击可不只是为了引走那枚白色光球,同时也是一种威慑！强大魂导师团带给对手的威慑。 Nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer of any rank, even if Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, sees that to say the Guid­ing Can­non light beam, has to con­sider whether own strength can re­sist for­mi­da­ble Soul En­gi­neer Corp link­age As­sault Soul Guid­ance De­vice. 无论是什么级别的九级魂导师,哪怕是死神斗罗叶夕水在,看到那道导引炮光束,也不得不考虑自己一个人的力量是否能够对抗一支强大魂导师团的联动攻击魂导器。 Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wu­tong to raise in air­borne of high po­si­tion, mak­ing 200 Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp Soul En­gi­neer fly first to­ward the dis­tant place, they fall on the rear bring up the rear. 霍雨浩拉着唐舞桐升起在较高位置的空中,让200名唐门魂导师团的魂导师们先朝着远方飞去,他们落在最后面断后。 Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion com­pre­hen­sively launches, cov­ers to the Bright Cap­i­tal City di­rec­tion, whether mon­i­tors some that side peo­ple to pur­sue. 精神探测全面展开,覆盖向明都方向,监控着那边是否有人追来。 Facts showed that for­merly that ter­ri­fy­ing upper air col­li­sion had had ex­tremely huge shock-wave. Al­though shot­point not in Bright Cap­i­tal City, but that large ex­plo­sion has al­most also blocked sky over en­tire Bright Cap­i­tal City. Even if some peo­ple want to pur­sue, in this case also has to choose the self-preser­va­tion first. But upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice that these just lifted off also com­pletely van­ishes in puff of smoke in this large ex­plo­sion, does not re­main the sed­i­ment, in this case, wants to con­tinue to mon­i­tor Huo Yuhao their where­abouts, is re­ally too dif­fi­cultly and is too dif­fi­cult. 事实证明,先前那一次恐怖的高空碰撞产生了极其庞大的冲击波。虽然爆炸点并不是在明都内部,但那大爆炸也几乎封锁了整个明都上空。就算是有人想要追来,在这种情况下也不得不先选择自保。而那些刚刚升空的高空探测魂导器也在这场大爆炸中全部灰飞烟灭,连渣滓都不剩了,在这种情况下,想要继续监控到霍雨浩他们的行踪,就实在是太难、太难。 Until at this mo­ment, Huo Yuhao fi­nally re­laxed, this draws Tang Wu­tong to pur­sue front Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp to de­part. 直到此刻,霍雨浩才总算是松了口气,这才拉着唐舞桐追着前面的唐门魂导师团离去。 After hav­ing de­parted about hun­dred li (0.5km). After mul­ti­ple changes, did not de­ter­mine after any Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice and pur­su­ing troops exist, Huo Yuhao then leads every­body to fall into woods. Is sup­press­ing weak feel­ing on the mind, re­cited the Gate of the Dead in­can­ta­tion again. Just. He re­ally can­not sup­port nine leaves of front doors now, with the help of Mer­maid Princess Li Ya, re­leases three leaves of front doors in the in­can­ta­tion. 一直飞出近百里之后。经过多次转向,确定没有任何探测魂导器和追兵存在之后,霍雨浩这才带着大家落入一片树林之中。强忍着自己精神上的虚弱感,再次念动了亡者大门的咒语。只不过。他现在实在是支持不了九扇大门了,在人鱼公主丽雅的帮助下,也只是用咒语释放出三扇大门。 Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp Soul En­gi­neer file, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wu­tong also enter. Al­though this war does not have the per­son­nel to lose fi­nally, but they also too need to rest. 唐门魂导师团的魂导师们鱼贯而入,霍雨浩和唐舞桐也进入其中。这一场大战虽然最终没有人员损失,但他们也都太需要休息了。 Sky over Bright Cap­i­tal City the in­can­des­cent color has con­tin­ued for nearly ten min­utes, com­pletely is gloomy. But en­tire Bright Cap­i­tal City, at this time is ac­tu­ally com­pletely dur­ing a piece is scared. 明都上空白炽的色彩足足持续了近十分钟,才完全暗淡下来。而整个明都,此时却已是完全在一片恐慌之中。 The loss of com­mon peo­ple are not ac­tu­ally big, when the ini­tial ter­ror thun­ders re­sounds, the aris­to­crat is also good, com­mon peo­ple. All was ac­tu­ally awak­ened from the sleep, after being awak­ened, al­though they do not dare to go out, but ob­serves out­side all from the win­dow. 平民的损失其实并不大,可是,当最初的恐怖轰鸣响起时,贵族也好、平民也罢。却全都从睡梦中被惊醒,被惊醒之后,他们虽然不敢出门,但从窗户观察外面的一切还是可以的。 There­fore, they saw the air­borne ever emerg­ing strange pic­ture. Lis­tens to that ter­ror to thun­der, what is more im­por­tant, they also saw im­pe­r­ial palace di­rec­tion that large ex­plo­sion. 于是,他们就看到了空中不断出现的奇异景象。听着那一声声恐怖轰鸣,更重要的是,他们还看到了皇宫方向那大爆炸。 Is nearer from the im­pe­r­ial palace, per­son who more has the sta­tus in Bright Cap­i­tal City. Al­though nearby the im­pe­r­ial palace does not per­mit the con­struc­tion high-rise con­struc­tion, but can see very clearly from the dis­tant place. Nine lev­els of that ter­ror in­stalled Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball punc­ture stiffly the im­pe­r­ial palace layer on layer to de­fend surely, fi­nally at­tacked in one of the im­pe­r­ial palace Core Area ter­ri­tory, shocks per­son who all saw. 距离皇宫越近,越是在明都中有地位的人。尽管皇宫附近不允许建造高层建筑,但从远处还是能够看得很清楚。那恐怖的九级定装魂导炮弹硬生生的穿刺了皇宫重重防御,最终打击在皇宫核心区域的一幕,震惊了所有看到的人。 Where is im­pe­r­ial palace that? Is the Sun-Moon Em­pire Bright Cap­i­tal City true core is at! Al­though shortly after Xu Tian­ran just as­cended the throne. But after he as­cends the throne. Sun-Moon Em­pire pro­gresses day by day, has seized the big piece Sky Soul Em­pire land, par­tic­u­larly some time ago just an­nounced that Sky Soul Em­pire ex­tin­guishes the coun­try thor­oughly, after the do­main in­te­grates the Sun-Moon Em­pire rule com­pletely, the Xu Tian­ran pres­tige in Bright Cap­i­tal City el­e­vates the ex­tremely ter­ri­fy­ing sta­tus. Even has been hon­ored as one gen­er­a­tion of en­light­ened em­per­ors. 皇宫那是什么地方？是日月帝国明都真正的核心所在啊！徐天然虽然刚刚登基不久。但在他登基之后。日月帝国蒸蒸日上,更是占领了大片天魂帝国土地,尤其是不久前刚刚公布,天魂帝国彻底灭国,版图全部纳入日月帝国统治之后,徐天然的威望在明都之中提升到了极其恐怖的地位。甚至已经被誉为一代圣君。 But under such premise, their this one gen­er­a­tion of en­light­ened em­per­ors ac­tu­ally has faced the so di­rect at­tack, every­one not clear this en­light­ened em­peror is also liv­ing, in im­pe­r­ial palace sit­u­a­tion ac­tu­ally how, how can also not be scared? This even­tu­ally be­comes a sleep­less night. 可就在这样的前提下,他们这位一代圣君却面临了如此直接的打击,谁也不清楚这位圣君是否还活着,皇宫内情况究竟如何,又如何能够不恐慌呢？这终究将会成为一个不眠之夜。 In Bright Cap­i­tal City. The alarm sound, ex­plo­sive sound and noise, the rays of var­i­ous Soul Guid­ance De­vice twin­kles, un­ceas­ingly var­i­ous frag­ments and de­tri­tus that from air­borne falls, sud­denly, this first under heaven city has messed up com­pletely. This at­tack takes to the Bright Cap­i­tal City in­flu­ence by far the de­struc­tive power be stronger. 明都内。警报声、爆炸声、嘈杂声,还有各种魂导器闪烁的光芒,不断从空中掉落的各种碎片、碎屑,一时间,这座天下第一城市已经完全乱套了。这次的攻击带给明都的影响力远远要比破坏力更强。 Bright Cap­i­tal City im­pe­r­ial palace. 明都皇宫。 Xu Tian­ran this time com­plex­ion is very ugly, palely like the paper, in the dou­ble pupil be­sides the strong anger, is dim athe­is­tic. 徐天然此时的脸色很难看,苍白如纸,双眸中除了强烈的愤怒之外,更是黯淡无神。 It can be said that since this has been he as­cends the throne the most se­ri­ous at­tack, Xu Tian­ran has not thought that is in Bright Cap­i­tal City im­pe­r­ial palace, has the king in strongest Soul Guid­ance De­vice coun­try as the world now, will face the di­rect at­tack of Soul Guid­ance De­vice un­ex­pect­edly. 可以说,这是他登基以来最沉重的一次打击,徐天然万万没想到,身在明都皇宫中的自己,作为当今天下拥有最强魂导器国家的帝王,竟然会面对魂导器的直接打击。 That in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to make the ex­tremely pro­found im­pres­sion on him surely, the punc­ture abil­ity of that ter­ror, was not any nine lev­els of Soul Guid­ance De­vice that cur­rently Sun-Moon Em­pire has can have ab­solutely. Al­though from the over­all might, seems not too strong, but wants to guess to ob­tain with the foot heel, this type in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball spe­cially to de­velop to cope with the Sun-Moon Em­pire link­age de­fense guard shield surely. 那枚定装魂导炮弹给他留下了极其深刻的印象,那恐怖的穿刺能力,绝对不是目前日月帝国所拥有的任何一种九级魂导器所能具备的。尽管从整体威力来看,似乎并不是太强,但用脚后跟想都能猜得到,这种定装魂导炮弹是专门研制出来对付日月帝国联动防御护罩的。 ---------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------------- Well, Magic Chef of Ice and Fire swims me to favor many peo­ple not to hit the abyss! Hit­ting the abyss can ac­cu­mu­late that to the ma­te­r­ial that the part­ner breaks through. Hey, friend­ship prompt. The abyss I pro­jected on fifth to close. 咦,冰火魔厨手游我看好多人都不会打深渊啊！打深渊才能攒那个给伙伴突破的材料哦。嘿嘿,友情提示。深渊我打到第五关了。 Down­loads our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour, wel­come to pres­tige - plat­form, under the click plat­form but­ton is good. 下载我们冰火魔厨手游,请到威信-平台,点击平台下面的按钮就好。 For these days the peer­less Tang Sect car­toon sent to Lit­tle Huo to enter Shrek Acad­emy fi­nally, to let him saw Wang Dong as soon as pos­si­ble, I will send with a sense of ur­gency. 这几天绝世唐门漫画终于发到小霍进史莱克学院了,为了让他尽快见到王冬,我会抓紧发的。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #552 Linkage! Guiding artillery


The im­pe­r­ial palace, Xu Tian­ran al­most can af­firm at this time luck­ily that any sole link­age de­fense guard shield is at pre­sent im­pos­si­ble to block that to strike. In other words, if that type in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to have surely enough, sub­verts the Sun-Moon Em­pire rule suf­fi­ciently. This is the most fear­ful place. 幸好这时皇宫,徐天然几乎可以肯定,目前任何一种单一的联动防御护罩都不可能挡得住那一击。也就是说,如果那种定装魂导炮弹拥有足够数量的话,是足以颠覆日月帝国统治的。这才是最可怕的地方。 This type in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely not from Sun-Moon Em­pire, then, in­evitably from be­long­ing to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries, when did that be­long to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries has so for­mi­da­ble Soul Guid­ance De­vice R &\; D ca­pa­bil­ity? 这种定装魂导炮弹不是来自于日月帝国,那么,必然就是来自于原属斗罗大陆三国了,可是,那原属斗罗大陆三国什么时候具备如此强大的魂导器研发能力了？ Side Xu Tian­ran, stands is wear­ing Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui of black long gown. Ye Xishui it­self also lives in the im­pe­r­ial palace, there­fore, when that large ex­plo­sion ap­pears, she is also the ear­li­est pos­si­ble time re­sponds. Stated dif­fer­ently, Xu Tian­ran lives in the im­pe­r­ial palace core place, but she ac­tu­ally lives in the cor­ner of im­pe­r­ial palace, there­fore, has not come under the most di­rect at­tack. 徐天然身边,站着身穿一身黑色长袍的死神斗罗叶夕水。叶夕水本身也住在皇宫之中,因此,当那大爆炸出现的时候,她也是第一时间反应过来的。不同的是,徐天然是住在皇宫核心处,而她却是住在皇宫的角落里,所以,并没有受到最直接的打击。 She has not gone to trace the enemy, at this time, any­thing com­pared with pre­serv­ing a Xu Tian­ran life more im­por­tant mat­ter. 她没有去追查敌人,在这个时候,没有什么比保住徐天然的性命更重要的事情了。 Holds on to the throne with Xu Tian­ran, is Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui also more and more dis­cov­ered that this king in fact more and more had not been con­trolled by one­self, the strength that he shows is also get­ting stronger and stronger. Sun-Moon Em­pire back­ground, imag­ines her by far is much deeper. 伴随着徐天然坐稳皇位,身为死神斗罗的叶夕水也越来越发现,这位帝王实际上已经越来越不受到自己控制了,他所展现出的实力也越来越强。日月帝国的底蕴,远远比她想象中深厚得多。 How­ever, in this case, Ye Xishui also can only con­tinue to make Holy Spirit Cult de­velop like this. Xu Tian­ran is her half ap­pren­tice, in the mean­time, Xu Tian­ran is also in Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily the firmest Holy Spirit Cult sup­porter, at least the pre­sent is so. At pre­sent, Sun-Moon Em­pire to be­long­ing to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries re­sorts to arms, crit­i­cal mo­ment. If Xu Tian­ran died at this time, the new to go on stage king has not known to Holy Spirit Cult what kind of mood. 但是,在这种情况下,叶夕水也只能继续这样让圣灵教发展下去。徐天然是她半个徒弟,同时,徐天然也是皇室之中最坚定的圣灵教支持者,至少现在是如此。目前,日月帝国对原属斗罗大陆三国用兵,正在关键时刻。如果这个时候徐天然死了,新上台的帝王还不知道会对圣灵教怎样的情绪。 The Ye Xishui orig­i­nally thinks one are can grasp all these. How­ever. She ac­tu­ally started not to think now, be­cause of Sun-Moon Em­pire as­pect de­vel­oped lat­est Soul Guid­ance De­vice, has made her also feel the fear. The Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp over­all strength, Ye Xishui does not have any as­sur­ance to re­sist com­pletely. 叶夕水原本认为自己是可以掌握这一切的。但是。她现在却已经开始不这么想了,因为日月帝国方面研制出来的最新型魂导器,已经让她也感觉到了恐惧。日月皇家魂导师团的整体实力,叶夕水也没有任何把握能够完全对抗。 But that Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp ac­tu­ally takes or­ders in Em­peror Sun-Moon Em­pire. 而那日月皇家魂导师团却只是听命于日月帝国皇帝。 There­fore, under many ben­e­fit pon­ders, Ye Xishui can only fully sup­port Xu Tian­ran, si­mul­ta­ne­ously finds the way to con­tinue to Sun-Moon Em­pire to deepen the seep­age. There­fore, she has not gone to pur­sue. 因此,在多番利益思考之下,叶夕水只能是全力支持徐天然,同时想办法继续对日月帝国加深渗透。因此,她没有去追。 „!” Xu Tian­ran coughs two, im­me­di­ately has the bloody foam to spout from his mouth. Nearby in waits on to hurry the clean towel to de­liver. “咳咳！”徐天然咳嗽两声,顿时有血沫子从他口中喷出。旁边的内侍赶忙将干净的毛巾送过来。 Xu Tian­ran com­plex­ion changed ugly. Pats the fly­ing towel, has wiped a lower jaw with the hand. 徐天然的脸色变得更加难看了。拍飞毛巾,用手抹了一下嘴。 He cul­ti­vates the tal­ent is ex­tremely good, be­cause com­peted for the throne time in­ter­val to go to the both legs with the broth­ers long ago, in­jur­ing of enor­mous de­gree the vi­tal­ity, af­fected the dis­play of his tal­ent. Af­ter­ward had used var­i­ous best med­i­cines, this can cul­ti­vat­ing to push to rise to the Ti­tled Douluo level. May in fact. His true strength and Ti­tled Douluo com­pare have the dis­par­ity. 他本身修炼天赋是极佳的,但因为早些年和兄弟争夺皇位时断去双腿,极大程度的伤了气血,就影响了他天赋的发挥。后来使用了各种最好的药物,这才能够将修为推升到封号斗罗层次。可实际上。他真正的实力和封号斗罗相比还有差距。 In­nate Body Douluo Du Busi takes the life to ini­ti­ate to him as the price at­tacks fa­tally that time, has taken to him the quite se­ri­ous in­jury, al­though has been re­cu­per­at­ing, ac­tu­ally through­out can­not to heal and re­cover com­pletely, but this time, he re­ceived nine lev­els to in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely the bap­tism. It may be said that is in the wound adds the wound, within the body in­jury al­ready very heav­ily. Al­though just had car­ried on the treat­ment by cure sys­tem Soul Mas­ter. But the ef­fect is not quite good. His Mar­tial Soul source as well as Spir­i­tual Source are dam­aged se­ri­ously, needed to re­cu­per­ate for a long time has the pos­si­bil­ity of reply. More­over, he breaks the in­flu­ence of both legs, to the huge load of his body. 本体斗罗毒不死以生命为代价向他发起致命攻击那次,带给了他相当沉重的伤势,虽然一直在调养,却始终没能痊愈,而这次,他又受到了九级定装魂导炮弹的洗礼。可谓是伤上加伤,体内伤势已经十分沉重。虽然刚刚由治疗系魂师进行了治疗。但效果却并不太好。他的武魂本源以及精神本源都受创严重,需要长时间调养才有回复的可能了。而且,他断去双腿的影响,也是对他身体的巨大负荷。 The court physi­cians do not dare to tell him the truth, but Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui ac­tu­ally ex­plicit told him, even if there is a Heaven and Earth Trea­sure sup­port of most top, per­haps he also lived is about 50 years. But he is also less than now 40 years old. 50 years, i.e. he ex­actly is less than 100 years old. This to one is the king of Ti­tled Douluo rank, was re­ally too short. 御医不敢告诉他实情,但死神斗罗叶夕水却明确的告诉他,就算有最顶级的天材地宝支持,他恐怕也活不过50年了。而他现在还不到40岁。50年,就是说他活不到100岁。这对一位已经是封号斗罗级别的帝王来说,实在是太短暂了。 In this case, Xu Tian­ran mood pos­si­bly good? 在这种情况下,徐天然的心情怎么可能好的了？ More and more forms ap­pear side Xu Tian­ran, every­one is very silent. Bright Cap­i­tal City this time, it can be said that suf­fered the un­prece­dented huge at­tack. Even must sur­pass that un­der­ground ar­se­nal large ex­plo­sion. Al­though that time large ex­plo­sion has af­fected half Bright Cap­i­tal City, the com­mon peo­ple lose se­ri­ously. But that time must un­ex­pect­edly be from in­side to out­side, is not Bright Cap­i­tal City de­fen­sive power is in­suf­fi­cient. 越来越多的身影出现在徐天然身边,每个人都很沉默。明都这一次,可以说是遭受了前所未有的巨大打击。甚至还要超过那一次地下军火库大爆炸。那次的大爆炸虽然是波及了半个明都,平民损失惨重。但那一次必竟是由内而外的,并不是明都本身的防御力不够。 But this time, di­rectly at­tacked is ac­tu­ally the im­pe­r­ial palace! Only in sig­nif­i­cance en­tirely dif­fer­ent, more­over broke through the im­pe­r­ial palace de­fense. The kings are in­jured di­rectly, this makes at­tack that at heart Sun-Moon Em­pire Soul En­gi­neer come under huge. 而这一次,被直接打击的却是皇宫啊！单是意义上就截然不同,而且还是突破了皇宫防御。帝王直接受伤,这让日月帝国的魂导师们受到的心里打击就是巨大的。 The body of Xu Tian­ran leans on com­pletely on the chair, he ac­tu­ally com­pletely has hit mind now. At this time, he very clear can­not get down ab­solutely but ac­tu­ally, the good phase of oth­er­wise, just build­ing, will pos­si­bly come under the fatal blow. 徐天然的身体完全是倚靠在椅子上,他现在其实已经完全是强打精神。在这个时候,他很清楚自己绝对不能倒下去,否则的话,刚刚营造出来的良好局面,很可能就会受到致命打击。 „Did prime min­is­ter come?” Xu Tian­ran asked with the some­what hoarse sound. “首相来了没有？”徐天然用有些沙哑的声音问道。 „Your majesty, the old min­is­ter just ar­rived.” The prime min­is­ter walks from be­hind, ar­rives in front of Xu Tian­ran, salutes re­spect­fully, in eye ac­tu­ally some­what star­tled color. “陛下,老臣刚到。”首相从后面走出来,来到徐天然面前,恭敬行礼,眼中却有些惊慌之色。 Xu Tian­ran coldly looked at his one eyes, „is this sea high-speed change di­rec­tion enemy who you said?” 徐天然冷冷的看了他一眼,“这就是你说的海上高速改变方向的敌人？” On the prime min­is­ter face the look full is bit­ter and as­trin­gent, „feu­dal of­fi­cial knows the crime.” 首相脸上神色满是苦涩,“臣知罪。” Xu Tian­ran coldly [say / way]: „You stand first one side.” Cour­te­ous re­cep­tion that prime min­is­ter time, has not sat down again. 徐天然冷冷的道:“你先站到一旁。”首相这一次,再也没有坐下的礼遇了。 The min­is­ters im­me­di­ately have caught up, at this time in­ces­santly was the table loyal im­por­tant mo­ment, what was more im­por­tant, they must con­firm the sit­u­a­tion of king, once Xu Tian­ran died in this at­tack, then, they must carry on other to op­er­ate. 大臣们都已经在第一时间赶了过来,这个时候不止是表忠心的重要时刻,更重要的是,他们也要确认帝王的情况,一旦徐天然真的在这次袭击中死亡,那么,他们就要进行其他运作了。 What the Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily mem­bers come is ear­li­est, ini­tially and Xu Tian­ran strug­gled that sev­eral im­pe­r­ial princes, al­though saw the first sov­er­eign. But is Xu Tian­ran, will be im­pos­si­ble sov­er­eign all male off­spring to ex­ter­mi­nate first com­pletely, that will be the Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily an­ces­tors and rel­a­tives does not per­mit. If he dares to do, per­haps will not be hes­i­tated all lag­ging be­hind thrones by these peo­ple. 皇室成员们来的是最早的,当初和徐天然争位的那几个皇子虽然都已经去见先皇了。但就算是徐天然,也不可能将先皇所有子嗣全部灭绝,那是皇室宗亲们所不允许的。他要是敢那么做,恐怕会被这些人不惜一切的拉下王座。 There­fore, is hop­ing Xu Tian­ran dies, not only but a per­son. 所以,盼着徐天然死的,可不只是一个人。 „Can crown prince be well?” The Xu Tian­ran sink­ing sound asked. “太子可安好？”徐天然沉声问道。 Wor­ship Hall con­se­crates the half step to go for­ward, „crown prince crown prince the palace has the Eter­nal Star Field pro­tec­tion, all well, ask­ing your majesty to feel re­lieved.” 一位供奉堂供奉快步上前,“太子东宫宫殿有永恒星域守护,一切安好,请陛下放心。” „Um.” Xu Tian­ran nod­ded. How he can not know that side the crown prince has any Soul Guid­ance De­vice to pro­tect, Eter­nal Star Field is hon­ored as Sun-Moon Em­pire strongest De­fen­sive Soul Guid­ance De­vice, is the pro­tec­tion in his im­pe­r­ial palace. But be­fore this Ju Zi(or­ange) goes to bat­tle, did not feel re­lieved to the safety of crown prince ex­tremely, to let her feels at ease, Xu Tian­ran has then de­liv­ered to that side Eter­nal Star Field the crown prince as the de­fense. “嗯。”徐天然点了点头。他怎会不知道太子那边有什么魂导器守护,永恒星域被誉为日月帝国最强防御魂导器,本来是守护在他寝宫的。但这次橘子出征之前,对太子的安危极不放心,为了让她安心,徐天然这才将永恒星域送到了太子那边作为防御。 Be­fore that nine lev­els in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely the strik­ing power, al­though was strong, but was also not enough to break through the de­fense of Eter­nal Star Field, the crown prince nat­u­rally was safe and sound. 之前那九级定装魂导炮弹的攻击力虽强,但还不足以突破永恒星域的防御,太子自然是安然无恙。 Xu Tian­ran works as all peo­ple to ask that i.e. gives cer­tain peo­ple to lis­ten. 徐天然当着所有人问,就是说给某些人听的。 Hears the crown prince to be all right, re­ally the com­plex­ions of many peo­ple slightly change. So long as the coun­try has the crown prince, even if were Xu Tian­ran died, was not one's turn them to in­herit the throne. 听说太子没事,果然有不少人的脸色都是微微一变。国家只要有储君在,就算是徐天然死了,也轮不到他们来继承皇位。 The Xu Tian­ran cor­ners of the mouth place re­veals color of the teas­ing. Asked to old man: „Old Kong, how long im­pe­r­ial does Soul En­gi­neer Corp also come back?” 徐天然嘴角处流露出一丝戏谑之色。向身边一名老者问道:“孔老,皇家魂导师团还有多久回来？” Was called Old Kong by him, the body is very big, a grey Bai Se (White Color) short roots of the hair root stands erect, the body puts on un­ex­pect­edly is the bright yel­low long gown, this is only then Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily can wear, but can see from his sur­name, this is not the Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily mem­ber. 被他称为孔老的这位,身材十分高大,一头灰白色的短发根根竖立,身上穿的竟然是明黄色长袍,这可是只有皇室才能身穿的,而从他的姓氏就能看出,这位可不是皇室成员。 He has stood an­other side of Xu Tian­ran, com­plex­ion quiet like water, as if be­fore , all that all has have noth­ing to do with him, but if will care­fully ob­serve will dis­cover that his body will have an in­vis­i­ble strength to send out, will cover Xu Tian­ran, will look like the Xu Tian­ran pro­tec­tor is or­di­nary. 他一直站在徐天然另一边,脸色沉静如水,似乎之前所有发生的一切都与他无关,但如果仔细观察就会发现,他身上有一层无形的力量散发出来,将徐天然笼罩在内,就像是徐天然的守护者一般。 Po­si­tion that Old Kong stands, even be away from Xu Tian­ran to be nearer than Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui. But he stands there, in the im­pos­ing man­ner, does not lose to Ye Xishui many un­ex­pect­edly. 孔老所站的位置,甚至要比死神斗罗叶夕水距离徐天然都更近。而他站在那里,在气势上,居然并不输给叶夕水多少。 Xu Tian­ran lis­tened to his words, nods the head slightly, said: „Passes on me to order, not to hes­i­tate at all costs, searches for the enemy trail. Can Old Ye once come back?” 徐天然听了他的话,微微颔首,道:“传我命令,不惜一切代价,搜寻敌人踪迹。叶老可曾回来？” „Your majesty, old min­is­ter in this.” Not far away, two peo­ple walk quickly to­ward here. Sky over the im­pe­r­ial palace for­bids to fly ab­solutely. Even if Wor­ship Hall con­se­crates to be no ex­cep­tion. “陛下,老臣在此。”不远处,两个人快步朝着这边走来。皇宫上空是绝对禁止飞行的。哪怕是供奉堂供奉也不例外。 Ye Yulin com­plex­ion, is more un­at­trac­tive than Xu Tian­ran many, Xu Tian­ran ex­pe­ri­ences per­son­ally heavy wound, he is de­pressed. 叶雨霖的脸色,也并不比徐天然好看多少,徐天然是身受重创,他则是郁闷的。 When that large ex­plo­sion erupts, Ye Yulin in air­borne, he was al­most sim­i­lar to the stray cur turned around to fall at that time gen­er­ally, even if this, was cer­tainly af­fected, has de­stroyed the trea­sures of two guard, this can is well. 当那场大爆炸爆发的时候,叶雨霖正在空中,他当时几乎如同丧家之犬一般掉头落下,就算这样,还是受到了一定波及,毁了两件护身之宝,这才能够平安无事。 Air­borne en­ergy storm makes him not have the means to trace the enemy trail. He saw be­fore falling that the dis­tor­tion ray in dis­tant place that piece of light bar­rier is chang­ing pale, some in­side as if many Soul Guid­ance De­vice ap­pear, does not have any­body's trail. 空中的能量风暴让他根本就没办法去追踪敌人踪迹。他只是在落下之前看到,远处那片光罩中的扭曲光芒在变淡,里面似乎有不少魂导器出现,却没有任何人的踪迹。 „Old Ye, who is, in­ves­ti­gated thor­oughly?” Xu Tian­ran has not lost one's tem­per at this time, main­tains very calm, even be usu­ally calmer. “叶老,是什么人,查清楚了么？”徐天然此时并没有动怒,保持的十分冷静,甚至要比平常更加冷静。 The anger bursts one­self, his pre­sent phys­i­cal con­di­tion was not very good, in this cru­cial time, he is calm, oth­er­wise did not match to be called one gen­er­a­tion of fierce and am­bi­tiouses. 怒伤身,他现在的身体状况已经十分不好了,越是在这种关键的时刻,他就越是冷静,否则也不配称为一代枭雄了。 Ye Yulin sink­ing sound track: „Enemy strength is very strong, should from be­long­ing to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries, they have more than one Soul En­gi­neer Corp.” 叶雨霖沉声道:“敌人实力很强,应该是来自于原属斗罗大陆三国,他们拥有不止一支魂导师团。” Hears these words, the sur­round­ings peo­ple hold breath cold air. 听到这句话,周围众人都是不禁倒吸一口凉气。 More than one Soul En­gi­neer Corp, what does this mean? 不止一支魂导师团,这意味着什么？ If this at­tack is 12 draws sup­port from for­mi­da­ble Soul Guid­ance De­vice to cre­ate per­son­ally, this can also un­der­stand. Be­cause the Sun-Moon Em­pire upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice block­ade abil­ity is strong, al­ways has the fish slip through, but, if were en­tire Soul En­gi­neer Corp touches around Bright Cap­i­tal City not to be dis­cov­ered that this issue may be big. More­over is more than one Soul En­gi­neer Corp! 如果说这次袭击是12个人借助强大魂导器造成的,这还能够理解。因为就算日月帝国的高空探测魂导器封锁能力再强,也总有漏网之鱼,可是,如果是整个魂导师团都摸到了明都周围还没被发现,这个问题可就大了。而且还是不止一支魂导师团啊！ Ye Yulin sink­ing sound track: „Your majesty, I have sent for going to that side to con­tinue to ex­am­ine, please tem­porar­ily do not at­tack. These en­e­mies should re­treat, but also has left some traces.” 叶雨霖沉声道:“陛下,我已经派人去那边继续查看了,请暂时不要攻击。那些敌人应该已经退走,还留下了一些痕迹。” Xu Tian­ran looks at Ye Yulin, said: „Old Ye, said in de­tail that these en­e­mies are any sit­u­a­tions.” 徐天然看着叶雨霖,道:“叶老,详细说说,这些敌人是什么情况。” ------------------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- 11! The big erup­tion starts! Um, our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour also has the mas­sive good ac­tiv­i­ties to send out, every­body do not for­get the at­ten­tion.( To be con­tin­ued. If you like this work, wel­come you to cast the rec­om­men­da­tion ticket and monthly ticket, your sup­port, is I biggest power.) 11了！大爆发开始！嗯,我们冰火魔厨手游也有大量的好活动送出哦,大家别忘了关注。(未完待续。如果您喜欢这部作品,欢迎您来投推荐票、月票,您的支持,就是我最大的动力。)

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #553 Attack from Shrek?


Ye Yulin eyes nar­rows the eyes, said: „The ori­gins of these en­e­mies are with­out a doubt, surely from be­long­ing to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries. I first rush to that side, what sees is Soul Guid­ance Pro­tec­tive Cover, in other words, these peo­ple have es­tab­lished Soul Guid­ance Array place out­side the Bright Cap­i­tal City city, is used as the pro­tec­tion. But some time fishy that this Soul Guid­ance Array es­tab­lishes, as if hap­pen to pre­sented that time of chain ex­plo­sion in our upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice, if all were cal­cu­late, that was too fear­ful. In other words, these that upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice ex­plodes, is these peo­ple cre­ates.” 叶雨霖双眼微眯,道:“这些敌人的来历毋庸置疑,必定是来自于原属斗罗大陆三国。我第一时间赶到那边,看到的是一个魂导护罩,也就是说,那些人在明都城外建立了一个魂导阵地,用来作为防护。而这个魂导阵地建立的时间有些蹊跷,似乎正好是在我们高空探测魂导器出现连环爆炸的那段时间,如果一切都是计算好的,那就太可怕了。也就是说,高空探测魂导器爆炸的那些,也都是这些人造成的。” Xu Tian­ran takes a deep breath, sup­presses in one­self heart force­fully the anger, „who can tell me, sit­u­a­tion why our upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice will have the chain ex­plo­sion? If the enemy does, then, how they do let our upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice ex­plo­sion?” 徐天然深吸口气,强行压制住自己心中怒火,“谁能告诉我,为什么我们的高空探测魂导器会发生连环爆炸的情况？如果是敌人做的,那么,他们是怎么神不知鬼不觉的让我们高空探测魂导器爆炸的？” An­other Wor­ship Hall con­se­crates say­ing: „Ac­cord­ing to the ob­ser­va­tion and judg­ment of feu­dal of­fi­cial, our upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice very likely from ex­plod­ing. If there is an enemy to launch the at­tack to carry out at­tack, we will im­me­di­ately cer­tainly dis­cover that si­mul­ta­ne­ously will in­ter­cept by the Soul Guid­ance Array that side, is what kind, also al­most all upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice will not be an­ni­hi­lated.” 另一位供奉堂供奉道:“根据臣的观察和判断,我们的高空探测魂导器很像是自爆的。因为如果有敌人发动攻击进行打击的话,我们一定会在第一时间发现,同时会以魂导阵地那边进行拦截,再怎样,也不会几乎所有高空探测魂导器全军覆没。” „From ex­plod­ing?” The eye of Xu Tian­ran stared in­stan­ta­neously, the chest trans­mits an in­ter­mit­tent se­vere pain, mak­ing him have to the sec­ond rolling trig own anger again. “自爆？”徐天然的眼睛瞬间瞪了起来,紧接着,胸口传来一阵阵剧痛,令他不得不再次压制住自己的怒火。 That con­se­crates the forced smile say­ing: „From then sit­u­a­tion, looked like from very much ex­plod­ing. If from ex­plod­ing, then also has an­other pos­si­bil­ity. That was our upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice is in­stalled de­mol­ishes the in­stall­ment surely. Only then so, can make them ex­plode under con­trol con­tin­u­ally. In other words. These en­e­mies very prob­a­bly had one type to con­ceal our Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice, touched car­ries on the abil­ity that the tim­ing bomb in­stalled to our Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice by.” 那位供奉苦笑道:“从当时的情况来看,很像自爆。如果不是自爆的话,那么就还有另外一种可能。那就是我们的高空探测魂导器被人安装了定是爆破装置。只有如此,才能够在控制下让它们持续爆炸。也就是说。这些敌人很可能拥有了一种能够隐瞒过我们各种探测魂导器,摸到我们探测魂导器旁边进行定时炸弹安装的能力。” Peace­ful, such re­marks, the sur­round­ings im­me­di­ately are sim­i­lar to deathly still­ness gen­eral calm­ing down. 安静,此言一出,周围立刻如同死寂一般的静了下来。 This analy­sis was re­ally too as­ton­ish­ing, if the in­vad­ing enemy can touch­ing ar­rive by upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice, that said that he can also touch into the im­pe­r­ial palace? Wants why to do what? 这个分析实在是太惊人了,如果来犯之敌能够神不知鬼不觉的摸到高空探测魂导器旁边,那是不是说,他也就能够摸入皇宫之中呢？岂不是想干什么就能干什么？ This time nine lev­els in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to break through the de­fense to ex­plode surely, if the enemy did in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball im­me­di­ate pack­ing one nine lev­els surely in the im­pe­r­ial palace? This sit­u­a­tion is un­able to imag­ine sim­ply. 这次的九级定装魂导炮弹是突破了防御才爆炸的,如果敌人将一个九级定装魂导炮弹直接安装在皇宫内部呢？这种情况简直是无法想象。 Ye Yulin nod­ded, said: „Old Shen said is rea­son­able. The feu­dal of­fi­cials also think very strangely. Enemy that Soul Guid­ance Array , the ray twists, does not have the means to see clearly by my eye­sight and Spir­i­tual Power is ac­tu­ally any sit­u­a­tion. We were three peo­ple went to­gether at that time, in the enemy also pre­sented 78 peo­ple to cope with us. The strengths of these peo­ple are very strong, at least is also cul­ti­vat­ing of Soul Douluo rank is, their ac­tu­ally ma­jor­ity are not Soul En­gi­neer. But is Soul Mas­ter. Each Mar­tial Soul is very for­mi­da­ble, par­tic­u­larly is one per­son, the body puts on, prob­a­bly is also Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice, above is send­ing out the ex­tremely in­tense cold air. They co­or­di­nate ex­tremely tac­itly, and sur­rep­ti­tious......” 叶雨霖点了点头,道:“老沈说的有道理。臣也觉得十分奇怪。敌人那个魂导阵地之中,光线扭曲,以我的眼力和精神力都没办法看清楚其中究竟是什么情况。我们当时是三人同往,敌人之中也出现了78个人来对付我们。这些人的实力都很强,至少也是魂斗罗级别的修为,他们却大多数都不是魂导师。而是魂师。每一个武魂都十分强大,尤其是为首一人,身上穿的,好像也是人形魂导器,上面散发着极其强烈的寒气。他们配合极为默契,而且诡秘……” At that mo­ment. When Ye Yulin fight nar­rated fac­ing Huo Yuhao and the oth­ers him in de­tail. Lis­tened to his de­scrip­tion, made most Sun-Moon Em­pire high lev­els feel con­fus­ingly. Such match. It is not gen­eral for­mi­dabe! 当下。叶雨霖将他面对霍雨浩等人时的战斗情况详细地讲述了一遍。听了他的描述,更让绝大多数日月帝国高层们感到扑朔迷离了。这样的对手。可不是一般的难对付啊！ „......, From then sit­u­a­tion, if makes me judge, I think that these en­e­mies should grasp one type has been sim­i­lar to stealth Soul Guid­ance De­vice and so on thing, can there­fore make so nu­mer­ous Soul En­gi­neer un­con­scious touch­ing ac­tu­ally not be dis­cov­ered to Bright Cap­i­tal City nearby. And some pow­er­houses even can shield the most Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice sur­vey strength. Mean­while, they have very strong Soul Guid­ance De­vice at­tack ca­pa­bil­ity. Be­fore at least 2000 in­ter­me­di­ate surely in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to sup­press our Soul Guid­ance Array place. Per­haps such strength, wants that to be­long to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries col­lab­o­rates to take. Per­haps this is they fi­nally copes with our cards in a hand.” “……,从当时的情况来看,如果让我来判断,我认为这些敌人应该是掌握了一种类似于隐身魂导器之类的东西,所以才能让如此众多魂导师不知不觉的摸到明都附近却没有被发现。其中一些强者甚至可以屏蔽我们大多数探测魂导器的探测力。同时,他们还具备很强的魂导器攻击能力。之前至少有2000枚中级定装魂导炮弹压制了我们的魂导阵地。这样的实力,恐怕要那原属斗罗大陆三国联手才拿得出来。这或许就是他们最后对付我们的底牌。” „In frontal bat­tle­field. They are not the War-God Em­press matches, has found out the means of this re­mov­ing fire­wood from under the pot. While our coun­try be­hind void. Launches the at­tack. The old min­is­ter is not clear, why they can the thou­sand li(500 km), in the south, ar­rive around Bright Cap­i­tal City in a flash sud­denly sud­denly. Even if they all com­prised of Soul En­gi­neer, is im­pos­si­ble to equip over eight lev­els Flight Soul Guid­ance De­vice.” “正面战场上。他们不是帝后战神的对手,就想出了这种釜底抽薪的办法。趁着我国后方空虚。发起进攻。只是,老臣也不明白,为什么他们能够转瞬千里,忽而在南方,忽而又到了明都附近。就算是他们全都由魂导师组成,也不可能全都装备八级以上的飞行魂导器。” Xu Tian­ran brow tight wrin­kle, being lost in thought. This sit­u­a­tion is is truly un­read­able. Every­one is al­most con­fused. Be­cause of until now, them has not seen clearly the true sit­u­a­tion of enemy. 徐天然眉头紧皱,也陷入了沉思之中。这种情况确实是十分难以理解。每个人几乎都是一头雾水。因为直到现在,他们都没有看清楚敌人的真正情况。 Is the un­known enemy is fear­ful, this point every­one un­der­stands. 越是未知的敌人就越是可怕,这一点谁都明白。 „Your majesty!” In this time, re­mained silent Ye Xishui has been open­ing the mouth sud­denly. “陛下！”正在这时,一直保持着沉默的叶夕水突然开口了。 „Um?” Xu Tian­ran changes Ye Xishui, on the face look im­me­di­ately be­comes re­spect­ful, but Ye Xishui Limit Douluo, dis­cussed only cul­ti­vates per­son­ally is, she in Sun-Moon Em­pire ab­solutely was topest ex­is­tence, let alone she was also con­trol­ling Grim Reaper Soul Guid­ance De­vice. “嗯？”徐天然转向叶夕水,脸上神色顿时变得恭敬起来,叶夕水可是极限斗罗,单论个人修为,她在日月帝国绝对是最顶尖的存在,更何况她还掌控着死神魂导器。 „You said.” Xu Tian­ran has not called Ye Xishui di­rectly, be­cause be­tween he and Ye Xishui, has the re­la­tions of deeper level in pri­vate, but every­one knows that Ye Xishui is Holy Spirit Cult truly con­trol, there­fore, is being nu­mer­ous min­is­ters, he nat­u­rally can­not call. “您说。”徐天然没有直接称呼叶夕水,因为他和叶夕水之间,私下还有更深层次的关系在,但谁都知道叶夕水是圣灵教真正的掌控者,所以,当着众多大臣,他自然不能叫出来。 Ye Xishui said: „Can have this strength, not nec­es­sar­ily is be­longs to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries, your majesty has for­got­ten, a place , has prob­a­bly such strength.” 叶夕水道:“能够拥有这种力量的,未必是原属斗罗大陆三国,陛下忘了,还有一个地方,也可能拥有这样的实力。” In the Xu Tian­ran heart moves, com­plex­ion in­stan­ta­neously changed, „what you said that Shrek Acad­emy?” 徐天然心中一动,脸色瞬间变了,“您说的是,史莱克学院？” Ye Xishui nods the head slightly, „good, is Shrek Acad­emy. Your majesty thinks, that side main bat­tle­field, Sky Soul Em­pire de­struc­tion, but Shrek Acad­emy gets rid, may also res­cue some Sky Soul Em­pire fi­nally rem­nants in the frontal bat­tle­field, does not have what achieve­ments. back­ground that this and Shrek Acad­emy for ten thou­sand years saves has to be in­com­pat­i­ble. It is not their true strength man­i­fests. No doubt is be­cause Shrek Acad­emy will pos­si­bly re­tain, but sim­i­larly, why Shrek Acad­emy pos­si­bly is not be­cause true main force not in rea­son?” 叶夕水微微颔首,“不错,正是史莱克学院。陛下想想,在主战场那边,天魂帝国覆灭,而史莱克学院虽然出手,可在正面战场上也只是救走了天魂帝国最后一些余孽而已,却并没有什么建树。这和史莱克学院万年来积蓄的底蕴有所不符。并不是他们真正实力体现。固然是因为史莱克学院可能会有所保留,但同样的,史莱克学院为什么不可能是因为真正主力不在的原因呢？” „Ac­cord­ing to our news, Shrek City has been ex­pand­ing for these years, more­over re­lates closely with Star Dou For­est Soul Beast. That named Huo Yuhao boy, after found­ing Spirit Trans­fer­ring Pagoda, lets re­la­tions be­tween their Shrek Acad­emy and Star Dou For­est is no longer hos­tile. But sev­eral years ago, Star Lou Em­pire re­cap­tures Bright Strug­gle Moun­tain Range that to fight, Huo Yuhao showed has been sim­i­lar to the stealth abil­ity. At that time, he touched my mind bar­rier to be dis­cov­ered. He even can bor­row the Beast God Di Tian strength to come with me to re­sist. This child af­ter­ward also had ap­peared that side the main bat­tle­field, causes the losses of our many upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice. From this time sit­u­a­tion, likely is he gets rid. New-style Soul Guid­ance De­vice that if Shrek Acad­emy stud­ies comes com­man­der by him, I do not re­turn to feel odd.” “根据我们的消息,史莱克城这几年一直在扩建,而且和星斗大森林的魂兽关系密切。那个名叫霍雨浩的小子,创建了传灵塔之后,就让他们史莱克学院和星斗大森林之间的关系不再敌对。而在几年前,星罗帝国重新夺回明斗山脉那一战中,霍雨浩就曾经展现过类似于隐身的能力。那时候,他是触及了我的精神屏障才被发现。他甚至可以借用兽神帝天的力量来和我对抗。此子后来在主战场那边也曾经出现过,造成我们不少高空探测魂导器的损失。从这次的情况来看,很可能又是他出手的。如果说史莱克学院研究出的新式魂导器由他来统帅,我一点都不回感到奇怪。” Lis­tened to a Ye Xishui say­ing, Xu Tian­ran also to think, but he as be­fore was the brow tight wrin­kle, „this re­ally pos­si­ble? He how old? Ini­tially, he rep­re­sented Tang Sect came Bright Cap­i­tal City to par­tic­i­pate in Great Con­ti­nen­tal Soul Mas­ter Acad­emy Fight­ing Spirit Com­pe­ti­tion the time. Less than 20 years old, al­though passed for sev­eral years, is twenty years old.” 听叶夕水这么一说,徐天然也想起来了,不过他依旧是眉头紧皱,“这真的可能么？他才多大年纪？当初,他代表唐门来明都参加全大陆高级魂师学院斗魂大赛的时候。才不到20岁吧,虽然已经过去了几年,也不过就是二十几岁而已。” Re­gard­ing Huo Yuhao, the Xu Tian­ran im­pres­sion is very deep, be­cause not only Huo Yuhao own strength is very strong, is be­cause. Ini­tially Huo Yuhao also sits the wheel­chair to ap­pear. This point makes his im­pres­sion pro­found. 对于霍雨浩,徐天然印象还是很深的,不只是因为霍雨浩自身实力很强,同时也是因为。当初霍雨浩也是坐着轮椅出现的。这一点让他印象深刻。 Ye Xishui coldly snorted, „any­thing is im­pos­si­ble. He is Dragon God Douluo Mu En final dis­ci­ple, is in it­self Twin Mar­tial Souls. Ye Yulin said match who a mo­ment ago he faced wore Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice, si­mul­ta­ne­ously the body sent out the in­tense cold air, I looked, likely was this boy. He has Ab­solute Ice Mar­tial Soul.” 叶夕水冷哼一声,“没什么不可能的。他乃是龙神斗罗穆恩的关门弟子,本身又是双生武魂。刚才叶雨霖说他面对的对手身穿人形魂导器,同时身上散发出强烈寒气,我看,很可能就是这小子。他拥有极致之冰武魂。” Xu Tian­ran some­what is as be­fore un­be­liev­able. Said: „But, Old Ye said. The strength of that per­son ar­rived at the Ti­tled Douluo stan­dard ab­solutely. If not de­pend upon enough for­mi­da­ble Soul Guid­ance De­vice, he can de­feat the op­po­site party not nec­es­sar­ily.” 徐天然依旧有些难以置信。道:“可是,叶老说。那个人的实力绝对到了封号斗罗水准。如果不依靠足够强大的魂导器,他都不见得能够战胜对方。” Ye Xishui sighed, said: „Your majesty, can­not be hood­winked by rep­re­sen­ta­tion. More­over, on this world, has the tal­ent to exist even­tu­ally. By the cur­rent sit­u­a­tion, can threaten our coun­try truly. No longer is be­longs to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries, or is both coun­tries. But is that Shrek Acad­emy. Sees ac­cord­ing to the old body, your majesty only needs to order to give War-God Em­press, how­ever her storm Shrek City, de­stroys Shrek City, the in­sti­ga­tor of Bright Cap­i­tal City this mat­ter also will col­lapse then of it­self. To that time, re­gard­less of they are fight­ing with any way, def­i­nitely will turn back in order to help friendly forces Shrek City, in the frontal bat­tle­field, they are im­pos­si­ble to have any achieve­ment.” 叶夕水叹息一声,道:“陛下,不可被表象所蒙蔽。而且,在这个世界上,终究还是有天才存在的。以目前的局势来看,真正能够威胁到我国的。已经不再是原属斗罗大陆三国,或者说是两国。而是那史莱克学院。依老身见,陛下只需要下令给帝后战神,然她强攻史莱克城,将史莱克城一举歼灭,那么,明都这次事情的始作俑者也会不攻自破。到了那时候,无论他们是用什么方式在战斗,都必然会回援史莱克城,正面战场上,他们根本不可能有什么作为。” „May not.” The prime min­is­ter has stood, sink­ing sound track: „Old min­is­ter be­lieves that now is also not and Shrek Acad­emy of­fi­cial re­sis­tance time. Asked your majesty three to think.” “不可。”首相站了出来,沉声道:“老臣认为,现在还不是和史莱克学院正式对抗的时候。请陛下三思。” „Prime min­is­ter please say.” Xu Tian­ran sig­nals by nod­ding to him, hints him to say own idea. Al­though the tac­tic of this prime min­is­ter had the prob­lem. May also be be­cause this time match is ex­tremely strange. That is not the way things should be can judge. Xu Tian­ran after calm­ing down, mood changed for the bet­ter sev­eral points. To this bril­liant prime min­is­ter, he is re­ally to have a high opin­ion. But he is be­tween clear Ye Xishui and Shrek Acad­emy these grat­i­tude and grudges, there­fore thinks un­avoid­ably the idea of Ye Xishui has the self­ish in­gre­di­ent in in­side. “首相请说。”徐天然向他点头示意,示意他将自己的想法说出来。虽然这次首相的战术出现了问题。可也是因为这次的对手太过奇怪。那已经不是人之常情所能判断的。徐天然在冷静下来之后,心情已经好转了几分。对这位睿智的首相,他还是甚为倚重的。而他更是清楚叶夕水和史莱克学院之间那些恩怨,所以难免会认为叶夕水的想法有自私的成份在里面。 Prime min­is­ter sink­ing sound track: „Just the re­mote an­tiq­uity con­se­crated also said that Shrek Acad­emy has ten thou­sand years of back­ground, ten thou­sand years ago, they are Con­ti­nent's First Acad­emy. In that Shrek City, ac­tu­ally to hide the how for­mi­da­ble strength, at pre­sent we are un­able to judge. From re­cent Shrek City that side war, came from Star Dou For­est beast tide. In­habit re­gion of Star Dou For­est on strongest Soul Beast as Con­ti­nent, Ten Great Fe­ro­cious Beasts has five, has Beast God Di Tian com­man­der. Of over­all strength, ab­solutely is ex­tremely ter­ri­fy­ing. May be this, under their at­tack, Shrek City as be­fore is whole-heart­edly as sta­ble as the rock of Gibral­tar, ac­cord­ing to our news, that side Shrek City even used some spe­cial strengths to make Beast God Di Tian di­rectly not ap­pear in the bat­tle­field from be­gin­ning to end.” 首相沉声道:“刚刚太上供奉也说了,史莱克学院有万年底蕴,万年前,他们就已经是大陆第一学院了。在那史莱克城之中,究竟隐藏了多么强大的力量,目前我们根本无法判断。距离最近一次史莱克城那边的战争,就是来自于星斗大森林的兽潮。星斗大森林作为大陆上最强魂兽的聚居地,十大凶兽有其中之五,更有兽神帝天统帅。整体实力之强,绝对是极为恐怖的。可就算是这样,在他们全力以赴的攻击下,史莱克城依旧稳如泰山,根据我们的消息,史莱克城那边甚至用了一些特殊的力量让兽神帝天从始至终都没有直接出现在战场上。” „Re­mote an­tiq­uity con­se­crated also said a mo­ment ago that Huo Yuhao can reply on the Beast God strength. What does this mean? Once we change to Shrek City the main at­tack di­rec­tion, might bring in col­lab­o­ra­tion of Shrek City and Star Dou For­est very much. To that time, was not good, will bring the ru­inous dis­as­ter to our armies.” “太上供奉刚才又说,那个霍雨浩能够借助兽神的力量。这又意味着什么？一旦我们将主攻方向改为史莱克城,那么,很有可能就会引来史莱克城与星斗大森林的联手。到了那时候,一个不好,就会给我们大军带来毁灭性的灾难。” „Old min­is­ter be­lieves that Shrek Acad­emy after all on Con­ti­nent is quite neu­tral, al­though it be­cause of the re­gion rea­son, will favor be­long­ing to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries, more­over once for them and I for enemy. But this sit­u­a­tion is dif­fer­ent. Sky Soul Em­pire was ex­tin­guished, if we can rout again Dou Ling Em­pire and Star Lou Em­pire. Then, Shrek City does not want , can only choose the com­pro­mise. But the premise is, we do not shake the Shrek City basis. At least judg­ing from the pre­sent sit­u­a­tion, we can­not be the main bat­tle­field Shrek City. Oth­er­wise, Star Lou Em­pire and Dou Ling Em­pire, can be cen­tered on Shrek City, re­sists our coun­try army to­gether, if adds on the Star Luo big for­est again Soul Beast, then, is hard to imag­ine fi­nally.” “老臣认为,史莱克学院毕竟在大陆上是较为中立的,虽然它因为地域缘故,会倾向于原属斗罗大陆三国,而且曾经为了他们与我为敌。但这次情况不同。天魂帝国已经被灭,如果我们再能将斗灵帝国和星罗帝国击溃。那么,史莱克城就算再不愿意,也只能选择妥协。而前提就是,我们不去动摇史莱克城的根本。至少从目前情况来看,我们不能将史莱克城作为主战场。否则的话,星罗帝国、斗灵帝国,就能够以史莱克城为核心,共同对抗我国大军,如果再加上星罗大森林的魂兽,那么,结果难以想象。” „fart­ing!” Ye Xishui drinks one coldly, „you are not un­der­stand­ing. Can Star Dou For­est col­lab­o­rate with Shrek City? You sim­ply are dream of a fool. Spirit Trans­fer­ring Pagoda that al­though Huo Yuhao or­ga­nized has re­laxed the re­la­tions be­tween two, but, do not for­get that the con­tra­dic­tory num­ber be­tween human and Soul Beast by ten thou­sand years, Soul Beast will send out to help hu­man­ity mas­sively? Sim­ply laugh­able. They looked for­ward to hu­man­ity to kill one an­other, die were good. Such will not have hu­man­ity to need Soul Ring. Your this analy­sis, sim­ply is in­com­pre­hen­si­ble non­sense.” “放屁！”叶夕水冷喝一声,“你懂个屁。星斗大森林会和史莱克城联手？你简直就是痴人说梦。虽然霍雨浩创办的传灵塔缓和了二者之间的关系,但是,你们不要忘记,人类和魂兽之间的矛盾数以万年,魂兽会大量出动来帮助人类？简直可笑。它们巴不得人类自相残杀,死光了才好。那样就不会有人类需要魂环了。你这分析,简直是狗屁不通。” Prime min­is­ter cold [say / way]: „Old man con­sid­ers for the coun­try com­pletely, ask­ing the re­mote an­tiq­uity to con­se­crate to pay at­ten­tion to your words. Shrek Acad­emy re­gard­ing be­long­ing to Soul Mas­ter of Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries', is sa­cred place. More­over, re­gard­ing some hid­den world clan/sect is also so, they re­late closely, main­tains sev­eral thou­sand years. Once we aim at Shrek Acad­emy, quite there­fore makes en­tire be­long to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries as well as three bor­der all clan/sect in all unites copes with us. Is this fa­vor­able for the coun­try re­ally?” 首相冷然道:“老夫完全是为了国家着想,请太上供奉注意你的言辞。史莱克学院对于原属斗罗大陆三国的魂师来说,乃是圣地。而且,对于一些隐世宗门来说也是如此,他们关系密切,保持数千年之久。一旦我们针对史莱克学院,就相当于是让整个原属斗罗大陆三国以及三国境内的所有宗门全都团结在一起对付我们。这真的对国家有利吗？” Lis­tened to the words of prime min­is­ter, Xu Tian­ran to nod, the prime min­is­ter said right, sig­nif­i­cance of Shrek Acad­emy on en­tire Con­ti­nent was ex­tra­or­di­nary. Ini­tially, Shrek Acad­emy called from a high place, unites mas­sive Soul Mas­ter to co­or­di­nate to be­long to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries de­feats Sun-Moon Em­pire sev­eral thou­sand years ago, thus in­te­grated in Sun-Moon Em­pire as well as Sun-Moon Con­ti­nent the Douluo Con­ti­nent do­main. 听了首相的话,徐天然不禁点了点头,首相说的没错,史莱克学院在整个大陆上的意义非凡。当初,史莱克学院登高一呼,联合大量的魂师配合原属斗罗大陆三国在几千年前击败日月帝国,从而将日月帝国以及日月大陆都纳入到了斗罗大陆的版图之中。 But this time, Sun-Moon Em­pire started, in a short time has seized swiftly and vi­o­lently and Sky Soul Em­pire sud­denly. But be­longs to Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries' Soul Guid­ance De­vice strength judg­ment to the Sun-Moon Em­pire is in­suf­fi­cient, has caused the im­por­tant rea­son of this dis­as­ter. 而这一次,日月帝国发动迅猛、突然,在很短时间内就占领了天魂帝国。而原属斗罗大陆三国对日月帝国的魂导器实力判断不足,也是导致了这次战争失败的重要原因。 Shrek Acad­emy en­tered the war now, but this Sun-Moon Em­pire as­pect is ac­tu­ally big­ger in the Soul Guid­ance Tech­nol­ogy su­pe­ri­or­ity. Cur­rently speak­ing, Shrek Acad­emy at least com­pletely has not in­vested into the war. 史莱克学院现在已经参战了,而这次日月帝国方面在魂导科技的优势其实更大。目前来看,史莱克学院至少还没有完全投入到战争之中。 -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------- Guar­an­tees a min­i­mum sec­ond, di­rectly is 4000 char­ac­ters, sin­cere. Also waits for any­thing, quickly votes. When next again 400 tick­ets, in fact only needs 200 tick­ets.( To be con­tin­ued. If you like this work, wel­come you to cast the rec­om­men­da­tion ticket and monthly ticket, your sup­port, is I biggest power.) 保底第二更,直接就是4000字的,厚道吧。还等什么,赶快投票吧。下一更再400票时,实际上只需要200票哦。(未完待续。如果您喜欢这部作品,欢迎您来投推荐票、月票,您的支持,就是我最大的动力。)

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #554 Confucius and Laozi


Ye Xishui said: „Shrek Acad­emy will enter the war sooner or later, sooner or later will have what dif­fer­ence? More­over this time mat­ter, clearly has the close re­la­tion with Shrek Acad­emy. At­tacks Shrek Acad­emy, is sim­plest di­rect ef­fec­tive. Also wants to ne­glect fun­da­men­tals and con­cen­trate on de­tails? Do you have the good means?” 叶夕水道:“史莱克学院早晚都会参战,早晚有何区别？而且这次的事情,分明就和史莱克学院有密切联系。攻击史莱克学院,是最简单直接有效的。难道还要舍本逐末？你有好办法？” Prime min­is­ter sink­ing sound track: „Feu­dal of­fi­cial thinks that at pre­sent we have seized Sky Soul Em­pire through­out, at this time, con­sol­i­dated very im­por­tant. Can ask War-God Em­press to lead some pow­er­houses to turn back in order to help friendly forces tem­porar­ily, first solves , then con­tin­ues to start the war, in the mean­time, we can also draw sup­port from these days, con­sol­i­dates in the rule of Sky Soul Em­pire, si­mul­ta­ne­ously draws sup­port from the wealth that Sky Soul Em­pire brings, strength­ens the re­search and man­u­fac­ture of Soul Guid­ance De­vice. For on, your majesty, rear area sta­bi­lizes safely very im­por­tantly! Does not have War-God Em­press to pro­tect, feu­dal of­fi­cial some do not feel re­lieved your safety.” 首相沉声道:“臣以为,目前我们已经占领了天魂帝国全境,在这个时候,巩固十分重要。可以请帝后战神暂时率领部分强者回援,先解决内部,然后再继续发起战争,同时,我们也可以借助这段时间,巩固在天魂帝国的统治,同时借助天魂帝国带来的财富,加强魂导器的研究与制作。稳妥为上,陛下,后方稳定十分重要啊！没有帝后战神守护,臣有些不放心您的安危。” The Xu Tian­ran com­plex­ion slightly changes, „I have not needed the woman to pro­tect. Has Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp to turn back in order to help friendly forces fully. How­ever, as soon as pos­si­ble ac­tu­ally must in­ves­ti­gate thor­oughly these to pen­e­trate our coun­try en­e­mies where. Which love min­is­ter has the good means?” 徐天然脸色微微一变,“朕还不需要女人来保护。有日月皇家魂导师团回援足矣。不过,必须要尽快查清楚这些深入我国内部的敌人究竟在什么地方。哪位爱卿有好办法？” His vi­sion has swept from nu­mer­ous Sun-Moon Em­pire high lev­els face, dur­ing most peo­ple are lost in thought. 他的目光从众多日月帝国高层们脸上扫过,大多数人都陷入沉思之中。 Ye Xishui cold sound track: „Your majesty, the opin­ion of old body does not have any pri­vate grudges in­gre­di­ent def­i­nitely. That Huo Yuhao one­self car­ries on the stealth by Spir­i­tual Power. If he cul­ti­vated the Ti­tled Douluo level in the sev­eral years, then, was Ti­tled Douluo of Ab­solute Mar­tial Soul owner, in the fu­ture surely is the na­tional big trou­ble. Must in erad­i­cate him most in a short time is good. Has not stud­ied stealth Soul Guid­ance De­vice in­clud­ing us at pre­sent, Shrek Acad­emy is im­pos­si­ble. In my opin­ion, that sneaks our coun­try Soul En­gi­neer Corp, likely de­pends upon being sim­i­lar that Huo Yuhao had in the com­mu­nity stealth abil­ity. At­tacks Shrek Acad­emy, at least must di­rects to cope Huo Yuhao and his Soul En­gi­neer Corp, is the best means.” 叶夕水冷声道:“陛下,老身的意见决没有任何私怨成份在内。那霍雨浩自身是凭借精神力进行隐身的。如果他真的在短短几年时间内修炼到了封号斗罗层次,那么,身为极致武魂拥有者的封号斗罗,未来必定是国家大患。必须要在最短时间内将他铲除才行。连我们目前都没有研究出隐身魂导器,史莱克学院也决不可能。依我看,那潜入我国内部的魂导师团,很可能就是依靠了霍雨浩拥有的类似于群体隐身的能力。攻击史莱克学院,至少要将霍雨浩和他的魂导师团引回去对付,才是最好的办法。” „If your majesty wants to unify Con­ti­nent. Then, sooner or later must cope with Shrek Acad­emy. The we and Shrek Acad­emy con­tra­dic­tions be­tween are ir­rec­on­cil­able. Def­i­nitely will have out­come. Also can raise the tiger to cre­ate dis­as­ter in­ad­e­quately? So long as War-God Em­press by Myr­iad Great Thun­der cer­tainly that Shrek City thor­ough de­struc­tion, then, Con­ti­nent Soul Mas­ter in­evitably be­comes loose sands. Be­lieves by the War-God Em­press mil­i­tary wis­dom. Cer­tainly will have the means to achieve this point. So long as your majesty agreed. The old body is will­ing to lead per­son­ally to pro­tect coun­try Saint to teach to go, co­or­di­nat­ing War-God Em­press to move.” “如果陛下想要统一大陆。那么,迟早都要对付史莱克学院。我们和史莱克学院之间的矛盾是不可调和的。必然会有个胜负。难道还要养虎为患不成？只要帝后战神以雷霆万钧之势将那史莱克城彻底毁灭,那么,大陆魂师界必然变得一片散沙。相信以帝后战神的军事智慧。一定会有办法做到这一点。只要陛下同意。老身愿意亲率护国圣教前往,配合帝后战神行动。” „Your majesty may not.” The prime min­is­ter called out hur­riedly: „Your majesty. As the mat­ter stands, again did not have the lee­way of swivel. Once is not suc­cess­ful, we all ef­forts will pos­si­bly put to the run­ning water be­fore! Asked your majesty three to think. At pre­sent ex­cel­lent sit­u­a­tion, when is pri­mar­ily steadily.” “陛下不可。”首相急忙叫道:“陛下。这样一来,就再也没有转圜的余地了。一旦不成功,我们之前所有的努力很可能都会付诸流水啊！请陛下三思。目前大好形势,当以稳为主。” Ye Xishui got angry fi­nally. The ice-cold chill in the air jumps to shoot from her dou­ble pupil sud­denly, the sur­round­ings tem­per­a­ture drops, the ter­ri­fy­ing op­pres­sion strength is al­most erupts from her in­stan­ta­neously. 叶夕水终于怒了。冰冷的寒意骤然从她双眸之中迸射而出,周围气温陡降,恐怖的压迫力几乎是瞬间从她身上爆发而出。 A god of death anger, world dis­col­oration. All peo­ple felt that ter­ri­fy­ing pres­sure comes, as if must rip frag­ment their bod­ies. 死神一怒,天地色变。所有人都感觉到恐怖压力骤然而至,仿佛要将他们的身体撕成碎片似的。 But at this mo­ment, has also stood in Xu Tian­ran Old Kong goes for­ward one step, on him has the green ray twin­kle faintly. A gen­tle strength blooms out­ward, has cov­ered to­ward the body of Ye Xishui un­ex­pect­edly. Col­lides with the for­mi­da­ble power and in­flu­ence on Ye Xishui burst­ing out sud­denly to­gether. 但也就在这时,一直站在徐天然身边的孔老上前一步,他身上隐隐有青色光芒闪烁。一股柔和的力量向外绽放,竟是朝着叶夕水的身体笼罩了过去。与叶夕水身上迸发出的强大威势骤然碰撞在一起。 Ye Xishui coldly snorted, Old Kong was upper body slightly rocked, al­though slightly oc­cu­pied lee­ward. But has not eaten any­thing to owe. 叶夕水冷哼一声,孔老则是上身略微晃动了一下,虽然是略占下风。但也没有吃什么亏。 Old Kong light looks at Ye Xishui, turned side Xu Tian­ran by the ad­vance party first to this Grim Reaper Douluo. 孔老淡淡的看着叶夕水,已经由先前站在徐天然身边变成了面向这位死神斗罗。 Two big pow­er­houses each other con­front, is the slight­est does not let. 两大强者彼此对峙,都是分毫不让。 Ye Xishui just erupted time, prime min­is­ter orig­i­nal com­plex­ion be­came pale, but this Old Kong got rid, the sur­round­ing all re­turned to nor­mal, Old Kong did not drop the wind by strength of the fac­ing Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui un­ex­pect­edly. This grade of strength, if passes on, shocked Soul Mas­ter and Soul En­gi­neer suf­fi­ciently. 叶夕水刚刚爆发的时候,首相本来一下脸色就变得苍白了,但这位孔老一出手,周围的一切都恢复了正常,孔老竟是以一己之力面对死神斗罗叶夕水不落下风。这等实力,要是传出去,足以震惊魂师界和魂导师界了。 Ye Xishui coldly snorted, „Kong Dem­ing, can you op­pose in­ad­e­quately with the old body?” 叶夕水冷哼一声,“孔德明,你要和老身作对不成？” Old Kong Kong Dem­ing sink­ing sound track: „Here is an im­pe­r­ial palace, is work­ing as in front of your majesty, re­mote an­tiq­uity for invit­ing dead weight.” 孔老孔德明沉声道:“这里是皇宫,当着陛下面前,太上供奉请自重。” Ye Xishui turns head to look to Xu Tian­ran, „your majesty, is this your mean­ing?” 叶夕水扭头看向徐天然,“陛下,这是你的意思？” Xu Tian­ran coughs, „re­mote an­tiq­uity con­se­crates, please be pa­tient. I know you for the em­pire. But this mat­ter must need fur­ther con­sid­er­a­tion. In­volves too broadly. Mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter where?” 徐天然咳嗽一声,“太上供奉,请稍安勿躁。朕知道你是为了帝国。但这件事必须要从长计议。牵涉太广。军务大臣何在？” The mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter hur­ried to walk from the one side, „your majesty, feu­dal of­fi­cial.” 军务大臣赶忙从一旁走了出来,“陛下,臣在。” Xu Tian­ran said: „Said your sug­ges­tion.” 徐天然道:“说说你的建议。” Ye Xishui stands in the one side, looked at Xu Tian­ran one silently, has taken back one­self im­pos­ing man­ner, the eye­ground deep place is ac­tu­ally the cold bright­ness twin­kle, she felt more and more Xu Tian­ran did not re­ceive own con­trol. 叶夕水站在一旁,默默的看了徐天然一眼,收回了自己身上的气势,眼底深处却是寒光闪烁,她已经越来越感觉到徐天然不受自己的控制了。 Who that Kong Dem­ing is, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui is very clear. Kong Dem­ing Sun-Moon Em­pire Wor­ship Hall Hall Mas­ter. The body has one-fourth Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily blood­lines, only loyal in Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily, is in it­self Sun-Moon Em­pire first Soul En­gi­neer. 那孔德明是什么人,死神斗罗叶夕水很清楚。孔德明正是日月帝国供奉堂堂主。身上有着1的皇室血脉,只忠诚于皇室,本身更是日月帝国第一魂导师。 Right, Sun-Moon Em­pire most for­mi­da­ble Soul En­gi­neer, is not Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, but is this on ranks sec­ond out­wardly, may in fact Ye Xishui also prob­a­bly ac­knowl­edge that ranks first for­mi­da­ble ex­is­tence in the Soul Guid­ance De­vice as­pect. 没错,日月帝国最强大的魂导师,并不是身为死神斗罗的叶夕水,而是这位明面上排名第二,可实际上叶夕水也要承认在魂导器方面排名第一的强大存在。 The Kong Dem­ing age has sur­passed 150 years old, is the heads of Sun-Moon Em­pire nu­mer­ous po­si­tion nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. 94 lev­els of Ti­tled Douluo. But few peo­ple know that this 94 lev­els of Ti­tled Douluo are Twin Mar­tial Souls. Not only is in it­self for­mi­da­ble Soul En­gi­neer, is for­mi­da­ble Soul Mas­ter. 孔德明的年纪已经超过了150岁,乃是日月帝国众位九级魂导师之首。94级封号斗罗。但很少有人知道,这位94级封号斗罗乃是双生武魂。本身不但是强大的魂导师,同时也是强大的魂师。 If were not he all uses own most en­ergy to Soul Guid­ance De­vice in the re­search, he is not nec­es­sar­ily able to be in­fe­rior in the achieve­ment that the Mar­tial Soul as­pect cul­ti­vated in Ye Xishui and Long Xi­aoyao these Limit Douluo. 如果不是他将自己的绝大部分精力全都用在了对魂导器的研究上,他在武魂方面修炼的成就未必会逊色于叶夕水、龙逍遥这些极限斗罗。 This is to also be hon­ored as most ap­proaches ex­is­tences of ten lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. 这位也是被誉为最接近十级魂导师的存在。 Ye Xishui is in it­self not pro­found re­gard­ing the re­search of Soul Guid­ance De­vice, she even­tu­ally is Soul Mas­ter. Her Grim Reaper Soul Guid­ance De­vice, im­por­tant con­stituent is Kong Dem­ing man­u­fac­tures for her suc­cess­fully. There­fore, even if Ye Xishui, has scru­ples to Kong Dem­ing. Her very clear this most ap­proaches ten lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer to be for­mi­da­ble. 叶夕水本身对于魂导器的研究并不深刻,她终究还是一位魂师。她的死神魂导器,很多重要的组成部分都是又孔德明为她制作成功的。所以,哪怕是叶夕水自己,也对孔德明有所顾忌。她很清楚这位最接近十级的魂导师有多么强大。 If makes Ye Xishui ap­praise Kong Dem­ing, she will use the im­mea­sur­ably deep four char­ac­ters. Be­cause at least had 50 years, no­body saw Kong Dem­ing to get rid. No one knows his true strength strong. But Long Xi­aoyao or Ye Xishui, when fac­ing him, can­not win the as­sur­ance. Only from this point, has proven his strength. 如果让叶夕水来评价孔德明,她会用深不可测四个字。因为至少已经有50年,没有人看到孔德明出手了。谁也不知道他的真正实力有多强。但无论是龙逍遥还是叶夕水,在面对他的时候,都没有必胜把握。单是从这一点,就证明了他的实力。 Kong Dem­ing did not ap­pear in Wor­ship Hall, used the en­tire en­ergy to Soul Guid­ance De­vice above the re­search. Until re­cently, after him fi­nally de­vel­oped suc­cess­fully Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice, this ap­peared in the line of sight of peo­ple. 原本孔德明一直都是在供奉堂中不出现的,将全部精力都用在了对魂导器的研究之上。直到最近,他终于研制成功了人形魂导器之后,这才出现在众人的视线之中。 Ab­solutely those who let Ye Xishui un­able to think, Kong Dem­ing sup­ports to Xu Tian­ran un­ex­pect­edly, stood side this king com­pletely. Thus makes Ye Xishui be cau­tious about harm­ing evil­do­ers lest the in­no­cent be hurt, the man­ner to Xu Tian­ran also has to have the new face. Some Kong Dem­ing side Xu Tian­ran, Ye Xishui know that they did not have the life that the abil­ity threat­ens this king. 让叶夕水万万想不到的是,孔德明对徐天然竟然十分支持,完全站在了这位帝王身边。从而让叶夕水投鼠忌器,对徐天然的态度也不得不发生改观。有孔德明在徐天然身边,叶夕水知道,自己已经没有能力威胁到这位帝王的生命了。 Just the large ex­plo­sion ap­proached, Kong Dem­ing is con­duct­ing the Soul Guid­ance De­vice re­search in­door own re­search, if he side Xu Tian­ran, Xu Tian­ran will not be in­jured. 刚刚大爆炸来临的时候,孔德明正在自己的研究室内进行魂导器研究,如果他是在徐天然身边的话,那么,徐天然就绝不会受伤了。 Kong Dem­ing stands, all Soul En­gi­neer re­leases nat­u­rally own aura, co­in­cides with him. This is the sta­tus! The true Sun-Moon Em­pire Soul En­gi­neer first per­son. Even if Bright Virtue Hall Mas­ter Jing Hongchen be­fore this plane, must hold the dis­ci­ple eti­quette. Ye Yulin is also so. 孔德明一站出来,所有魂导师都自然而然的释放出自己的气息,与他相合。这就是地位！真正的日月帝国魂导师第一人。就算是明德堂主镜红尘在这位面前,也要执弟子礼仪。叶雨霖也是如此。 Kong Dem­ing sees Ye Xishui to take back one­self im­pos­ing man­ner, at this time re­turned to side Xu Tian­ran, own aura has also replied nor­mally. 孔德明见叶夕水收回自己气势,此时已经回到了徐天然身边,自身气息也回复了正常。 Mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter spoke, while had a look at these two, par­tic­u­larly Kong Dem­ing, saw that Old Kong did not have what to in­di­cate that this con­tin­ued. 军务大臣一边说话,一边看看这二位,尤其是孔德明,眼看孔老没有什么表示,这才继续说下去。 „Your majesty, the feu­dal of­fi­cial thinks. The re­mote an­tiq­uity con­se­crated with the prime min­is­ter says was rea­son­able, but had bi­ased. The feu­dal of­fi­cials think that by the cur­rent sit­u­a­tion, is ex­tremely rad­i­cal and ex­tremely con­ser­v­a­tive, is not the best cop­ing style.” “陛下,臣以为。太上供奉和首相说的都有道理,但却都有所偏颇。臣以为,以目前的情况来看,太过激进和太过保守,都不是最好的应对方式。” „?” Xu Tian­ran some­what sur­prised looks at this mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter, called him, to me­di­ate, has not thought that this mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter as if also re­ally some good sug­ges­tions, ac­tu­ally have given the Xu Tian­ran not small pleas­ant sur­prise. “哦？”徐天然有些惊讶的看着这位军务大臣,将他叫出来,本来是为了打圆场的,没想到这位军务大臣似乎还真有好的建议,倒是给了徐天然不小的惊喜。 The mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter said: „Prime min­is­ter Sir the plan of main­tain­ing the ac­com­plish­ments of one's an­ces­tors no doubt right, but at pre­sent front form, our army piece of Light. If asked War-God Em­press to re­turn at this time, per­haps will miss the golden op­por­tu­nity. But coped with Shrek Acad­emy at this time, feu­dal of­fi­cial thinks that the con­di­tions were still not ripe. There­fore, some two is­sues.” 军务大臣道:“首相大人的守成之策固然没错,但以目前前线的形式来看,我军一片光明。如果在这个时候请帝后战神返回,恐怕会错过大好时机。而在这个时候对付史莱克学院,臣以为时机尚不成熟。因此,二者都有一些问题。” Prime min­is­ter coldly snorted, ridiculed: „Lit­tle here smooths over dif­fer­ences, if you have the means that said.” 首相冷哼一声,讥讽道:“少在这里和稀泥,你如果有办法,就说出来。” The mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter looked at prime min­is­ter one eyes, he and prime min­is­ter dis­agrees, every­one knows. More­over a con­tin­u­ously sup­pressed side, after all re­gard­less of the abil­ity and qual­i­fi­ca­tions, he must be in­fe­rior in this prime min­is­ter, the only su­pe­ri­or­ity was the age. 军务大臣看了首相一眼,他和首相不和,谁都知道。而且还是一直被压制的一方,毕竟无论能力和资历,他都要逊色于这位首相,唯一的优势就是年龄了。 The mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter con­fi­dent [say / way] of: „Your majesty is in­fe­rior to this, in­forms War-God Em­press the sit­u­a­tion that Bright Cap­i­tal City as well as re­cent home have, ask­ing the war-god em­press to de­cide. The en­e­mies this uses di­ver­sion­ary tac­tics now, and at­tacks Bright Cap­i­tal City tac­ti­cal some un­able to see clearly. But in the mil­i­tary as­pect, be­sides your majesty, only has the em­press to be strongest. Might as well judge by the em­press or makes the sug­ges­tion to your majesty. The em­presses are in the front, is also clear­est re­gard­ing front sit­u­a­tion. If the em­press thinks that now this time should at­tack Shrek Acad­emy, then, your majesty can also set firm re­solve.” 军务大臣胸有成竹的道:“陛下不如这样,将明都以及最近国内发生的情况通知帝后战神,请战神娘娘决定。敌人现在这声东击西,并且攻击明都的战术有些无法看清。而在军事方面,除了陛下外,唯有娘娘最强。不如由娘娘来判断或者给陛下提些建议。娘娘身在前线,对于前线情况也最为清楚。如果娘娘认为现在这个时候应该攻击史莱克学院,那么,陛下也可以下定决心了。” The mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter most in­tel­li­gent place, is he be­tween the judg­ment that Xu Tian­ran and Ju Zi(or­ange) re­late. 军务大臣最聪明的地方,就是他对徐天然和橘子之间关系的判断。 Is the king, is will­ing to give a per­son the mil­i­tary au­thor­ity, this has af­firmed its trust de­gree. Let alone, now Crown Prince Your High­ness is the em­press em­press, no­body will sus­pect War-God Em­press to the coun­try and to your majesty loy­alty. So far, sim­ply has not com­peted for of crown prince match with the crown prince. In this case, doesn't Xu Tian­ran pos­si­bly trust the only wife? 身为帝王,肯将军权交给一个人,那么,这就肯定了其信任程度。更何况,当今太子殿下乃是皇后娘娘所出,没有人会怀疑帝后战神对国家、对陛下的忠诚。目前为止,根本没有跟太子争夺储君之位的对手。在这种情况下,徐天然又怎么可能不信任自己唯一的妻子呢？ ------------------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- 400 ticket in ad­di­tion ar­rive! Not places an upper limit on the erup­tion to con­tinue, sets no ceil­ing limit. When next one is at 800 tick­ets. Quickly throws! Monthly ticket quickly to bowl in! 400票加更到来！无封顶爆发继续,上不封顶哦。下一更在800票时。赶快投起来！月票快到碗里来！

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #554 Confucius and Laozi


There­fore, mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter, al­though does not have any good means that but ac­tu­ally pushes 265, ad­vanced on the issue Ju Zi(or­ange) di­rectly. More­over his analy­sis is also very rea­son­able. There­fore, this means are not own abil­ity strong, but is po­lit­i­cal wis­dom enough per­for­mance. 所以,军务大臣自己虽然没什么好办法,但却一推265,直接将问题推到了橘子身上。而且他的分析也很有道理。所以,他这个办法不是自己的能力有多强,而是政治智慧足够的表现。 Re­ally, lis­tened to his words, prime min­is­ter com­plex­ion changed changed, could not say the words of op­po­si­tion. 果然,听了他的话,首相脸色变了变,却说不出反对的话语了。 An­other side, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui is also the brow micro wrin­kle, then nod­ded slowly. 另一边,死神斗罗叶夕水也是眉头微皱,然后缓缓点了点头。 Rea­son that they have ap­proved the words of mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter, be­sides the ne­ces­sity of Ju Zi(or­ange) to Sun-Moon Em­pire loyal, was the strength. 他们之所以都认可了军务大臣的话,除了橘子对日月帝国的必然忠诚之外,就是实力了。 Ju Zi(or­ange) has di­rected ini­tially to Sky Soul Em­pire the war of bro­ken bu­reau. Ye Xishui joined that mo­tion. After at­tack­ing Bright Strug­gle Moun­tain Range, ac­tu­ally sud­denly turns around to change Sky Soul Em­pire to ini­ti­ate the storm, si­mul­ta­ne­ously blocks off the flow of news. This a se­ries of mo­tions come the pen just like the god, has taken away the de­ci­sive strate­gic tac­tics to then war. 橘子一手导演了当初对天魂帝国的破局之战。叶夕水自己都参加了那次行动。攻击明斗山脉之后,却骤然掉头转向天魂帝国发起强攻,同时封锁消息。这一系列的行动宛如神来之笔,给当时的战争带去了决定性的战略战术。 Later, under Ju Zi(or­ange) com­man­der, Sun-Moon Em­pire pushed di­rectly into, has seized the Sky Soul Em­pire big piece ter­ri­tory. Even some peo­ple have said that if not crown prince of War-God Em­press under for the birth, per­haps now uni­fied Con­ti­nent. 之后,在橘子的统帅下,日月帝国长驱直入,占领了天魂帝国大片领地。甚至有人说过,如果不是帝后战神为了诞下太子,说不定现在已经统一大陆了。 Xu Tian­ran lis­tened to the words of mil­i­tary af­fairs min­is­ter, on the face the look also be­came at­trac­tive. Yes! So­licited the sug­ges­tions of Ju Zi(or­ange) to be very nec­es­sary at this time, after all, she ef­fec­tively was keep­ing abreast of the front sit­u­a­tion, how should cope at pre­sent the sit­u­a­tion clearly. 徐天然听了军务大臣的话,脸上神色也变得好看了许多。是啊！在这个时候征求一下橘子的意见十分必要,毕竟,她才真正掌握着前线的情况,更加清楚该如何来应对目前局势。 Xu Tian­ran turns head to look to Kong Dem­ing, said: „Old Kong, what do you have to sug­gest?” 徐天然扭头看向孔德明,道:“孔老,您有什么建议么？” Kong Dem­ing light [say / way]: „Match this time sneak at­tacks suc­cess­fully, has cer­tain lucky in­gre­di­ent. Mean­while, should have chan­nel to know our im­pe­r­ial fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp not in Bright Cap­i­tal City. Let me judge, could in­crease. That is the match is very pos­si­ble, not only mas­tered the stealth abil­ity, even also has the space abil­ity.” 孔德明淡淡的道:“对手这次成功偷袭,有一定的幸运成分。同时,应该也是有渠道知道了我们皇家魂导师团不在明都之中。让我来判断,可能要增加一点。那就是对手很可能不只是掌握了隐身能力,甚至还有空间能力。” „Space abil­ity?” Hears these four char­ac­ters, Xu Tian­ran is star­tled ter­ri­fied. Ye Xishui is also same. “空间能力？”听到这四个字,徐天然悚然一惊。叶夕水也是一样。 If this say­ing said from oth­ers mouth, they will only close with a smile. But Kong Dem­ing is dif­fer­ent, he now has ex­is­tence of deep­est at­tain­ments in the Soul Guid­ance De­vice re­search. 这话要是从别人口中说出,他们只会一笑置之。可孔德明不一样,他可是当今在魂导器研究方面有着最深造诣的存在。 But the space abil­ity pre­sents in all peo­ple, only then Ye Xishui browsed slightly, only then to Limit Douluo that level. Truly will con­tact space abil­ity. Kong Dem­ing is not good. The cur­rent Soul Guid­ance Tech­nol­ogy met­ric space abil­ity also has the in­sur­mount­able gap. 而空间能力在场所有人之中,也只有叶夕水略微涉猎了一些而已,只有到极限斗罗那个层次。才真正会接触到空间能力。就连孔德明也不行。目前的魂导科技距离空间能力还有着不可逾越的鸿沟。 Ye Yulin lis­tened to the Kong Dem­ing words, look­ing pen­sive is think­ing any­thing. 叶雨霖听了孔德明的话,若有所思的想着什么。 Xu Tian­ran said: „Old Kong. You said in de­tail.” 徐天然道:“孔老。您详细说说。” Kong Dem­ing nod­ded, said: „Small leaf nar­rated the en­tire process a mo­ment ago, but has ac­tu­ally leaked a point, he judges the match is two Soul En­gi­neer Corp. How­ever. He in fact saw with­drawal has one, then, an­other? An­other Soul En­gi­neer Corp should truly launch mas­sively has in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely. But scale of launch, very pos­si­ble with the aid of Shrek Acad­emy that side that Zhuge God Cross­bow Ar­tillery that clan/sect that called Tang Sect pro­duced. We had also cap­tured Zhuge God Cross­bow Ar­tillery from Sky Soul Em­pire, I have looked sim­ply.” 孔德明点了点头,道:“小叶刚才讲述了整个过程,但却漏了一点,他判断出对手是两支魂导师团。但是。他实际上看到撤走的只有一支,那么,另一支呢？另一支魂导师团应该才是真正发射了大量定装魂导炮弹的。而发射的规模,很可能是借助史莱克学院那边那个叫唐门的宗门生产出来的诸葛神弩炮。我们也曾经从天魂帝国那边俘获过诸葛神弩炮,我简单的看过。” „Zhuge God Cross­bow Ar­tillery of Tang Sect pro­duc­tion, the struc­ture is very ex­quis­ite, but has the de­struc­tive mech­a­nism. Does not have the means to see clearly truly. And has used some non- Core For­ma­tion meth­ods. This should be the real cause that Tang Sect can rise. This Zhuge God Cross­bow Ar­tillery can carry on launches con­tin­u­ally in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely, more­over can the huge num­ber. But its vol­ume is not small. In this case, wants to launch over ten thou­sand, that. At least needs mas­sive Zhuge God Cross­bow Ar­tillery to achieve. But this quan­tity was very im­por­tant. Be­cause some these many shells can sup­press us. But the Zhuge God Cross­bow Ar­tillery quan­tity is over hun­dred, wants to re­treat, re­lies on in­vis­i­ble Soul Abil­ity of per­son merely, is ab­solutely im­pos­si­ble to cover. Per­haps even if Limit Douluo can­not achieve. There­fore, I de­ter­mine them to have any spe­cial space abil­ity, mak­ing these Soul Guid­ance De­vice re­treat, be­cause of these space abil­i­ties, they can by the high-speed mi­gra­tion.” “唐门生产的诸葛神弩炮内部,结构十分精巧,但却有自毁装置。没办法真正看清楚。其中用了一些非核心法阵的手段。这应该才是那唐门能够崛起的真正原因。这种诸葛神弩炮可以进行持续发射定装魂导炮弹,而且可以数量巨大。但它本身体积也是不小。在这种情况下,想要发射上万枚,那么。至少需要大量诸葛神弩炮才能做到。而这个数量就很重要了。正是因为有这么多炮弹才能压制我们。而诸葛神弩炮数量超过百门,想要撤退,仅仅凭借一个人的隐形魂技,是绝对不可能掩盖的。就算是极限斗罗恐怕都做不到。所以,我判定他们应该是有什么特殊的空间能力,让这些魂导器撤退,也正因为这些空间能力,他们才能够以高速移动。” Xu Tian­ran said with amaze­ment: „, To have space Soul Guid­ance De­vice to ap­pear un­ex­pect­edly? This is how pos­si­ble. Old Kong you......” 徐天然骇然道:“难道说,竟是有空间魂导器出现？这怎么可能。就连孔老您都……” Kong Dem­ing beck­oned with the hand, said: „I truly have not stud­ied the re­lated space abil­ity Soul Guid­ance De­vice, but ac­tu­ally can­not surely not have such tal­ent on this world. How­ever, at pre­sent this time sit­u­a­tion, by the cur­rent Soul Guid­ance Tech­nol­ogy foun­da­tion, per­haps stud­ies space Soul Guid­ance De­vice is very dif­fi­cult. After all, space Chu Wu is the limit, ships the life, more­over so the scale, has not ex­isted. This mat­ter must in­ves­ti­gate thor­oughly. If is re­ally space Soul Guid­ance De­vice, must not hes­i­tate to ob­tain, this re­gard­ing our coun­try the Soul Guid­ance Tech­nol­ogy de­vel­op­ment, will have the im­por­tant mean­ing in the fu­ture.” 孔德明摆了摆手,道:“我确实还没有研究出有关空间能力的魂导器,但却并不能肯定在这个世界上就没有这样的天才。不过,就目前这次的情况来看,还有以目前的魂导科技基础,恐怕研究出空间魂导器会很难。毕竟,空间储物已经是极限了,运送生命,而且如此规模,还不存在。这件事必须要查清楚。如果真是空间魂导器,一定要不惜一切得到,这对于我国未来魂导科技发展,将有重要意义。” Nod of Xu Tian­ran deep to be so, said: „Your mean­ing?” 徐天然深以为然的点了点头,道:“那您的意思呢？” Kong Dem­ing said: „First re­ports here sit­u­a­tion to War-God Em­press, if the re­mote an­tiq­uity con­se­crates to say well, the stealth or space Soul Guid­ance De­vice, should with that the young peo­ple who called Huo Yuhao were con­cerned, find­ing the way to get so far as this per­son, all nat­u­rally re­vealed the truth. I have cre­ated spirit to this, or­ga­nized the young peo­ple of Spirit Trans­fer­ring Pagoda or­ga­ni­za­tion is very in­ter­ested. A lit­tle under the god of death crown said is very right, in the fu­ture this young peo­ple, surely will be the trusted friend big trou­ble of em­pire, if can­not sub­due, must ex­cept that as soon as pos­si­ble.” 孔德明道:“先向帝后战神通报这边的情况,如果太上供奉所言不错,无论是隐形还是空间魂导器,应该都和那个叫霍雨浩的年轻人有关,想办法弄到这个人,一切自然就真相大白了。我对这个创造了魂灵,创办了传灵塔组织的年轻人也很有兴趣。有一点死神冕下说的很对,未来这个年轻人,必定是帝国的心腹大患,如果不能收服,就一定要尽早除去。” In this time, sud­denly, the dis­tant place is hear­ing an in­ter­mit­tent bel­low. 正在这时,突然间,远方传来一阵阵轰鸣声。 Kong Dem­ing is al­most sub­con­scious kept off be­fore the Xu Tian­ran body, the pow­er­ful azure light the Xu Tian­ran pro­tec­tion, Soul En­gi­neer other on the scene also in abun­dance went into ac­tion in­stan­ta­neously, im­me­di­ately of­fered a sac­ri­fice to one­self strongest De­fen­sive Soul Guid­ance De­vice. 孔德明几乎是下意识的就挡在了徐天然身前,强盛的青光瞬间将徐天然守护在内,在场的其他魂导师们也是纷纷行动起来,都在第一时间祭出了自己最强的防御魂导器。 The be­fore­hand at­tack makes them is sim­i­lar to the fright­ened per­son is or­di­nary, the bel­low that this hears sud­denly is re­ally some­what scary. 之前的袭击都让他们变得如同惊弓之鸟一般,这突然传来的轰鸣声着实是有些吓人。 The Ye Yulin com­plex­ion changes, „be­fore sound is , the di­rec­tion of enemy that Soul Guid­ance Array place trans­mits. Did they come back?” 叶雨霖脸色一变,“声音是之前敌人那个魂导阵地的方向传来的。难道他们又回来了？” Kong Dem­ing brow tight wrin­kle, „is not right. The sound is not right.” 孔德明眉头紧皱,“不对。声音不对。” The free time of a while, the news comes, that left be­hind many Soul Guid­ance De­vice tem­po­rary Soul Guid­ance Array to have the chain ex­plo­sion, Soul Guid­ance De­vice that all left be­hind com­pletely from ex­plod­ing frag­ment. But the news that has also has one, that is these Soul Guid­ance De­vice all came from in Sun-Moon Em­pire own man­u­fac­ture. 一会儿的工夫,消息传来,那个留下了不少魂导器的临时魂导阵地发生了连环爆炸,所有遗留下来的魂导器全部自爆成碎片。而带回来的消息也只有一个,那就是这些魂导器全都是源自于日月帝国自己的制造。 Xu Tian­ran is al­most mad once more spouts a blood, im­me­di­ately an­nounces the con­fer­ence to end, he must write a let­ter to War-God Em­press per­son­ally. Mean­while, the Bright Cap­i­tal City en­tire city de­clares mar­tial law, in­ves­ti­gates rig­or­ously the enemy who may have. 徐天然差点气得再次喷出一口鲜血,立刻宣布会议结束,他要亲自写信给帝后战神。同时,明都全城戒严,严查有可能存在的敌人。 Bright Cap­i­tal City is fright­ened by the slight­est sound, in un­dead Demi-plane is ac­tu­ally a de­light. 明都这边风声鹤唳,亡灵半位面之中却是一片欢欣。 300 Zhuge God Cross­bow Ar­tillery with­draw com­pletely, al­though this time they launched have sur­passed in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball that half stored goods surely. But is lim­ited to the loss that Sun-Moon Em­pire takes away. But, strate­gic tar­get was ac­tu­ally achieved. Com­pared with loss and strate­gic tar­get on com­mod­ity, were not any­thing. 300门诸葛神弩炮全部撤回,尽管这一次他们发射了超过一半存货的定装魂导炮弹。而给日月帝国带去的损失有限。可是,战略目标却是达到了。物资上的损失和战略目标相比,就不算什么了。 Enough after med­i­tate 12 dou­ble-hour, Huo Yuhao fully re­stored in peak con­di­tion. 足足冥想了12个时辰之后,霍雨浩才完全恢复到了巅峰状态。 Does not need to guess that knew around Bright Cap­i­tal City re­cently cer­tain tense at­mos­phere, he not anx­iously ex­it­ing. Beibei heard that he awoke, im­me­di­ately asks the per­son to ask him to meet in the past. 不用猜都知道明都周围最近一定气氛紧张,他也不急着出去。贝贝听说他醒了,立刻叫人来请他过去开会。 At this time un­dead Demi-plane may not have a death aura, three Soul En­gi­neer Corp dance with joy. Also no won­der they so, this time, al­though has launched mas­sively in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely. But they bat­tle in Bright Cap­i­tal City! After gen­uine enemy, Core Area ter­ri­tory. 此时亡灵半位面可没有一点死亡气息,三支魂导师团都是欢欣鼓舞。也难怪他们会如此,这次虽然发射了大量的定装魂导炮弹。可他们是在明都作战啊！真正的敌后核心区域。 Such fight, can whole body draw back un­ex­pect­edly, is hard to imag­ine sim­ply. 这样的战斗,居然能够全身而退,简直是难以想象的。 Heavy ar­tillery Soul En­gi­neer Corp or Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp, gained in the sub­stan­tial ex­pe­ri­ences in this fight. Al­though can­not say that is the tough bat­tle, the re­sults that but at that time the ten­sion-filled at­mos­phere, the di­rec­tion of Huo Yuhao as well as pro­duced, gave these young Soul En­gi­neer to make the deep im­pres­sion, will grow to have the great ben­e­fit that was hard to judge to them in the fu­ture. 无论是重炮魂导师团还是唐门魂导师团,都在这次战斗中积累了不少的经验。虽然说不上是硬仗,但当时紧张的气氛,霍雨浩的指挥以及所产生的效果,都给这些年轻的魂导师们留下了深刻印象,也对他们未来成长有着难以判断的巨大好处。 On the Huo Yuhao face re­veals a light smile, both hands closes up in the front, looks to sit to­gether the part­ners, greeted after every­body sat side Beibei. 霍雨浩脸上流露出一丝淡淡的微笑,双手在胸前合拢,看着围坐在一起的伙伴们,和大家打了个招呼后就在贝贝身边坐了下来。 Tang Wu­tong and he comes to­gether, sits down in his side. 唐舞桐和他一同前来,在他身边坐下。 Beibei a happy ex­pres­sion of face, „this time should sound the alarm to Sun-Moon Em­pire at this time. Our High­est Flat­terer were also ex­per­i­ments suc­cess­fully. Does not know how that Xu Tian­ran cur­rently the sit­u­a­tion, does have by High­est Flat­terer wreck­ing is ex­tin­guished.” 贝贝此时一脸的笑意,“这次应该给日月帝国敲响了警钟。我们的太阿也是试验成功了。只是不知道,那徐天然现在情况如何,有没有被太阿一击毁灭。” Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: „Per­haps is very dif­fi­cult, var­i­ous Bright Cap­i­tal City im­pe­r­ial palace de­fense arrange­ment are ex­tremely nu­mer­ous, more­over some mas­sive Soul En­gi­neer pow­er­houses. If be­fore is they study Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice, per­haps also has the pos­si­bil­ity, but now, the pos­si­bil­ity is very low. On Xu Tian­ran is cer­tainly bring­ing mas­sive De­fen­sive Soul Guid­ance De­vice, can main­tain life to one­self im­me­di­ately. But must say that an in­flu­ence has not had scru­ples is im­pos­si­ble. This time we have ex­ploded the im­pe­r­ial palace, does not know how they re­flect.” 霍雨浩摇了摇头,道:“恐怕很难,明都皇宫各种防御布置极多,而且还有大量魂导师强者。如果是他们研究出人形魂导器之前,或许还有可能,但现在的话,可能性就很小了。徐天然身上一定带着大量的防御魂导器,能够在第一时间给自己保命。但要说一点影响都没有顾忌也不可能。这次我们炸了皇宫,不知道他们反映如何。” Xu San­shi said with a smile: „The best sit­u­a­tion is im­me­di­ately re­pulses the enemy from the front, in that case, our goal has been achieved, more­over in the fu­ture can also con­tinue to dis­turb in Sun-Moon Em­pire, di­verts them, to weaken them. In the near fu­ture, per­haps re­lied on us to be able Sun-Moon Em­pire to burn out.” 徐三石笑道:“最好的情况就是立刻从前线退兵,那样的话,我们目的就达到了,而且未来还能够在日月帝国境内继续捣乱,牵制他们、削弱他们。不久的将来,说不定凭借我们就能把日月帝国拖垮了。” Beibei ill-hu­mored [say / way]: „If so easy, our coun­tries so will be painful? After this time after the at­tack of Bright Cap­i­tal City, they specif­i­cally will cer­tainly aim at us to take a se­ries of ac­tions. Sun-Moon Em­pire Soul Guid­ance Tech­nol­ogy is de­vel­oped, per­haps will study any­thing to aim at our Soul Guid­ance De­vice. There­fore, Yuhao, you can­not go to Bright Cap­i­tal City to re­con­noi­ter.” 贝贝没好气的道:“要是那么容易的话,我们的国家会那么痛苦吗？经过这次对明都的袭击之后,他们一定会专门针对我们展开一系列的行动。日月帝国魂导科技发达,说不定就会研究出什么针对我们的魂导器来。所以,雨浩,你不能去明都进行侦察。” Huo Yuhao has gawked star­ing, Beibei this was him just the pro­posal that wanted to put for­ward over­rul­ing, the forced smile said: „First Se­nior Brother, you know that what I do want to make? Not only I want to take a look at our time re­sult, wants to in­quire that the sit­u­a­tion of front, that side Bright Cap­i­tal City, the news should be most un­ob­structed after all.” 霍雨浩愣了愣,贝贝这是将他刚刚想要提出的建议给否决了,不禁苦笑道:“大师兄,您怎么知道我想要做什么？我不只是想去看看咱们这次的成绩,同时也想去打听一下前线的情况,毕竟明都那边,消息应该是最通畅的。” Beibei firm shak­ing the head, said: „Our mo­tions have take risked, can­not con­tinue to take risk again. The re­sult that we yield was very good, in this case, wants steadily. To know the sit­u­a­tion of front, rather much spends the time to go back to have a look. In any case, at your speed, some day the time, flew. Bright Cap­i­tal City can­not touch again. Here pow­er­house are too many, is not good, you fall into, all that we for­merly made wasted.” 贝贝坚定的摇了摇头,道:“我们这次行动已经是十分冒险了,绝不能再继续冒险。我们所取得的成果已经很不错,在这种情况下,要稳一点。想要知道前线的情况,宁可多花时间回去看看。反正,以你的速度,有一天时间,怎么也飞回去了。明都不能再碰。这里强者太多,一个不好,你陷入其中,那么,我们先前所作的一切就都白费了。” -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------- 800 ticket in ad­di­tion also come! Quick , to con­tinue, next one when 1200 tick­ets, waits for you. 800票加更也来啦！快吧,继续继续,下一更在1200票时,等你们哦。 Makes an ef­fort to pound the ticket! Today the brother has spelled, dili­gently in sym­bol......, Asked the monthly ticket 用力砸票吧！今天哥拼了,努力码字中……,求月票

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #554 Confucius and Laozi


Huo Yuhao looks at the firm­ness that he said that was also not in­sist­ing, if he is the brain and in­spi­ra­tional fig­ure in team, then, Beibei is the pil­lar. Wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test 霍雨浩看他说的坚决,也就不在坚持,如果说他是团队中的大脑和灵魂人物,那么,贝贝就是主心骨。水印广告测试 The wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test re­gard­ing this First Se­nior Brother, he re­spects ab­solutely. 水印广告测试对于这位大师兄,他是绝对的尊重。 Beibei said: „We then must do is far away, Yuhao, after out­side dark­ness, you exit, then re­turns as soon as pos­si­ble. We re­turn to Acad­emy to have a look, goes back here news belt, an­other, looks at the front that side sit­u­a­tion, de­cides our fol­low­ing mo­tions again.” 贝贝道:“我们接下来要做的就是远离,雨浩,等到外面天黑之后,你就出去,然后尽快返回吧。咱们回学院看看,一个是将这边的消息带回去,另一个,也看一下前线那边的情况,再来决定我们接下来的行动。” „Good.” Re­gard­ing sug­ges­tion Huo Yuhao not any ob­jec­tion of Beibei. The steady point is also good, what he has not said that be­fore, him must do a mat­ter to be good. “好。”对于贝贝的建议霍雨浩没有任何异议。稳一点也好,不过他没说的是,在回去之前,他还要去做一件事才行。 In peo­ple, only some un­happy was He Caitou, He Caitou said: „Yuhao, after wait­ing this time to go back, we again come back on many to sneak at­tack some Sun-Moon Em­pire Soul Guid­ance Array places. This our con­sump­tion is also quite many!” 众人之中,唯一有些不开心的就是和菜头了,和菜头道:“雨浩,等这次回去以后,咱们再回来就多去偷袭一些日月帝国的魂导阵地吧。这次我们的消耗也是相当不少啊！” Xu San­shi said with a smile: „Caitou, when did you turn into a miser?” 徐三石笑道:“菜头,你什么时候变成个守财奴了？” He Caitou ill-hu­mored [say / way]: „That may be money! You know how many this time wiped out to in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely? De­fended Soul Guid­ance Array also to stay in that side, I loved dearly! Must pro­duce these many things many not to be easy. We may not have the Sun-Moon Em­pire pro­duc­tiv­ity.” 和菜头没好气的道:“那可都是钱啊！你知道这次打掉了多少定装魂导炮弹么？还有一个防御魂导阵地也都留在了那边,我心疼啊！要生产这么多东西多不容易。我们可没有日月帝国的生产能力。” Beibei said: „Caitou said right, when we will come next time again, no longer at­tacked Bright Cap­i­tal City, placed these to have the Soul Guid­ance Array place place the main tar­gets. As far as pos­si­ble at­tacks and de­struc­tion. Thus strength­ens our own strengths.” 贝贝道:“菜头说的没错,等下次我们再来时,就不再攻击明都这边了,将主要攻击对象都放在那些有魂导阵地的地方。尽可能的去打击和破坏。从而增强我们自身实力。” In the He Caitou eye as if there is gold coin ray twin­kle, mut­tered thought aloud: „When if can take by force Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp to be good. If our Tang Sect Soul En­gi­neer Corp also ex­changes Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice, who also fears them! Hey.” 和菜头眼中仿佛有金币光芒闪烁,喃喃的自言自语道:“要是什么时候能打劫了日月皇家魂导师团就好了。我们唐门魂导师团要是也换上人形魂导器,那谁还怕他们！嘿嘿。” „!” To­gether every­body dis­dains snorts con­temp­tu­ously to him. “切！”大家一起不屑的向他嗤之以鼻。 Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp, that is they can move now? 日月皇家魂导师团,那是现在他们能碰触的吗？ Only has in the Huo Yuhao eye the ray to dodge, re­veals color look­ing pen­sive. 唯有霍雨浩眼中光芒一闪,流露出若有所思之色。 Grabs Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp nat­u­rally to be un­likely, but if can get so far as Sun-Moon Royal Fam­ily Soul En­gi­neer Corp that Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice in the fu­ture. Brings to give the Teacher Xuan words, can per­haps ab­sorb ex­pe­ri­ence? This de­vel­ops Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice to be of great ad­van­tage to fu­ture Shrek Acad­emy. 劫掠日月皇家魂导师团当然不太可能,但如果未来能够从中弄到一件日月皇家魂导师团的那种人形魂导器。带回去给轩老师的话,说不定就能够吸取其中的经验呢？这对未来史莱克学院发展人形魂导器将大有好处。 After all, al­though Teacher Xuan also stud­ied Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice, and based on Tang Sect mech­a­nism. May at pre­sent only then he and Nan Qi­uqiu equipped. More­over is pri­mar­ily the close com­bat. Is un­copi­able. 毕竟,轩老师虽然也研究出了人形魂导器,并且是在唐门机括的基础上。可目前就只有他和南秋秋装备了。而且还都是以近战为主。不能复制。 Can­not du­pli­cate is un­able to pro­mote, this is not the good phe­nom­e­non. Huo Yuhao are also nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. He is also very cu­ri­ous, vol­ume pro­duc­tion Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice that ac­tu­ally Sun-Moon Em­pire how achieves. Must know, once Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice will pro­mote in the fu­ture, Sun-Moon Em­pire Soul En­gi­neer Corp on an over­all com­bat ca­pa­bil­ity gen­eral again stair. More for­mi­dabe. 不能复制就无法推广,这可不是什么好现象。霍雨浩自己也是九级魂导师。他也很好奇,日月帝国究竟是怎么做到的批量生产人形魂导器。要知道,一旦未来人形魂导器推广起来,日月帝国的魂导师团在整体战斗能力上将再上一个台阶。更难对付。 When the peo­ple con­tinue the re­cu­per­a­tion, the night falls, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wu­tong qui­etly left un­dead Demi-plane, reap­peared opened in the Gate of the Dead small woods be­fore that piece of them. 众人继续休整,夜幕降临时,霍雨浩和唐舞桐悄然离开了亡灵半位面,重新出现在了那片他们之前开启亡者大门的小树林之中。 The breeze, night is very slowly quiet, in the air brings the light plant del­i­cate fra­grance, the in­sect war­bler to call con­tin­u­ously. 微风徐徐,夜晚十分静谧,空气中带着淡淡的植物清香,虫鸣鸟叫此起彼伏。 Huo Yuhao holds the hand of Tang Wu­tong to walk from un­dead Demi-plane. takes a deep breath, the cool night wind glad­dens the heart, im­me­di­ately thought mind in­spires. 霍雨浩牵着唐舞桐的手从亡灵半位面走出来。深吸口气,清凉夜风沁人心脾,顿时觉得精神一振。 un­dead Demi-plane is safe, does not have the com­fort of Douluo Con­ti­nent. This be­longs to their places! 亡灵半位面再安全,也没有斗罗大陆的舒适。这才是属于他们的地方啊！ Huo Yuhao has not left ea­gerly, but leans in a big tree. 霍雨浩没有急于离开,而是倚靠在一株大树上。 Tang Wu­tong vis­its him cu­ri­ously, said: „Do you do?” 唐舞桐好奇的看着他,道:“你干什么？” Huo Yuhao raises up the index fin­ger be­fore the lip, has given a hand sig­nal to her, „breathes out!” Then waves to her. 霍雨浩将食指竖起在唇前,向她比了个手势,“嘘！”然后又向她招了招手。 Tang Wu­tong ar­rives in front of him, the look had doubts. 唐舞桐走到他面前,眼神更加疑惑了。 Huo Yuhao draws her to own side, mak­ing her lean on own shoul­der, gen­tly is stroking her pink-blue color long hair, gen­tle Spir­i­tual Shar­ing also shares own mind world with her along with it. 霍雨浩将她拉到自己身边,让她倚靠在自己肩头,轻轻的抚摸着她那粉蓝色长发,柔和的精神共享也随之将自己的精神世界与她分享。 Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion and Shar­ing? Tang Wu­tong al­ways thought that Huo Yuhao is strange, but under flick­ers, the big eyes of her dou­ble ac­tion per­son on own ini­tia­tive did not open. 精神探测共享？唐舞桐总觉得霍雨浩怪怪的,但下一瞬,她那双动人的大眼睛就不自觉的睁大了。 This is...... 这是…… mind thinks of the feel­ing to ex­tend in­fi­nitely, this is not any­thing, may, in this mind thinks in the feel­ing range, is full of the joy­ful and tem­per­ate mood fluc­tu­a­tion in­nu­mer­ably is ac­tu­ally in­fil­trat­ing her mind world. 精神思感无限延伸,这不算什么,可在这精神思感范围内,无数充满快乐与温和的情绪波动却浸润着她的精神世界。 That as if has in­nu­mer­able small lives, was re­lat­ing to her the hap­pi­ness of world, was re­count­ing own con­cern. Her Spir­i­tual Power quan­tity im­per­cep­ti­bly in­te­gra­tion nat­u­rally to that joy­ful sea. But mind thinks of the feel­ing also to­ward far­ther di­rec­tional di­ver­gence. 那似乎有无数个小生灵,在向她诉说着世界的美好,述说着自己的心事。她的精神力量无形中自然而然的融入到了那快乐的海洋之中。而精神思感也朝着更远的方向扩散开来。 This feel­ing was too won­der­ful, Tang Wu­tong Spir­i­tual Power may not have Huo Yuhao to be so for­mi­da­ble, there­fore, in­fil­trates, in Huo Yuhao takes to her mar­velous Spir­i­tual Shar­ing, her feel­ing is also more pro­found, own Spir­i­tual Power also un­ceas­ingly con­tin­u­ally sub­li­mates in this feel­ing. 这种感觉太美妙了,唐舞桐的精神力可远没有霍雨浩那么强大,所以,浸润在霍雨浩带给她的这份奇妙精神共享中,她的感受也更加深刻,自身精神力也不断在这种感觉中持续升华。 If there is changed oth­ers, Huo Yuhao is very dif­fi­cult to achieve this point, after all, he can Spir­i­tual Shar­ing see, feels, ac­tu­ally can­not share the sub­tle change of mind world. But Tang Wu­tong is dif­fer­ent, their Mar­tial Soul Fu­sion, has Hao Dong Power, has the most close re­la­tion­ship. There­fore, after Huo Yuhao com­pletely lets loose body and mind, he and Tang Wu­tong now is a whole, looks like they when dis­play­ing Rai­ment of Light, sum­moned the God­dess of Light ap­pear­ance, all that in this state, he can feel, Tang Wu­tong can the clear feel­ing. 如果换了别人,霍雨浩还很难做到这一点,毕竟,他可以精神共享自己看到的、感受到的,却不能分享精神世界的细微变化。可唐舞桐不同,他们武魂融合,拥有浩冬之力,有着最密切的关系。所以,当霍雨浩完全放开身心之后,他和唐舞桐现在就是一个整体,就像是他们在施展光之霓裳,召唤出光之女神时的样子,在这种状态下,他能感受到的一切,唐舞桐都能清晰的感觉到。 The sen­si­bil­ity and sub­li­ma­tion, with pass­ing of time, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wu­tong as if in­te­grated in the sur­round­ing en­vi­ron­ment, be­came parts of these plants, if did not look with the eye that is un­able to re­al­ize their aura. 感悟、升华,伴随着时间的流逝,霍雨浩和唐舞桐仿佛都已经融入了周围的环境之中,成为了那些植物的一部分,如果不是用眼睛去看,是根本无法察觉到他们气息的。 When Tang Wu­tong very nat­ural open­ing eyes pupil again, the weather the dawn, the in­sect war­bler cry was lighter, the morn­ing dew is moist, is day­break. 当唐舞桐很自然的重新睁开眼眸时,天色已经蒙蒙亮,虫鸣鸟叫声轻了许多,晨露湿润,已是黎明时分。 Huo Yuhao also to­gether opens the dou­ble pupil along with her, they looked at each other one, on the face re­veal the smile, the ex­change that the re­gard no longer needs to say a word in­ter­linked. 霍雨浩也随着她一同睁开双眸,两人对视一眼,脸上都流露出了微笑,心意相通不再需要言语的交流。 The time of how many dou­ble-hour, re­gard­ing Tang Wu­tong, are sim­i­lar to are ac­tu­ally re­born gen­eral, that type the mind fu­sion with plant world, let her to Spir­i­tual Power re­al­izes from ex­pe­ri­ence to pro­mote com­pletely far more than one step? 几个时辰的时间,对于唐舞桐来说,却如同脱胎换骨一般,那种完全与植物世界的精神融合,让她对精神力的体悟提升了何止一步？ In this state cul­ti­vates Spir­i­tual Power, quite there­fore myr­iad plants are help­ing, is feed­ing back, in the mean­time, their Spir­i­tual Power also sim­i­larly in the help plants, these and they have prac­ticed to­gether the plant, in the fu­ture will be def­i­nitely eas­ier be­comes plant at­tribute Soul Beast, awak­en­ing own wis­dom. 在这种状态下修炼精神力,相当于是万千植物在帮助,在反馈,同时,他们的精神力也同样在帮助植物们,这些和他们共同修炼过的植物,未来必然会更容易成为植物系魂兽,觉醒属于自己的智慧。 Takes out the dry ra­tions, has eaten with Tang Wu­tong sim­ply, they then once more start off. Through the ob­ser­va­tion of be­fore­hand Spir­i­tual Power re­la­tion plant to out­side, Huo Yuhao al­ready judged the en­vi­ron­ment the se­cu­rity. 取出干粮,和唐舞桐简单吃了,两人这才再次上路。通过之前精神力联系植物对外界的观察,霍雨浩早已判断出周围环境的安全。 Flew a while, Tang Wu­tong has re­vealed the color of sur­prise, „wasn't goes back? This di­rec­tion is not as if right.” Going back should fly to the East is right, but Huo Yuhao ac­tu­ally clearly draws her to fly to­ward the West now. 飞了一会儿,唐舞桐才流露出诧异之色,“不是回去吗？这个方向似乎不对。”回去应该是向东方飞行才对,可现在霍雨浩却分明拉着她在朝着西方飞。 Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: „I must to a First Se­nior Brother pleas­ant sur­prise, there­fore be­fore , had not said. Later you knew.” 霍雨浩微微一笑,道:“我要给大师兄一个惊喜,所以之前没说。待会儿你就知道了。” Tang Wu­tong pursed the lips, had not asked again that she closes the dou­ble pupil sim­ply, what­ever Huo Yuhao draws to fly, but one­self ac­tu­ally con­tinue the feel­ing that re­al­ized from ex­pe­ri­ence these plants to bring last night. 唐舞桐抿了抿嘴,却没有再问,她索性闭上双眸,任由霍雨浩拉着自己飞行,而自己却继续体悟昨晚那些植物带来的感受。 This pro­mo­tion for her is very im­por­tant, she is Ti­tled Douluo rank Soul Mas­ter, wants to con­tinue to pro­mote one­self to cul­ti­vate is, mind cul­ti­vates for the pro­mo­tion has very great sig­nif­i­cance. This will def­i­nitely ac­cel­er­ate the in­crease of her strength. 这种提升对她来说是非常重要的,她已经是封号斗罗级别魂师了,想要继续提升自身修为,精神修为的提升有着十分重大的意义。这必然会加速她实力的增强。 Con­tin­u­ously to west, dis­tant un­wind­ing Bright Cap­i­tal City, al­though the place vis­ited oc­ca­sion­ally will have as be­fore upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice to ap­pear, but Huo Yuhao will dodge ahead of time. His that for­mi­da­ble Spir­i­tual Power, is in it­self works as in this life most for­mi­da­ble Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice to be or­di­nary, does not need to be wor­ried that was dis­cov­ered. 一直向西,远远的绕开明都,虽然所过之处依旧会偶尔有高空探测魂导器出现,但霍雨浩都会提前进行规避。他那强大的精神力,本身就是当今世上最强大的探测魂导器一般,根本不需要担心被发现。 By­passed from the west side, cap­tures a big cir­cle to fly to south again, to­ward this di­rec­tion flew, with­out doubt was away from Shrek Acad­emy to be get­ting more and more far. 从西边绕过,兜了一个大圈子再一直向南飞行,朝着这个方向飞行,无疑是距离史莱克学院越来越远了。 After fly­ing a dou­ble-hour, Tang Wu­tong once more can­not bear ask: „Yuhao, ac­tu­ally we must go to where Ah?” 足足飞了一个时辰之后,唐舞桐才再次忍不住问道:“雨浩,我们究竟是要去什么地方啊？” Huo Yuhao mys­te­ri­ous smiles, said: „Still re­mem­bered last night feel­ing? I must lead you to go my first time to have this feel­ing place. To there, you will nat­u­rally un­der­stand. Quick, no rush.” 霍雨浩神秘的一笑,道:“还记得昨晚的感受吗？我要带你去我第一次有这种感觉的地方。到了那里,你自然就会明白了。快了,别急。” Also half dou­ble-hour, Huo Yuhao holds the hand of Tang Wu­tong then to fall to­ward the ground, at this time weather al­ready greatly bright, the sun­light such as flam­ings, the south­ern tem­per­a­ture be much higher than the north, the land sur­face tem­per­a­ture did not lower at this time, nice and warm feel­ing at­tack body, but, has the cool aura that on Huo Yuhao lends, all sum­mer heat will be scat­tered by the na­ture. 又半个时辰,霍雨浩拉着唐舞桐的手这才朝着地面上落去,此时天色已经大亮,阳光如炽,南方的温度本就要比北方高得多,此时地表温度已经不低了,暖热的感觉侵袭身体,不过,有霍雨浩身上散发出的清凉气息,一切暑气都会被自然驱散。 Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wu­tong to fall to ground, has dis­tin­guished sim­ply the sur­round­ing sit­u­a­tion, has lo­cated the po­si­tion prob­a­bly. Then he drew Tang Wu­tong to lie down on the ground. 霍雨浩拉着唐舞桐落向地面,简单的辨别了一下周围的情况,大概确定了位置。然后他就那么拉着唐舞桐在地上躺了下来。 mind thinks of the feel­ing to ex­tend, again out­ward ex­pands, under am­pli­fi­ca­tion of plants, passes on by far. 精神思感延伸,再一次向外扩张开来,在植物们的增幅下,远远传去。 The time is not long, Huo Yuhao sets out, at this time Tang Wu­tong some­what un­der­stood, Huo Yuhao has cer­tainly dis­cov­ered any­thing, but thing that he dis­cov­ers, with­out doubt is very im­por­tant, oth­er­wise he will not catch up at this time. 时间不长,霍雨浩重新起身,此时唐舞桐已经有些明白了,霍雨浩一定是发现了什么,而他发现的东西,无疑是十分重要的,否则他也不会在这个时候赶过来。 Jumps, has not needed Flight Soul Guid­ance De­vice, Huo Yuhao to draw Tang Wu­tong again to­ward di­rec­tion bar­rel. The free time of a while, val­ley ap­peared in their line of sight. 腾身而起,没有再用飞行魂导器,霍雨浩拉着唐舞桐朝着一个方向快速行进。一会儿的工夫,一座山谷就出现在了他们视线之中。 „Should be here!” Stands in the val­ley edge down­ward bird's eye view, the moun­tain wall is quite gen­tle, is grow­ing every­where Blue Sil­ver Grass of cover, the fra­grance of in­ter­mit­tent green grass will move to head on along with the cool breeze, in green grass, but also is mix­ing with var­i­ous color flo­rets, is par­tic­u­larly beau­ti­ful. Looks, the sea that this piece of Blue Sil­ver Grass and fresh flower com­pose has spread to val­ley, en­tire val­ley is in the light cyan color is em­bell­ish­ing the in­nu­mer­able gem gen­eral feel­ings. “应该就是这里了！”站在山谷边缘向下俯瞰,山壁较为平缓,到处都生长着茂密的蓝银草,阵阵青草的芬芳会随着清风吹动扑面而来,青草中,还夹杂着各种颜色的小花,分外美丽。一眼望去,这片蓝银草与鲜花组成的海洋一直蔓延到山谷内部,整个山谷都是淡淡的蓝绿色上点缀着无数宝石一般的感觉。 ----------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------------- 1200 ticket in ad­di­tion came, our ag­gres­sive side leaks de­liv­ers every­body one hun­dred bit word num­ber many big chap­ters. Con­tin­ues to ask the monthly ticket, an­tic­i­pates 1600 char­ac­ters 1200票加更来了,咱们霸气侧漏的送大家一个百位字数多的大章。继续求月票,期待1600字

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #555 On fall heart


„Here is quite beau­ti­ful. 79 read” Tang Wu­tong un­able to bear to praise sigh free. “这里好美。79免费阅”唐舞桐忍不住赞叹道。 Huo Yuhao he he smiles, „! Quite beau­ti­ful. Walks, we have a look.” Tang Wu­tong is jump­ing, this time again has not ac­tu­ally fallen to the ground, but re­lies on Soul Power is main­tain­ing the flight al­ti­tude, the dis­tance fends, be only one foot, ac­tu­ally does not fall. In so the beau­ti­ful scene, is re­ally not cruel enough to tram­ple these vi­tal­ity ex­u­ber­ant Blue Sil­ver Grass! 霍雨浩呵呵一笑,“是啊！好美。走,我们下去看看。”拉着唐舞桐腾身而起,这次却没有再落地,而是凭借着魂力保持飞行高度,距离闪避只有一尺,却绝不落下。在如此美景之中,实在是不忍心去践踏这些生命力旺盛的蓝银草啊！ More flies to val­ley, the air be­comes is fresh, green grass orig­i­nally fra­grant, but also were many some light flower fra­grances. Oc­ca­sion­ally has the hon­ey­bee and but­ter­fly to fly, picks the nec­tar and pollen, this com­pletely is a pic­ture of par­adise. 越是向山谷内部飞去,空气就变得越是清新,原本的青草芬芳中,还多了一些淡淡的花香。偶尔有蜜蜂、蝴蝶飞过,采撷花蜜、花粉,这完全是一片世外桃源的景象。 Quick, they ar­rived at bot­tom of val­ley, here not big trees, but Blue Sil­ver Grass was ac­tu­ally sim­i­lar to the rug gen­er­ally over­spread en­tire val­ley, has not re­vealed the least bit land. 很快,他们来到了山谷底部,这里没有高大的树木,但蓝银草却如同地毯一般铺满了整个山谷,没有露出半点土地。 Huo Yuhao holds the hand of Tang Wu­tong, in the pupil light is glit­ter­ing the light happy ex­pres­sion, from here en­vi­ron­ment, should find it hope­fully. 霍雨浩拉着唐舞桐的手,眸光中闪烁着淡淡喜色,从这里的环境来看,应该是有希望找到它吧。 In the eye the ray dodges again, Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual Power flows swiftly to ex­tend just like the mer­cury gen­er­ally out­ward, this time has not gone with the plant fu­sion, but is pure searches to ob­serve by one­self Spir­i­tual Power out­ward. 眼中光芒再闪,霍雨浩的精神力宛如水银泻地一般向外延伸而出,他这次没有去和植物融合,而是单纯的凭借自己精神力向外探察。 Once were spread by his Spir­i­tual Power, all in en­tire val­ley will not have to hide under his in­ves­ti­ga­tion. 一旦被他的精神力散布开来,那么,整个山谷内的一切也都将在他的探查之下无所遁形。 In this time, sud­denly, in ground orig­i­nally very tran­quil Blue Sil­ver Grass slight trem­bles, leave of grass as if felt any­thing to re­sem­ble a piece by piece, stood erect. Gets up just like sharp thorn gen­eral up­ward peaks. The orig­i­nal har­mo­nious aura was re­placed by the dense chill in the air im­me­di­ately. 正在这时,突然间,地面上原本十分平静的蓝银草们都轻微的震颤起来,紧接着,一片片草叶仿佛感受到了什么似的,根根竖立。宛如一根根尖刺一般向上耸起。本来的和谐气息顿时被森然寒意所代替。 „Ex­treme ner­vous­ness?” Tang Wu­tong some­what sur­prised say­ing. “草木皆兵？”唐舞桐有些惊讶的说道。 Be­cause of the sub­li­ma­tion of last night mind thought that this time she, was es­pe­cially keen to the feel­ing of plant aura, she be­lieves that she can feel, Huo Yuhao also cer­tainly. 因为昨晚精神意念的升华,此时的她,对植物气息的感受格外敏锐,她相信,自己能够感受到的,霍雨浩也一定可以。 Huo Yuhao ac­tu­ally main­tains com­po­sure, is feel­ing the hos­til­ity of these Blue Sil­ver Grass trans­mit­ting silently. 霍雨浩却是不动声色,默默的感受着从这些蓝银草之中传来的敌意。 That is the pure hos­til­ity, rea­son is also very sim­ple, that be­cause of spy­ing on Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual Power. Pure Blue Sil­ver Grass nat­u­rally does not have this abil­ity. They can achieve so, with­out doubt one like Huo Yuhao can with their mind link ex­is­tence, but this ex­is­tence, when Huo Yuhao with the plant re­la­tions and their re­la­tions are more in­ti­mate. 那是纯粹的敌意,原因也很简单,那就是因为霍雨浩精神力的窥探。单纯的蓝银草当然没有这种能力。它们能够做到如此,无疑是有一个像霍雨浩那样能够与它们精神联系在一起的存在,而这个存在,甚至要比霍雨浩和植物联系时与它们的关系更加亲密。 Huo Yuhao smiled. This time, he con­firmed. 霍雨浩笑了。这一次,他已经真的确认了。 The in­tense en­mity of the Blue Sil­ver Grass level ground trans­mit­ting just like blot­ting out the sky gen­eral, is af­fect­ing his Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion, may to all these, Huo Yuhao likely be any­thing had not ac­tu­ally felt that the whole per­son as be­fore is main­tain­ing con­di­tion orig­i­nally, Spir­i­tual Power also in the un­ceas­ing out­put out­ward. 从蓝银草坪传来的强烈敌意宛如铺天盖地一般,影响着他的精神探测,可对这一切,霍雨浩却像是什么都没感觉到似的,整个人依旧保持着原本的状态,精神力也在不断的向外输出。 Back, light golden light shadow starts to ap­pear, im­pres­sively Em­peror Aus­pi­cious Beast Three Eyed Golden Lion ap­pear­ance, at the same time. Eye of Des­tiny on his fore­head also along with it open­ing, gen­tle Light of Des­tiny sends out, Spir­i­tual Power that Huo Yuhao one­self re­leases also in­creases by the geo­met­ri­cal mul­ti­ple vi­o­lent. 背后,淡淡的金色光影开始显现出来,赫然正是帝皇瑞兽三眼金猊的模样,与此同时。他额头上的命运之眼也随之张开,柔和的命运之光随之散发,霍雨浩自身释放出的精神力也以几何倍数般暴增起来。 Blue Sil­ver Grass unites in the al­most in­stan­ta­neous to shat­ter of to­gether hos­til­ity in this for­mi­da­ble mind thought that but also at this mo­ment, Huo Yuhao supinely be­gins. A gen­tle Bai Se (White Color) ray pro­jects from Eye of Des­tiny, the in­jec­tion midair, changes into the in­nu­mer­able twin­kle stars the Bai Se (White Color) lu­mi­nous spots to drop from the clouds again, looks like the light rain is or­di­nary, is cov­er­ing en­tire Blue Sil­ver Grass val­ley. 蓝银草联合在一起的敌意在这强大的精神意念中几乎瞬间破碎,而也就在这时,霍雨浩仰起头。一道柔和的白色光芒从命运之眼中射出,射入半空,再化为无数星星点点的白色光点从天而降,就像是光雨一般,覆盖着整个蓝银草山谷。 Tang Wu­tong also sim­i­larly bathed in these light rain, her feel­ing was novel and com­fort­able, that com­pletely from named the lucky strength in one name. Al­though can­not di­rectly change any­thing, but has ac­tu­ally brought the fu­ture in­flu­ence. 唐舞桐也同样沐浴在了这些光雨之中,她的感受是新奇而舒适的,那完全是来自于一种名叫幸运的力量。虽然不能直接改变什么,但却带来了未来的影响。 Ad­ju­di­ca­tion of Des­tiny, lucky! 命运裁决,幸运！ Blue Sil­ver Grass val­ley rapid peace­ful, Blue Sil­ver Grass also again from hardly turned soft, all as if re­turned to nor­mal. Re­gard­ing these, only then the plant of most foun­da­tion in­stinct, their sen­sa­tions are being di­rectly are also sim­ply keen. 蓝银草山谷迅速安静了下来,蓝银草也重新从坚硬变成了柔软,一切似乎都恢复了正常。对于这些只有着最基础本能的植物来说,它们的感知是最为简单直接却又敏锐的。 Huo Yuhao took to them to be lucky. The Em­peror Aus­pi­cious Beast aura makes them ex­cited, the hos­til­ity that they just raised also in­stan­ta­neously be­comes noth­ing left, is un­able to have the half minute again. 霍雨浩带给了它们幸运。帝皇瑞兽的气息让它们兴奋,它们刚刚升起的敌意也瞬间变得荡然无存,再也无法存在半分了。 Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, „se­nior, why not comes out to meet. I do not have the hos­til­ity.” 霍雨浩微微一笑,“前辈,何不出来相见。我并没有敌意。” „Em­peror Aus­pi­cious Beast, on you have the Em­peror Aus­pi­cious Beast aura un­ex­pect­edly. Why?” A low and deep sound from con­veys in all di­rec­tions, as if these Blue Sil­ver Grass all are its loud­speaker, even if un­able to feel the po­si­tion that he is at truly by Huo Yuhao for­mi­da­ble Spir­i­tual Power. “帝皇瑞兽,你身上居然有帝皇瑞兽的气息。为什么？”一个低沉的声音从四面八方传来,似乎那些蓝银草全都是它的扩音器似的,哪怕是以霍雨浩强大的精神力也无法感受到他真正所在的位置。 „Be­cause she is my lover.” Even if work­ing as Tang Wu­tong, Huo Yuhao said such words as be­fore. “因为她是我的爱人。”哪怕是当着唐舞桐,霍雨浩依旧说出了这样的话。 Qiu'er for him, has paid own all, how is she Soul Beast? In the Huo Yuhao heart, for­ever the place be­longs to her rec­ol­lec­tion. 秋儿为了他,付出了自己的一切,她是魂兽又如何？在霍雨浩心中,永远有一块地方是属于她的回忆。 Tang Wu­tong looks like has not heard, on the face the look does not have the half minute to change, even also re­vealed grat­i­fied. Such man, truly is worth lov­ing! 唐舞桐就像是没听到似的,脸上神色没有半分变化,甚至还流露出了一丝欣慰。这样的男人,才是真正值得爱的啊！ That sound silent, „may your lover, turn into your abil­ity.” 那个声音沉默了一下,“可你的爱人,已经变成了你的能力。” Huo Yuhao was also silent, then he fell slowly, Blue Sil­ver Grass in ground vol­un­tar­ily hor­i­zon­tally but ac­tu­ally, mak­ing him sit cross-legged to sit down, Tang Wu­tong sits side him. 霍雨浩也沉默了,然后他缓缓的落了下来,地面上的蓝银草自行横倒,让他就那么盘膝坐下,唐舞桐坐在他身边。 Huo Yuhao loos­ened has gripped the hand of Tang Wu­tong, the look in eye pupil had some changes, thick sad in­tent spread. 霍雨浩松开了握住唐舞桐的手,眼眸中的神色出现了些许变化,浓浓的悲意随之蔓延而出。 He is not will­ing to re­call to mind that rec­ol­lec­tion, is, for Lit­tle Ya Teacher, he could not give a thought to that many. 他不愿意记起那段回忆,可是,为了小雅老师,他也顾不了那么多了。 Closed eyes, in his mind, pre­sented Wang Qiu'er. 闭合双眼,在他脑海中,出现了王秋儿。 Hand­ker­chief that was moved by the wind, that sees sud­denly, is shock­ing of God­dess of Light, starts, in he re­mem­bers that awak­ens. 那被风吹动的手帕,那骤然一见,属于光之女神的惊艳,开始在他记忆中唤醒。 „I called Wang Qiu'er!” The chilly sound, paces back and forth in the ear. “我叫王秋儿！”清冷的声音,在耳边徘徊。 When low and deep thun­der­ing, seems she catches up the heroic bear­ing. 低沉的轰鸣,仿佛是她发力时的英姿。 Golden Dragon Spear, trans­forms in­nu­mer­able light shadow in her hands, the for­mi­da­ble strength, mak­ing her rout en­e­mies. 黄金龙枪,在她手中幻化出无数光影,强大的力量,令她击溃一个又一个敌人。 But her ice-cold the silent gaze, is rep­re­sent­ing the gen­tle­ness of in­ner­most feel­ings all. Under ice-cold sem­blance, just like vol­canic erup­tion gen­eral pas­sion. 她冰冷而沉默的注视,无不代表着内心的温柔。冰冷的外表之下,是宛如火山爆发一般炽热的情感。 He is evad­ing, but she is ded­i­cated does not aban­don, pass­ing, each ar­ti­cle, re­ver­ber­ates in the Huo Yuhao mind un­ceas­ingly. 他在逃避,而她却执着不舍,过往的一幕幕,一桩桩,一件件,不断在霍雨浩脑海中回荡。 Until fi­nally, until that mo­ment, when she, for he lit his all du­ti­fully, changes into the in­tense ray that of­fers sac­ri­fices to in­te­grate that mo­ment of his body, he fi­nally knows one made a mis­take. Orig­i­nally in his heart, re­gard­less of how is not will­ing to ac­knowl­edge that al­ready had was her part. 直到最后,直到那一刻,当她为了他义无反顾的点燃了自己的一切,化为献祭的强烈光芒融入他身体的那一刻,他才终于知道自己错了。原来在他心中,无论多么不愿意承认,早已有了属于她的一部分。 His heart good pain and good pain. 他的心好痛、好痛。 After she of­fers sac­ri­fices, he also never on own ini­tia­tive re­calls all that had had at that time, be­cause he does not dare, does not dare. He fears this pain, but time that at this mo­ment, this pain raids, he is al­most un­able to breathe. 她献祭之后,他还从未主动去回忆过当时发生的一切,因为他不敢,真的不敢。他惧怕这种痛,而此时此刻,这份痛苦袭来的时候,他几乎无法呼吸。 The tears, al­ready cov­ered en­tirely his face. The body of his whole per­son in fierce is shiv­er­ing. Light golden ray re­ver­ber­ates in the air, his griev­ous mood, af­fected pe­riph­ery all Blue Sil­ver Grass and flow­ers. 泪水,早已布满他的面庞。他整个人的身体都在剧烈的颤抖着。淡淡的金色光芒在空气中回荡,他那充满悲伤的情绪,影响到了周围所有的蓝银草和花朵们。 They like dying of old age had low­ered the head gen­er­ally, is ac­com­pa­ny­ing him to be to­gether sad. 它们就像凋谢了一般垂下了头,在陪伴他一起悲伤。 Light golden light shadow be­hind grad­u­ally be­comes in him the con­geal­ing re­al­ity. Be­fore it ar­rives at his body, be­fore lift­ing the claw, wants to move him. But it fell even­tu­ally, low­ered the head, in the eye full is sad with does not aban­don. 淡淡的金色光影在他身后渐渐变得凝实。它走到他身前,抬起前爪,想要去碰触他。但它终究还是落了下来,低下了头,眼中满是悲伤与不舍。 In this time, a slen­der and fair palm has been ex­tend­ing, gripped its for­mer claw, Three Eyed Golden Lion has gained ground in con­ster­na­tion, it saw, was a sin­cere Li face cer­tainly. On the el­e­gant face is bring­ing light moved. 正在这时,一只纤细而白皙的手掌伸了过来,握住了它的前爪,三眼金猊愕然抬起头,它看到的,是一张真诚的绝丽面庞。俏脸上带着淡淡的伤感。 Three Eyed Golden Lion nod­ded to her gen­tly, the ray in eye pupil was also gen­tle. 三眼金猊向她轻轻点了点头,眼眸中的光芒也更加柔和了。 golden light dodges, Three Eyed Golden Lion light shadow in­te­grated Tang Wu­tong within the body sud­denly, the Tang Wu­tong body slight dither, has closed eyes. 金光一闪,三眼金猊光影骤然融入到了唐舞桐体内,唐舞桐的身体轻微的振颤了一下,随之闭上了双眼。 „Yuhao!” “雨浩！” A sum­mon gen­tly awak­ens from the im­mer­sion Huo Yuhao. He of hav­ing tears stream­ing down the face, opens the tear­ful eyes dim dou­ble pupil slowly. 一声轻轻的呼唤将霍雨浩从沉浸中唤醒。泪流满面的他,缓缓睁开泪眼朦胧的双眸。 This sum­mon was re­ally too fa­mil­iar, that chilly and in­to­na­tion, mak­ing his heart clutch in­stan­ta­neously tightly. 这声呼唤实在是太熟悉了,那份清冷和语调,令他的心瞬间揪紧。 „Qiu'er, sorry, Qiu'er.” Huo Yuhao was sob­bing call­ing out. “秋儿,对不起,秋儿。”霍雨浩哽咽着叫道。 A hand has ex­tended, is slen­der and pow­er­ful., From the Blue Sil­ver Grass level ground en­trains of Huo Yuhao gen­tly. 一只手伸了过来,修长而有力。轻轻一拉,将霍雨浩从蓝银草坪上拉拽而起。 Huo Yuhao has gawked star­ing, he saw that pair of chilly eye pupil, fa­mil­iar chill­i­ness, fa­mil­iar face. Chilly is full of sin­cere gen­tle. 霍雨浩愣了愣,他看到了那双清冷的眼眸,熟悉的清冷,熟悉的面庞。还有清冷中饱含的真挚温柔。 „Qiu'er and Qiu'er!” The Huo Yuhao whole per­son has tar­ried, the se­vere pain of in­ner­most feel­ings changes into the emo­tion of surge in­stan­ta­neously. He stretches out the arms sud­denly. Makes an ef­fort op­po­site she closely to sup­port into to cher­ish. “秋儿、秋儿！”霍雨浩整个人都呆住了,内心的剧痛瞬间化为彭湃的情感。他猛然张开双臂。用力将对面的她紧紧拥入自己怀中。 Qiu'er, she is Qiu'er. 秋儿,她是秋儿。 She walks arm in arm, in he cher­ishes, in the chilly eye pupil cold in­tent dis­si­pates grad­u­ally, dis­places, is in­com­pa­ra­ble sat­is­fac­tion. This sat­is­fac­tion from in­ner­most feel­ings. 她依偎在他怀中,清冷的眼眸中冷意渐渐消散,取而代之的,是无比的满足。这种满足源自于内心。 Does not have the strength of seal to shove open them. They such closely are hug­ging. The pain of Huo Yuhao in­ner­most feel­ings, gen­tle melts in that grad­u­ally, his whole per­son has also given full play to the vi­tal­ity. 没有封印的力量将他们推开。他们就那样紧紧拥抱着。霍雨浩内心的痛苦,在那份温柔中渐渐融化,他整个人也重新焕发了生机。 „Is Qiu'er, re­ally you? Real?” Huo Yuhao was sum­mon­ing in a soft voice. “秋儿,真的是你吗？真的吗？”霍雨浩轻声的呼唤着。 „Is I, Yuhao, is re­ally I. Ac­tu­ally, I con­tin­u­ously with you in same place. Do not be sad, ac­tu­ally, for me, per­haps this is the best re­sult.” “是我,雨浩,真的是我。其实,我一直都和你在一起。不要伤心,其实,对我来说,或许这本来就是最好的结果。” „But......” Huo Yuhao wants to say any­thing, but in the throat ac­tu­ally once more chokes up, can­not say even­tu­ally. “可是……”霍雨浩想说些什么,但喉中却再次哽住,终究没能说得出来。 „Not any­thing good, but. Ini­tially I like this chose , be­cause I think that this is most is good to us. I in­te­grated your body, be­came your part, does not have any strength to be able us to sep­a­rate again, this is I wants to ob­tain! But my spirit Soul Power quan­tity and source strength, by me with the aid of the con­trol of Power of Des­tiny, in­te­grated at that time also Dong'er within the body in deep sleep, there­fore, when she re­stores to re­mem­ber, the time of sober­ing, si­mul­ta­ne­ously had me and Dong'er abil­ity, quite there­fore I and Dong'er abil­ity union. My soul in your within the body, my abil­ity on Dong'er. There­fore, I have not left you re­ally!” “没什么好可是的。当初我这样选择,就是因为我认为这样是对我们最好的。我融入了你的身体,成为了你的一部分,再没有任何力量能够将我们分开,这正是我想要得到的啊！而我的灵魂力量和本源力量,被我借助命运之力的控制,融入到了当时还在沉睡中的冬儿体内,所以,当她恢复记忆,清醒过来的时候,同时就具备了我和冬儿的能力,相当于是我和冬儿的能力结合。我的灵魂在你体内,我的能力在冬儿身上。所以,我真的从来都没有离开过你啊！” -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------- Today also thinks three, to thank every­body's sup­port, in the evening also two, whether to re­quest the monthly ticket and rec­om­men­da­tion vote sup­port? Thanks po­litely every­body. 今天还想三更,以感谢大家的支持,晚上还有两更,可否请求月票和推荐票支持呢？拜谢大家。 Peer­less Tang Sect has writ­ten about the later pe­riod, it is ex­pected that by the end of the year fin­ished, in these months, hopes fi­nally spe­cially can have the book friends' great sup­port, sup­ports me to use the best con­di­tion to write the peer­less Tang Sect re­sult. 绝世唐门已经写到后期,预计在年底之前结束,在最后这几个月里,特别希望能够得到书友们的大力支持,支持我用最好的状态写好绝世唐门的结局。 The peer­less Tang Sect car­toon, passes on five pages newly, Old Mu en­ters the stage. Then was one's turn Wang Dong to enter the stage of­fi­cially. Every­body trans­mits in our pres­ti­gious plat­forms: Peer­less Tang Sect 124, con­sult. 绝世唐门漫画,新传五页,穆老出场。接下来就轮到王冬正式出场了。大家在我们的威信平台发送:绝世唐门124,进行查阅。 Joins our plat­form to be very sim­ple: Pres­tige - top right-hand cor­ner plus sign - in­creases friend - search pub­lic num­ber - searches Tang three few, has the au­then­ti­ca­tion, is our Tang Sect fam­ily|home, there, can ex­am­ine our car­toons eas­ily. Trans­mis­sion peer­less Tang Sect adds the cap­i­tal let­ter fig­ure then. For ex­am­ple: Peer­less Tang Sect one, to: Peer­less Tang Sect 124, all have car­toon to cor­re­spond, will reply au­to­mat­i­cally. 加入我们平台很简单:威信-右上角加号-添加朋友-查找公众号-搜索唐家三少,带认证的,就是我们唐门的家,在那里,可以轻易查看我们的漫画哦。发送绝世唐门加大写数字即可。譬如:绝世唐门一,一直到:绝世唐门124,皆有漫画对应,会自动回复。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #555 In fall heart


„Yuhao, I am quite happy, do you know? At this mo­ment, my first time true feels you to my love, this was for me enough. Well and Dong'er in the same place, re­gard­less of she is Dong'er or Tang Wu­tong, she is your most loves, but I am part that you most love. From the be­gin­ning when in­car­na­tion for her ap­pear­ance, ac­tu­ally I lost, I will never de­feat Dong'er. I love you, she loves you, but in your heart has one to be in love to me, but your en­tire heart is her. The pre­sent re­sult, is most per­fect. Later like this should not be again sad, your this, I will be sad­der. Thinks my time, holds Wu­tong, you and she in the same place, were I in the same place. I and she, and you, al­ready shared every­thing.” “雨浩,我好开心,你知道吗？此时此刻,我第一次真正感受到你对我的爱,这对我来说已经足够了。好好和冬儿在一起吧,无论她是冬儿还是唐舞桐,她才是你的最爱,而我则是你最爱的一部分。从一开始化身为她的模样时,其实我就已经输了,我永远都不可能战胜冬儿的。我爱你,她更加爱你,而你心中对我有一丝爱恋,可你的整个心都是她的。现在的结果,已经是最完美的。以后都不要再这样伤心了,你这样,我会更加难过。想我的时候,就多抱抱舞桐,你和她在一起,就是和我在一起了。我和她、和你,早已不分彼此。” Huo Yuhao dull lis­tens to Wang Qiu'er to nar­rate, he un­der­stands fi­nally why after Wang Dong'er turns into Tang Wu­tong, Mar­tial Soul will have such vari­a­tion, why she can also use Golden Dragon Spear, orig­i­nally, in within the body, re­ally re­ally has to be­long to the Wang Qiu'er strength! Source and soul. 霍雨浩呆呆的听着王秋儿讲述着,他终于明白为什么王冬儿变成唐舞桐之后,武魂会产生那样的变异,为什么她也能够使用黄金龙枪,原来,在她体内,竟然真的是有属于王秋儿的力量啊！本源与灵魂。 „Qiu'er, you pay for me were too many.” “秋儿,你为我付出的太多了。” Wang Qiu'er shows a faint smile, said: „In I offer sac­ri­fices be­fore you, are you will­ing to pay with your life for me? Al­though you were de­lib­er­ately bad be­cause of the Dong'er deep sleep at that time, but I sat­isfy as be­fore. Yuhao, I love you, trea­sures it­self well, re­mem­ber, I through­out side you, your here.” 王秋儿微微一笑,道:“在我为你献祭之前,你又何尝不是愿意为我付出自己的生命呢？尽管那时你是因为冬儿的沉睡而自暴自弃,可我依旧满足。雨浩,我爱你,好好爱惜自己,记住,我始终在你身边,在你这里。” At the same time was say­ing, she lifts hand, gen­tly is stroking Eye of Des­tiny on Huo Yuhao fore­head, his en­tire fore­head. 一边说着,她抬起手,轻轻的抚摸着霍雨浩额头上的命运之眼,还有他的整个额头。 Yes! In there, the po­si­tion that Three Eyed Golden Lion Des­tiny Skull is. 是啊！在那里,正是三眼金猊命运头骨所在的位置。 The light golden color, from the Tang Wu­tong within the body sep­a­ra­tion, in­te­grates in the Huo Yuhao body, Huo Yuhao feels, is one be­yond de­scrip­tion heads on gen­tly. Is smooth­ing the pain and sad­ness of his in­ner­most feel­ings. 淡淡的金色,从唐舞桐体内分离而出,重新融入到霍雨浩身体之中,霍雨浩感受到的,是一股难以形容的温柔扑面而来。抚平着他内心的痛苦与悲伤。 Tang Wu­tong walks arm in arm as be­fore, in he cher­ishes, has not set out. But the Huo Yuhao tears also stopped. Yes! Qiu'er con­tin­u­ously in my within the body. 唐舞桐依旧依偎在他怀中,没有起身。而霍雨浩的泪水也随之止住了。是啊！秋儿一直都在我体内。 Long time! 良久！ The tear stains on Huo Yuhao face are fi­nally dry, lower the head to have a look at bosom peo­ple, gen­tly is stroking that pink-blue color big wave long hair. Huo Yuhao sum­moned in a soft voice: „Wu­tong.” 霍雨浩脸上的泪痕终于干涸,低头看看怀中人儿,轻轻的抚摸着那粉蓝色的大波浪长发。霍雨浩轻声呼唤道:“舞桐。” Tang Wu­tong gains ground. Gives him to smile. 唐舞桐抬起头。给他以微笑。 „Sorry!” Huo Yuhao said in a soft voice. “对不起！”霍雨浩轻声说道。 Tang Wu­tong wicked is look­ing steadily at him, „I must give you to pun­ish.” 唐舞桐恶狠狠的盯视着他,“我要给你惩罚。” „Um?” Huo Yuhao stares. “嗯？”霍雨浩一愣。 The mild red lip kissed his flow­ery lips at this mo­ment. That gen­tle touch, the light del­i­cate fra­grance, is mix­ing being in love of Dong'er and Qiu'er, is at­tack­ing Huo Yuhao all in­stan­ta­neously. 温润的红唇就在这时吻上了他的唇瓣。那温柔的触感,淡淡的清香,还有混合着冬儿与秋儿的爱恋,瞬间冲击着霍雨浩的一切。 But under flick­ers. golden light sticks out sud­denly, the body of Huo Yuhao flies ac­cord­ingly, from the sky puts an ex­quis­ite path. 但下一瞬。金光暴起,霍雨浩的身体应声而飞,在空中划出一道优美的轨迹。 Back Flight Soul Guid­ance De­vice opens, the Soul Power out­put, re­luc­tantly con­trols own per­sonal ap­pear­ance. 背后飞行魂导器张开,魂力输出,才勉强控制住自己的身形。 Dong'er some­what cares about emo­tion be­tween him and Qiu'er even­tu­ally, penalty that but this kisses, is ac­tu­ally such **. In that flick­ers. He as if feels, is two is in love. 冬儿终究还是有些在意他和秋儿之间的情感,但这一吻的惩罚,却是那样的**。在那一瞬。他仿佛感受到的,是两份爱恋。 Con­trols own per­sonal ap­pear­ance, the dou­ble pupil of Huo Yuhao also be­came Pure Bright­ness. Tang Wu­tong eye in­clud­ing pro­found mean­ing vis­its him, he smiles. Flies back to Tang Wu­tong side, has held on her hand. 控制住自己的身形,霍雨浩的双眸也已经重新变得清明。唐舞桐眼含深意的看着他,他嘿嘿一笑。重新飞回到唐舞桐身边,拉住了她的手。 „world of hu­man­ity, is re­ally com­plex. Has not thought that you can ac­tu­ally ob­tain being in love of Three Eyed Golden Lion, Em­peror Aus­pi­cious Beast!” Be­fore the low and deep sound voiced in­ter­mit­tent opin­ions. “人类的世界,真是复杂。没想到,你竟然能够获得三眼金猊的爱恋,帝皇瑞兽啊！”之前低沉的声音发出阵阵感叹。 „Do you be­lieve now?” Huo Yuhao light ask­ing. In­ner­most feel­ings most painful was ini­ti­ated sadly, but also made him see Wang Qiu'er, un­der­stood then all fi­nally, this for him, not only the pain, was an ex­tri­ca­tion, mak­ing his Spir­i­tual Con­scious­ness more in­sight­ful. “你现在相信了？”霍雨浩淡淡的问道。内心最痛的悲伤被引发出来,但也让他见到了王秋儿,也终于明白了当时的一切,这对他来说,不只是痛苦,同时也是一份解脱,让他的灵识更加通透。 „Um. You look for me, what wants to make?” The low and deep sound said. “嗯。那你来找我,想要做什么？”低沉的声音说道。 After Huo Yuhao has hes­i­tated one next, said: „I have a very im­por­tant friend, she was af­fected by Evil Soul Mas­ter, the body source re­ceives heavy wound, but her Mar­tial Soul, is Blue Sil­ver Grass. Wish makes her re­store, needs your strength. There­fore, I hope that can ob­tain a piece of your leave of grass. Nat­u­rally, I will not take some­thing for free, you can put for­ward the con­di­tion, so long as is I can achieve, cer­tainly does every­thing pos­si­ble. I want to ex­change with you.” 霍雨浩沉吟了一下后,道:“我有位很重要的朋友,她受到邪魂师影响,身体本源受到重创,而她的武魂,正是蓝银草。想要让她恢复,就需要您的力量。所以,我希望能够得到一片您的草叶。当然,我不会白要的,您可以提出条件,只要是我能做到的,一定尽力而为。我只是想和您交换。” Low and deep sound silent, „you are very for­mi­da­ble, from you, I can feel the in­tense dan­ger. But you have the as­sis­tance of Em­peror Aus­pi­cious Beast, you com­pletely are ca­pa­ble of rout­ing me, then brings my corpse to de­part. Why not?” 低沉的声音沉默了一下,“你很强大,从你身上,我能感受到强烈的危险。而你又有帝皇瑞兽的辅助,你完全有能力击溃我,然后带我的尸体离去。为什么不？” Huo Yuhao sin­cere [say / way]: „I had pledged, only if self-de­fense, oth­er­wise, no longer on own ini­tia­tive strikes to kill any Soul Beast cer­tainly. There­fore, I only want to ex­change with you.” 霍雨浩真诚的道:“我发过誓,除非是自卫,否则,绝不再主动击杀任何一只魂兽。所以,我只想和您交换。” The low and deep sound some­what is ob­vi­ously sur­prised, „you as human Soul Mas­ter, ac­tu­ally pledged that doesn't kill our Soul Beast?” 低沉的声音明显有些惊讶,“你作为一个人类魂师,竟然发誓不杀我们魂兽？” Huo Yuhao nod­ded, said: „Yes! I es­tab­lished the spirit sys­tem, can thus not kill Soul Beast also to ob­tain the strength.” At that mo­ment, he nar­rated his spirit sys­tem sim­ply, and most di­rect has re­leased Oc­tag­o­nal Mys­te­ri­ous Ice Grass. 霍雨浩点了点头,道:“是的！我创立了魂灵体系,从而可以不杀魂兽也能获得力量。”当下,他将自己的魂灵体系简单的讲述了一遍,并且最直接的将八角玄冰草释放了出来。 Oc­tag­o­nal Mys­te­ri­ous Ice Grass is also plant at­tribute Soul Beast, re­gard­ing the in­duc­tions of these plant Soul Beast ob­vi­ously is most di­rect. 八角玄冰草也是植物系魂兽,对于这些植物魂兽的感应显然是最为直接的。 Re­ally, sees Oc­tag­o­nal Mys­te­ri­ous Ice Grass, lis­tened to nar­ra­tion of Huo Yuhao again, that low and deep sound ob­vi­ously be­came gen­tle. 果然,看到八角玄冰草,再听了霍雨浩的讲述,那低沉的声音明显变得柔和了。 „Thank you, can con­sider for our Soul Beast. Only this point, I be­lieve that I can help you. How­ever, I......” “感谢你,能够为我们魂兽着想。单是这一点,我认为,我可以帮你。不过,我……” Here, that low and deep sound silent sev­eral points. 说到这里,那低沉的声音沉默了几分。 Huo Yuhao heart one tight, found this with great dif­fi­culty, if it does not want, Huo Yuhao be­cause of the rea­son of pledge, but also can­not force it, in that case, can be good? Lit­tle Ya Teacher also waits for its strength to treat! 霍雨浩心头一紧,好不容易才找到这位,如果它不愿意的话,霍雨浩因为誓言的缘故,还真的不能勉强它,那样的话,可怎么才好？小雅老师还等着它的力量去治疗啊！ „You have any awk­ward place say­ing that if pos­si­ble, I whole-heart­edly help cer­tainly you solve.” Al­though Huo Yuhao also know that their ex­pres­sion was too anx­ious, is, for Tang Ya, he makes no mis­take. “您有什么为难的地方就说出来吧,如果可以的话,我一定全力以赴帮您解决。”虽然霍雨浩自己也知道自己的语气太急切了,可是,为了唐雅,他真的不容有失。 That low and deep sound sighed, said: „I sur­vived for 190,000 years on this world. How­ever, I even­tu­ally am only Blue Sil­ver Grass lin­eage/vein, even if I be­came sov­er­eign, but the rea­son of it­self tal­ent, mak­ing me sim­ply not have any pos­si­bly to break through the fol­low­ing day to pun­ish. There­fore, my life must come to the end. Per­haps, your means that will take to me fresh­man.” 那低沉的声音叹息一声,道:“我已经在这个世界上生存了190000年了。但是,我终究只是蓝银草一脉,哪怕是我已经成为皇者,可本身天赋的原因,让我根本没有任何可能突破接下来的天罚。所以,我的生命就要走到尽头了。或许,你的办法,会带给我新生。” Huo Yuhao hear­ing this great hap­pi­ness, but he said: „But you can choose the road of re­pair­ing! Hasn't Soul Beast to the bot­tle­neck, been able to re­pair?” 霍雨浩闻言大喜,但他还是说道:“但您可以选择重修之路啊！魂兽到了瓶颈,不是可以重修么？” „You have made a mis­take, that is 100,000 years of time. Has wanted 100,000 years, some time does not have the choice to re­pair, is un­able to take that road again. But I ap­proached 200,000 years of cat­e­gory now, there­fore, I can­not. Per­haps some for­mi­da­ble Soul Beast can think of other means that is, I am not good! This is the back­ground rea­son of it­self blood­lines.” “你弄错了,那是100000年的时候。只要过了100000年,在一段时间没有选择重修的话,就无法再走那条路了。而我现在已经接近200000年的范畴,所以,我不能。或许一些强大的魂兽能够想到其他办法,可是,我不行啊！这就是本身血脉的底蕴原因。” Huo Yuhao then sud­denly, Blue Sil­ver Grass must un­ex­pect­edly be Blue Sil­ver Grass, even if be­came Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, own back­ground will have the issue as be­fore. In this case, it does not have the means like Snow Em­peror, re­pairs in tall Xi­uwei. Thinks is also, by Snow Em­peror ini­tially the Ice Heav­enly Snow Woman tal­ent, 700,000 years of strong over­haul was , can only be the choice be­comes the em­bryo, caused af­ter­ward to meet with the dis­as­ter, fi­nally be­came the own first spirit, this Blue Sil­ver Em­peror strength, com­pared with Snow Em­peror, must miss was too far. 霍雨浩这才恍然,蓝银草必竟是蓝银草,哪怕已经成为了蓝银皇,自身底蕴依旧会有问题。在这种情况下,它就没办法像雪帝那样,在高修为也进行重修。想想也是,以雪帝当初冰天雪女的天赋,700000年的强大修为,也只能是选择重新成为胚胎,才导致后来遭逢大难,最终成为了自己的第一个魂灵,这蓝银皇的实力,和雪帝相比,就要差的太远了。 Huo Yuhao said: „So long as you want, this nat­u­rally is not the issue, I can lead you to go back, let you and my friend fuse. You can feel re­lieved that my friend tal­ent is ex­tremely high, is only slightly longer than me two years old , has eight rings to cul­ti­vate. If can in soon in the fu­ture be­come her ninth Soul Ring by you, be­lieves her in our hu­man­ity world, will be­come most top pow­er­house.” 霍雨浩道:“只要您愿意,这当然不是问题,我可以带您回去,让您和我的那位朋友进行融合。您可以放心,我那位朋友天赋极高,只是比我略长两岁,却也有八环修为了。如果能够由您在不久将来成为她的第九魂环,相信她在我们人类世界中,也将成为最顶级的强者。” „Um, good, that trou­bled you.” Blue Sil­ver Em­peror sat­is­fied say­ing. “嗯,好,那就麻烦你了。”蓝银皇满意的说道。 Also at this mo­ment, Blue Sil­ver Grass in val­ley slight trem­bles, this time no longer is the fear and hos­til­ity, dis­places, is ex­cited and ex­cited. 也就在这时,山谷内的蓝银草都轻微的震颤起来,这次不再是恐惧和敌意,取而代之的,是兴奋与激动。 The dis­tant place, in Huo Yuhao mind world feels to be sim­i­lar the pythons to ap­pear gen­eral, from col­lects in all di­rec­tions in his here di­rec­tion. 远处,霍雨浩的精神世界中感受到仿佛有一条条巨蟒出现一般,从四面八方朝着他这边的方向汇集过来。 Thick blue vines along with it rais­ing up, gather fi­nally. Each vine seems is such glit­ter­ing and translu­cent carv­ing, in­sight­ful is or­di­nary just like the blue crys­tal, the in­te­rior has to be sim­i­lar to the leaf vein com­mon fluc­tu­a­tion cir­cu­la­tion. 一条条粗大的蓝色藤蔓随之竖起,最终聚集在一起。每一条藤蔓看上去都是那样的晶莹剔透,通透的宛如蓝水晶一般,内部却有类似于叶脉一般的波动流转。 These vines coil around fast in the same place, un­ex­pect­edly changes into the face ap­pear­ance, he to­ward Huo Yuhao nod of gen­tly, then hov­ers to­ward Huo Yuhao, coils around in his side, changes into the human form grad­u­ally. 这些藤蔓快速盘绕在一起,居然化为人脸模样,他朝着霍雨浩轻轻的点了点头,然后朝着霍雨浩游动过来,在他身边盘绕,渐渐化为人形。 How­ever, its this human form may not be the Fe­ro­cious Beasts rank pow­er­house truly changes into the human ap­pear­ance, hu­man­ity that but be­comes by the vine ac­cu­mu­la­tion, looks like, but the thick vine that weaves all con­tracted changes is small, changes into, only then thumb thick or thin ap­pear­ance. It seems grotesque. 不过,它这人形可就不是凶兽级别强者真正化为人类模样了,而是由藤蔓聚集而成的人类,就像是编织出来的似的,而原本粗大的藤蔓则是全都收缩变小,化为只有拇指粗细的模样。看上去怪模怪样的。 „I fol­low you.” Blue Sil­ver Em­peror said. “我跟你们走。”蓝银皇如是说道。 Huo Yuhao nod­ded to him, said: „Thank your trust.” 霍雨浩向他点了点头,道:“感谢您的信任。” Blue Sil­ver Em­peror grin­ning, seems is smil­ing, „ac­tu­ally, I am be­lieve that Em­peror Aus­pi­cious Beast vi­sion, its choice can­not be wrong.” 蓝银皇咧了咧嘴,似乎是在笑,“其实,我是相信帝皇瑞兽的眼光,它的选择不会错的。” Tang Wu­tong some­what cu­ri­ous looks at Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, at this time she un­der­stands com­pletely Huo Yuhao came this place the goal, but, she looks that the Blue Sil­ver Em­peror vi­sion was also clearly con­tain­ing some spe­cial mean­ing. 唐舞桐有些好奇的看着蓝银皇,此时她已经完全明白霍雨浩前来此地的目的了,只是,她看着蓝银皇的目光分明还包含着一些特殊意味。 Huo Yuhao nod­ded to Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, said: „That in­vited you with us to­gether.” Is hold­ing the hand of Tang Wu­tong, the launch­ing, si­mul­ta­ne­ously he also reached Blue Sil­ver Em­peror his mind an­tenna slowly. 霍雨浩向蓝银皇点了点头,道:“那请您跟我们一起。”牵着唐舞桐的手,徐徐起飞,同时他也将自己的精神触角伸向了蓝银皇。 At the be­gin­ning, Blue Sil­ver Em­peror has also hes­i­tated, but quick Blue Sil­ver Em­peror on the sur­prised dis­cov­ery, in the Huo Yuhao mind an­tenna, ac­tu­ally con­tained is being the mind fluc­tu­a­tion of plant to exist, al­though that was only his Im­i­ta­tion comes out, but this feel­ing was ac­tu­ally such well-mean­ing and kind­ness, sub­con­scious, it also re­leased her Spir­i­tual Power and Huo Yuhao is con­nected. 刚开始的时候,蓝银皇还迟疑了一下,但很快蓝银皇就惊讶的发现,在霍雨浩的精神触角之中,竟然包含着一些属于植物的精神波动存在,尽管那只是他模拟出来的,但这份感觉却是那么的善意与亲切,下意识的,它也释放出自己的精神力与霍雨浩相连。 Each other mind in­ter­con­nec­tion, Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion and Shar­ing opens im­me­di­ately, trans­mits through all that Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion feels to Blue Sil­ver Em­peror. 彼此精神相互连接,霍雨浩的精神探测共享顿时开启,将自己通过精神探测感受到的一切传递给蓝银皇。 --------------------------------------------------- --------------------------------------------------- Sec­ond, be­hind also has. 第二更,后面还有哦。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #555 Under fall heart


The Blue Sil­ver Em­peror whole body shakes slightly, trans­forms a pair of blue eye pupil that be­comes with the vine sur­prised looks to Huo Yuhao, „has not thought that your Spir­i­tual Power so is un­ex­pect­edly for­mi­da­ble.” 蓝银皇全身微微一震,用藤蔓幻化而成的一双蓝色眼眸吃惊的看向霍雨浩,“没想到,你的精神力竟然如此强大。” The in­tense mind fluc­tu­a­tion also re­leases from Blue Sil­ver Em­peror along with it, feeds back Huo Yuhao. Huo Yuhao feels, is ac­tu­ally in en­tire val­ley each slight change, Blue Sil­ver Em­peror un­ex­pect­edly by one­self as the medium, help­ing him re­late on val­ley all Blue Sil­ver Grass. 强烈的精神波动也随之从蓝银皇身上释放而出,反馈霍雨浩。霍雨浩感受到的,却是整个山谷内每一处细微的变化,蓝银皇竟是以自己作为媒介,帮他联系上了山谷中所有的蓝银草。 Per­son of Soul Beast, smiled, to feel each other that sin­cer­ity, the si­mul­ta­ne­ous ac­cel­er­a­tion, rose to the upper air. 一人一魂兽,相视一笑,都感受到了彼此的那份诚意,同时加速,向高空升去。 Blue Sil­ver Em­peror some­what was sigh­ing the [say / way]: „If your Mar­tial Soul and I can agree with, per­haps, I re­turned to choose you. You are very for­mi­da­ble, al­though my tal­ent and for­mi­da­ble Soul Beast com­pares is not any­thing, but our Blue Sil­ver Clan sen­sa­tion is ac­tu­ally very keen, from you, I will feel a fu­ture be­yond de­scrip­tion.” 蓝银皇有些感叹着道:“如果你的武魂和我能够契合,或许,我就回选择你了。你很强大,真的,虽然我的天赋和许多强大的魂兽相比不算什么,但我们蓝银一族的感知却是十分敏锐的,从你身上,我感觉到了一种难以形容的未来。” Huo Yuhao he he smiles, said: „You saw friend of mine, will not be cer­tainly dis­ap­pointed, her Mar­tial Soul is in it­self Blue Sil­ver Grass, you should know that in our hu­man­ity, can by the per­son of Blue Sil­ver Grass prac­tice, re­ally be very few, but the true prac­tice upper dog, ac­tu­ally once one was the true big en­ergy. That, is my se­nior.” 霍雨浩呵呵一笑,道:“等您见到我的朋友,也一定不会失望的,她的武魂本身就是蓝银草,您应该知道,在我们人类之中,能够以蓝银草修炼的人,实在是少之又少,而真正修炼成功者,却曾经有一位是真正的大能。那位,也是我的前辈。” Blue Sil­ver Em­peror nods the head slightly, said: „I know what you said is.” 蓝银皇微微颔首,道:“我知道你说的是谁。” „?” Huo Yuhao some­what sur­prised looks at Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, „do you know?” “哦？”霍雨浩有些惊讶的看着蓝银皇,“您知道？” Blue Sil­ver Em­peror nod­ded, said: „Our Blue Sil­ver Clan, al­though is small and weak, but the vi­tal­ity is al­most all plants is most ex­u­ber­ant, is on en­tire Douluo Con­ti­nent the quan­tity has most one plant. Our root sys­tems and Spir­i­tual Power each other are con­nected, there­fore, has any Blue Sil­ver Clan im­por­tant mat­ter, our these Blue Sil­ver Clan pow­er­houses will be able to feel.” 蓝银皇点了点头,道:“我们蓝银一族虽然弱小,但生命力却几乎是所有植物最为旺盛的,也是整个斗罗大陆上数量存在最多的一种植物。我们的根系和精神力彼此相连,所以,有任何蓝银一族的大事,我们这些蓝银一族强者都会感受得到。” „The prac­tice of our Blue Sil­ver Grass, and your hu­man­ity has Blue Sil­ver Grass Mar­tial Soul Soul Mas­ter to be equally rare. Must have the big des­tiny, ob­tains strength of in ad­di­tion world to hold has the pos­si­bil­ity of prac­tice. I once re­ceived heav­enly thun­der bap­tism three times. Within the body has the strength of thun­der spirit, thus is re­born. That I who you said also know that she is ac­tu­ally pure of blood­lines, is the true Blue Sil­ver Clan Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily blood­lines. Your human big en­er­gies. Is her child. Fi­nally is sep­a­rated from the limit of this world, true to turn into a god.. Being in di­rect line of that Blue Sil­ver Em­peror room, I must call one on main.” “我们蓝银草的修炼,和你们人类拥有蓝银草武魂的魂师一样稀有。必须是有大气运,获得过天地之力加持者才有修炼的可能。我曾经受天雷洗礼三次。体内具备雷灵之力,从而脱胎换骨。你说的那位我也知道,她却是血脉的纯粹,乃是真正的蓝银一族皇室血脉。你们那位人类大能。就是她的孩子。最终脱离这个世界的限制,真正成神。算起来。那位蓝银皇室的嫡传,我还要称一声主上。” Huo Yuhao has not thought that this Blue Sil­ver Em­peror and ini­tially the Tang Sect an­ces­tor Tang San mother re­ally also had such re­la­tion, this ob­vi­ously is the good deed. Every­body's dis­tance has also hauled. 霍雨浩也没想到,这蓝银皇和当初唐门先祖唐三的母亲竟然还有这样的联系,这显然是好事。大家彼此之间的距离也就拉进了许多。 „That looked like ori­gin be­tween we and se­nior was very deep, my com­pan­ion, was Tang Sect pre­sent age sect mas­ter that an­ces­tor Tang San es­tab­lished. Then, is comes down in a con­tin­u­ous line with the an­ces­tor. It seems like that our Tang Sect and your Blue Sil­ver Clan also re­ally have the fate!” “那看来我们和前辈之间的渊源就很深了,我的那位同伴,就是先祖唐三创立的唐门当代宗主。说起来,和先祖乃是一脉相传下来。看来,我们唐门和你们蓝银一族还真是有缘分啊！” „? Un­ex­pect­edly is so? That was re­ally good.” Blue Sil­ver Em­peror was also high-spir­ited im­me­di­ately. For­mi­da­ble Spir­i­tual Power that after ex­pe­ri­enc­ing Huo Yuhao has re­leased, it was very con­fi­dent to this line. plant at­tribute Soul Beast to the an­i­mal is Soul Beast, the thought wants to be sim­pler. But their sen­sa­tions are keener, from Huo Yuhao, he felt good and healthy ten­dency, in ad­di­tion Em­peror Aus­pi­cious Beast rea­son. There­fore he has not con­sid­ered to make the de­ci­sion, now one hear, thought im­me­di­ately one de­cided that is very cor­rect. “哦？竟是如此吗？那真的是太好了。”蓝银皇的情绪也顿时高了许多。在见识过霍雨浩释放出的强大精神力后,它对此行已经很有信心。植物系魂兽相对于动物系魂兽,思维要简单一些。但它们的感知却更加敏锐,从霍雨浩身上,他感觉到了善良与正气,再加上帝皇瑞兽的原因。所以他才没有多做考虑就做出了决定,现在一听,顿时觉得自己决定是十分正确的。 At this time, they went down to the upper air, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wu­tong start to ac­cel­er­ate. 此时,他们已经深入高空之中,霍雨浩和唐舞桐开始加速。 The flight ob­vi­ously is not the abil­ity that Blue Sil­ver Em­peror most ex­cels, but this has not re­lated, a Huo Yuhao hand is draw­ing Tang Wu­tong, an­other hand is draw­ing Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, bring­ing it to fly to­gether, to a Blue Sil­ver Em­peror stronger con­fi­dence, Huo Yuhao pro­motes the speed, is ex­tend­ing south Sun-Moon Em­pire, di­rectly soars the Star Lou Em­pire di­rec­tion to fly, speed just like with light­ning speed gen­eral, quick has ex­ceeded the speed of sound. 飞行显然不是蓝银皇最擅长的能力,但这没关系,霍雨浩一只手拉着唐舞桐,另一只手则是拉着蓝银皇,带着它一起飞行,为了给蓝银皇更强的信心,霍雨浩将速度提升起来,延着日月帝国南方,直奔星罗帝国方向飞去,速度宛如风驰电掣一般,很快就超过了音速。 Sun-Moon Em­pire after for­mer a se­ries of at­tack, the de­fense strength has con­tracted Bright Cap­i­tal City, even can say that tem­porar­ily gave up the de­fense to sur­round­ing city, does not have too many upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice to mon­i­tor, this also wants smooth many com­pared with the ex­pec­ta­tion, be­cause is far away from Bright Cap­i­tal City, trou­bles has not bumped into. Quick en­ters in Star Lou Em­pire, then di­rectly soars Shrek City to go. 日月帝国经过之前一系列的打击,防御力量已经收缩到明都,甚至可以说暂时放弃了对外围城市的防御,更没有太多的高空探测魂导器进行监控,这一路比预想中还要顺利的多,因为远离明都,一点麻烦都没有碰到。很快就进入星罗帝国境内,然后直奔史莱克城而去。 The Sky Soul Em­pire bor­der, the flag flies up­wards, army eyes can­not look at the bound­ary, on giant flags, gold sun sil­ver moon de­sign light shin­ing in all di­rec­tions. 天魂帝国边境,旗帜飞扬,大军一眼望不到边际,一面面巨大的旗帜上,金日银月图案光芒四射。 The army con­tin­u­ously about hun­dred li (0.5km), set up in an array in the orig­i­nal Sky Soul Em­pire bor­der. Or sets up in an array in the Sun-Moon Em­pire bor­der, be­cause Sky Soul Em­pire al­ready thor­ough van­ished from Con­ti­nent. 大军连绵近百里,在原天魂帝国边境上一字排开。或者说,是在日月帝国边境一字排开,因为天魂帝国已经彻底的从大陆上消失了。 This con­tin­u­ous hun­dred li (0.5km) army, total quan­tity close 700,000, Sun-Moon Em­pire major part elite all here. 这连绵百里的大军,总数量接近700000,日月帝国绝大部分精锐皆在此处。 Looks from the dis­tant place, the army just likes a big dragon, lineup of arrange­ment ex­tremely com­pli­cated, so long mil­i­tary com­pound bat­tle­line per­fectly will ac­tu­ally pro­tect. 从远处望去,大军犹如一条巨龙,排列的阵型极为繁复,却将如此漫长的军营阵线完美护住。 Even if from upper air bird's eye view, is un­able to see clearly in this big camp, ac­tu­ally how much Soul Guid­ance Array places. Only what can af­firm, here is al­most human for­bid­den area gen­eral ex­is­tence. 哪怕是从高空俯瞰,也无法看清楚在这大营之中,究竟有多少魂导阵地。唯一能够肯定的是,这里已经几乎是人类禁区一般的存在。 Here is a bor­der, not only ac­tu­ally Sky Soul Em­pire bor­der, in the mean­time, is Dou Ling Em­pire and Star Lou Em­pire bor­der. But here bound­ary cor­ner, in dis­tance army being sta­tioned place only then less than 200 in­side and out­side, is that en­tire Con­ti­nent is quite fa­mous, city that even has been able to place on a par with Bright Cap­i­tal City, Shrek City! 这里是边境,却不只是天魂帝国边境,同时,也是斗灵帝国和星罗帝国边境。而在这边境的角落处,也就是在距离大军驻扎处只有不足200里外,就是那座全大陆都极为著名,甚至已经可以与明都相提并论的城市,史莱克城！ Golden red com­man­der tent reaches as high as ten me­ters, in huge com­man­der tent, can si­mul­ta­ne­ously hold thou­sand peo­ple of con­fer­ences, but ob­vi­ously is not crowded. But at this time, in this com­man­der tent, ac­tu­ally only then few sev­eral peo­ple. 金红色的帅帐高达十米,巨大的帅帐内,能够同时容纳千人会议而不显拥挤。而此时,在这帅帐之中,却只有寥寥数人。 Ju Zi(or­ange) sits on the po­si­tion, wears the flame color to fight armor, fights on armor the Fire Phoenix de­sign to be life­like, this is not or­di­nary war armor, but cus­tomizes for her, gets rid by Kong Dem­ing Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice that per­son­ally man­u­fac­tures to com­plete. This Soul Guid­ance De­vice does not pay great at­ten­tion to at­tack, will ac­tu­ally de­fend to achieve Ab­solute. Kong Dem­ing has told Ju Zi(or­ange), even if Limit Douluo gets rid, within three strike, is un­able to break this phoenix to pro­tect the de­fense of Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice. 橘子坐在帅位上,身穿火红色战甲,战甲上火凤凰图案栩栩如生,这可不是普通的战甲,而是为她度身定做,由孔德明亲自出手制作完成的人形魂导器。这件魂导器并不注重攻击,却将防御做到了极致。孔德明告诉过橘子,哪怕是极限斗罗出手,三击之内,都无法破开这身凤凰守护人形魂导器的防御。 Under Ju Zi(or­ange) the head, is stand­ing six peo­ple, youngest also passes the mid­dle age, three old men, on each, faintly have the for­mi­da­ble aura to bloom, but they stand below, is ac­tu­ally en­tirely still, oc­ca­sion­ally looks to the Ju Zi(or­ange) look, even is also hav­ing the color of re­spect. 橘子下首,站着六个人,最年轻的也已经过了中年,其中还有三位老者,每一位身上,都隐隐有强大的气息绽放而出,但他们站在下面,却是纹丝不动,偶尔看向橘子的眼神中,甚至还带着崇敬之色。 In the Ju Zi(or­ange) hand is tak­ing let­ter paper, among under that six peo­ple, but also on one knee is kneel­ing down a per­son, the let­ter paper was this came from the Bright Cap­i­tal City mes­sen­ger just sent. 橘子手中拿着一封信笺,在下面那六个人中间,还单膝跪倒着一人,信笺就是这名来自于明都的信使刚刚送来的。 The let­ter is not long, quick looked, put down the let­ter, the Ju Zi(or­ange) at­trac­tive del­i­cate eye­brows ac­tu­ally wrin­kled, then has stood from the po­si­tion slowly. 信不算长,很快就看完了,放下信件,橘子好看的秀眉却皱了起来,然后缓缓从帅位上站了起来。 She stands up, below is stand­ing six pow­er­houses sub­con­sciously retro­cede one step, lets the mid­dle cir­cuit is big­ger. 她一站起,下面站着的六位强者都下意识的后退一步,将中间的通路让的更大。 A per­son for a long time oc­cu­pies the su­pe­rior, par­tic­u­larly com­man­der hun­dreds of thou­sands of armies, con­trol now world most for­mi­da­ble strength, dig­ni­fied, un­ceas­ingly will in­crease im­per­cep­ti­bly. Ju Zi(or­ange) is also so. 一个人久居上位,尤其是又统帅着数十万大军,掌控者当今之世最强大的力量,威严,无形中就会不断增加。橘子也是如此。 After she at­tains War-God Em­press, the mak­ings of whole per­son started to have the change, be­came more re­served, was more dig­ni­fied. Al­though she in fact is also less than 30 years old, may in many per­son eyes, ac­tu­ally al­ready ne­glect her age. 她获封帝后战神之后,整个人的气质都开始发生了变化,变得更加内敛,也更加威严。尽管她实际上还不到30岁,可在很多人眼中,却早已忽略了她的年龄。 Grad­u­ally walks, Ju Zi(or­ange) un­ceas­ingly paced and pon­der in the big ac­count. 缓步走下来,橘子就那么在大帐中不断踱步、思考。 In the big ac­count does not have the least bit sound, the vi­sion of all peo­ple visit her, sta­tic wait­ing. 大帐内没有半点声息,所有人的目光都看着她,静静的等待着。 A mo­ment later, Ju Zi(or­ange) stops the foot­steps, asked to that mes­sen­ger: „What does your majesty have to tell?” 片刻之后,橘子停下脚步,向那信使问道:“陛下还有什么吩咐？” The mes­sen­gers said: „Reply War-God Em­press, your majesty said that all are de­cided by War-God Em­press.” 信使道:“回禀帝后战神,陛下说,一切由帝后战神而决。” Ju Zi(or­ange) eyes nar­rows the eyes, nod­ded, said: „Good, you get down. After this Com­man­der must con­sider care­fully, replies your majesty again.” 橘子双眼微眯,点了点头,道:“好,你下去吧。本帅要仔细思量后再回复陛下。” „Yes.” The mes­sen­gers such as the Mon­go­lian par­don, hurry re­spect­ful set­ting out, bends the waist to draw back. No mat­ter what who waited for in six nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer that will suf­fer the huge pres­sure! He looks for­ward quickly to leave here. “是。”信使如蒙大赦,赶忙恭敬的起身,弯着腰退了出去。任谁在六位九级魂导师中间等待,都会蒙受巨大的压力啊！他巴不得赶快离开这里。 Ju Zi(or­ange) re­turns to own po­si­tion to sit well, sink­ing sound track: „Your majesty spreads the news, the em­pire in­ter­nal bit­ter ex­pe­ri­ence un­clear enemy at­tacks. More than ten cities were bro­ken suc­ces­sively, was plun­dered. Even was at­tacked in­clud­ing Bright Cap­i­tal City, the enemy used the spe­cial method to sub­merge to Bright Cap­i­tal City, launched over ten thou­sand pre­lim­i­nar­ily to in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to Bright Cap­i­tal City surely, as well as round of nine lev­els in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely. The im­pe­r­ial palace de­fended is bro­ken, has caused not the small losses. Sought for these en­e­mies be­cause of im­pe­r­ial Soul En­gi­neer Corp by the ex­ter­nal as­sign­ment, not in Bright Cap­i­tal City, there­fore can­not hold these en­e­mies promptly. Now the enemy dis­ap­pears from the scene, where does not know, sen­tences ini­tially in ad­vance, at least has two Soul En­gi­neer Corp mil­i­tary strength. Old Kong said that these en­e­mies might mas­ter the stealth and space abil­ity.” 橘子回到自己的帅位上坐定,沉声道:“陛下传来消息,帝国内部遭遇不明敌军攻击。先后有十余座城市被破,遭受掠夺。甚至连明都都被袭击,敌人用了特殊的方法潜入到明都附近,向明都发射了上万枚低级定装魂导炮弹,以及一发九级定装魂导炮弹。皇宫防御被破,造成了不小的损失。因皇家魂导师团被外派寻找这些敌人,并不在明都之中,所以没能及时抓住这些敌军。现在敌军鸿飞冥冥,不知道在什么地方,初步预判,至少有两个魂导师团的兵力。孔老说,这些敌人有可能掌握了隐形和空间能力。” Lis­tened to the Ju Zi(or­ange) words, fol­low­ing six nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer com­plete dis­col­orations. 听了橘子的话,下面六位九级魂导师不禁全部色变。 The armies bat­tle out­side, what most fears is what? Most fears is rear area is not steady! The nor­mal con­di­tion, the rear area is not steady, the sup­plies will have prob­lems. They have now seized the Sky Soul Em­pire big lands, al­though does not fear the sup­plies to cut off, but the em­pire is un­sta­ble, re­gard­ing the front, will be in­flu­en­tial. 大军在外作战,最怕的是什么？最怕的就是后方不稳啊！正常情况来说,后方不稳,那么,补给就会出问题。他们现在占领了天魂帝国大片土地,虽然并不怕补给断绝,但帝国内部不稳定,对于前线来说,还是会有影响。 Stands in the old man sink­ing sound track in left first place: „Mar­shal, this mat­ter can­not pass on, must block off the flow of news.” 站在左侧首位的一位老者沉声道:“元帅,这件事绝不能传出去,一定要封锁消息。” Ju Zi(or­ange) nod­ded, said: „Leaves my mouth, en­ters your ears, will not have other peo­ple to know. Does every­body, see?” 橘子点了点头,道:“出我之口,入你们之耳,再不会有其他人知道。各位,怎么看？” The old man who just opened the mouth said: „Un­be­liev­able, this is im­pos­si­ble!” 刚刚开口的老者道:“难以置信,这不可能啊！” In the Ju Zi(or­ange) look re­veals a strange color, „I also think im­pos­si­ble. The em­pire bor­der area, some mas­sive upper air Sur­vey­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice exist, block­ade re­con­nais­sance, blocks the enemy. Per­haps two Soul En­gi­neer Corp strengths be­long to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries take, but, even if can take, will not be ab­solutely strong. Mas­ters the stealth and spa­tial tech­nol­ogy? This sim­ply is a joke. Can­not de­velop in­clud­ing our coun­try, why do they study?” 橘子眼神中流露出一丝古怪之色,“我也觉得不可能。帝国边疆,有大量高空探测魂导器存在,封锁侦察,也封锁敌军。两支魂导师团的力量或许原属斗罗大陆三国拿得出来,但是,就算能拿出来,也绝对不会太强。掌握隐身和空间技术？这简直就是个笑话。连我国都没能研制出来,他们凭什么研究出来？” The old man in right first place said: „Mar­shal, can be some for­mi­da­ble Soul Mas­ter does?” 右边首位的老者道:“元帅,会不会是一些强大的魂师做的？” Ju Zi(or­ange) said: „The analy­sis of Old Kong said in the heart, if only the stealth, for­mi­da­ble Soul Mas­ter may also achieve through Soul Abil­ity, but if were rapid at least car­ries Soul En­gi­neer Corp of 300 heavy ar­tilleries to evac­u­ate two in a short time, was not the stealth abil­ity can achieve. Ac­tu­ally at pre­sent also not com­pletely clear enemy how achieves. The strength of this gang of enemy is not any­thing, but trou­ble­some in un­ex­pect­edly, more­over is hard to judge their where­abouts. This time, is one's turn us, be­cause the de­tec­tion wasn't in place to with­stand the painful re­sult?” 橘子道:“孔老的分析在心中说了,如果只是隐身的话,强大的魂师还有可能通过魂技做到,但如果是迅速将两支至少携带了300门重炮的魂导师团在短时间内撤离的话,就绝不是隐身能力所能做到的。目前还不完全清楚敌人究竟是如何做到。这股敌人的实力并不算什么,但麻烦在出其不意,而且难以判断它们的行踪。这一次,轮到我们因为侦查不到位来承受痛苦结果了吗？”

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #556 In fearful orange open intrigue


Yeah, why Sun-Moon Em­pire can win one vic­tory after an­other, fi­nally cap­tures Sky Soul Em­pire, be­sides own ab­solute ef­fec­tive strength, was the for­mi­da­ble re­con­nais­sance and counter-sur­veil­lance abil­ity. 可不是么,日月帝国为什么能够屡战屡胜,最终攻陷天魂帝国,除了自身绝对的战斗实力之外,就是强大的侦察和反侦察能力了。 The war when just started, Sky Soul Em­pire has strength of the war, after all, as the es­tab­lished pow­er­ful na­tion, the ac­cu­mu­la­tion of Sky Soul Em­pire is also quite abun­dant, it­self also has the sup­port of In­nate Body Sect, the over­all strength is greatly strength­ened. 战争在刚开始的时候,天魂帝国并不是没有一战之力,毕竟,作为老牌强国,天魂帝国的积累也是相当雄厚的,本身又有本体宗的支持,整体实力极强。 But when, they fac­ing Sun-Moon Em­pire, pow­er­ful nowhere causes rad­i­cally, the fist hits, often falls on the va­cancy, but the at­tack of Sun-Moon Em­pire, ac­tu­ally can find the Sky Soul Em­pire most im­por­tant weak­ness, con­tin­u­ously for a long time hence, Sky Soul Em­pire will be even­tu­ally dif­fi­cult to run away to ex­tin­guish the des­tiny of coun­try's. 可是,当他们面对日月帝国的时候,却根本就是有力无处使,拳头打出去,往往落在空处,而日月帝国的攻击,却总是能够找到天魂帝国最重要的弱点,长此以往,天魂帝国终究难逃灭国的命运。 But at­tack that this time, the Sun-Moon Em­pire in­te­rior suf­fers, sim­ply is war of Sun-Moon Em­pire and Sky Soul Em­pire of micro ver­sion. From com­menc­ing of ac­tion now, where truly has not con­firmed the enemy. 而这一次,日月帝国内部遭受到的攻击,简直就是微缩版的日月帝国与天魂帝国之战。从战斗开始到现在,都还没真正确认敌人在什么地方。 How­ever, on that let­ter paper, Ju Zi(or­ange) ac­tu­ally saw made she in­com­pa­ra­bly fa­mil­iar name, Huo Yuhao! 不过,在那封信笺上,橘子却看到了一个令她无比熟悉的名字,霍雨浩！ In news that Bright Cap­i­tal City spreads, can be quite def­i­nite only, is this name. 在明都传来的消息中,唯一能够较为确定的,就是这个名字。 Is Yuhao, re­ally you? 雨浩,真的是你吗？ Al­though in the Ju Zi(or­ange) heart is think­ing like this, but in the sur­face ac­tu­ally through­out is main­tain­ing calm. 橘子心中虽然这样想着,但表面上却始终保持着冷静。 Left first old man sink­ing sound track: „This truly is a major prob­lem, must clar­ify the out­come as soon as pos­si­ble what's the mat­ter, oth­er­wise, we do not have the means judg­ment. Mar­shal, at this time, we can­not draw back! Just had seized Sky Soul Em­pire through­out, our army re­cu­per­a­tion ten days, are the im­pos­ing man­ner most abun­dant time, which di­rec­tion re­gard­less to at­tacked, were the best mo­ments, at this time, if came under the do­mes­tic sit­u­a­tion in­flu­ence, greatly will pos­si­bly re­duce our army this time achieve­ment. The pre­sent is a se­ries Con­ti­nent best op­por­tu­nity.” 左侧首位老者沉声道:“这确实是个大问题,一定要尽快弄清楚究竟是怎么回事,否则的话,我们根本没办法判断。元帅,在这个时候,我们可不能退啊！刚刚占领了天魂帝国全境,我军休整十天,正是气势最盛的时候,无论向哪个方向攻击,都是最佳时刻,在这个时候如果受到国内情况的影响,很可能会大大缩减我军这次的成果。现在可是一统大陆的最佳时机。” Ju Zi(or­ange) nods the head slightly. 橘子微微颔首。 The right first old man also nod­ded, said: „Your majesty side has the im­pe­r­ial Soul En­gi­neer Corp pro­tec­tion, so long as im­pe­r­ial Soul En­gi­neer Corp in Bright Cap­i­tal City, Bright Cap­i­tal City has been pos­si­ble to guar­an­tee the no wor­ries. These Soul En­gi­neer enter in our coun­try, but the pop­u­la­tion is lim­ited, they can achieve can only be the de­struc­tion. But they have two Soul En­gi­neer Corp after all. But we have 1 mil­lion mighty armies. Com­pared with de­stroy­ing, us missed?” 右侧首位老者也是点了点头,道:“陛下身边有皇家魂导师团守护,只要皇家魂导师团一直在明都之中,明都可保无虞。那些魂导师进入我国境内,但人数毕竟有限,他们能做到的只能是破坏。可他们毕竟只有两支魂导师团。而我们却有1000000雄师。比起破坏来,难道我们就差了吗？” „Old Su, cau­tious word.” Ju Zi(or­ange) brow micro wrin­kle, sink­ing sound shouted to clear the way. “苏老,慎言。”橘子眉头微皱,沉声喝道。 Old Su gives a calm smile. Said: „Monarch will as­sign to have out­side not. Mar­shal, you must early make res­o­lu­tion, ten mil­lion should not be af­fected by this mat­ter, be­lieves that your majesty can also un­der­stand your. Our tac­tics have for­mu­lated, if made the change at this time, was very dis­ad­van­ta­geous!” 苏老淡然一笑。道:“将在外君命有所不受。元帅,您要早作决断,千万不要被这件事情所影响,相信陛下也能理解您的。我们的战术都已经制定好了,如果在这个时候作出更改,很是不利啊！” Ju Zi(or­ange) sighed one lightly, said: „I know the sit­u­a­tion so. But, your majesty has dif­fi­cult, can I feel at ease at the war of front? Every­body is the Wor­ship Hall elder. My heart is a lit­tle chaotic, this mat­ter must need fur­ther con­sid­er­a­tion. Can­not make the de­ci­sion care­lessly. Oth­er­wise, even if was we won at the front war, in the fu­ture re­turns to the em­pire, will be re­ferred to by the mul­ti­tude of peo­ple.” 橘子轻叹一声,道:“我又何尝不知道情况如此。可是,陛下有难,我又怎能心安于前线之战呢？各位都是供奉堂的长者。我的心有点乱,这件事必须从长计议。不能草草做决定。否则的话,就算是我们在前线战争获得了胜利,未来回归帝国,也会被千夫所指。” „Who dares?” Old Su ob­vi­ously is a crabby, one step steps for­ward. Power and in­flu­ence as­cends sud­denly, cold sound track: „Mar­shal does one's best for the coun­try, is in the front to break through enemy lines by the daugh­ter, the wis­dom idea is full, has the as­pect of today. The hate­ful coun­te­nance old men of do­mes­tic these fel­lows clear, if who dares to ques­tion the mar­shal, the old man kills his fam­ily first.” “谁敢？”苏老明显是个暴脾气,一步跨出。身上威势骤然升腾,冷声道:“元帅为了国家鞠躬尽瘁,以女儿身在前线冲锋陷阵,智计百出,方有今日之局面。国内那些家伙的可恶嘴脸老夫清楚的很,要是谁敢质疑元帅,老夫先杀他全家。” This word al­ready some trea­son and heresy. But stands other five nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer in this big ac­count ac­tu­ally turns a deaf ear, even also slightly nods the head, al­though they do not have the Old Su such short tem­per, has ac­tu­ally tac­itly ap­proved his words. 此言已经有些大逆不道了。但站在这大帐中的其他五位九级魂导师却是充耳不闻,甚至还微微颔首,他们虽然没有苏老这么脾气暴躁,却都是默认了他的话。 On the face re­veals a light smile, Ju Zi(or­ange) stands up, nod­ded to six nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. „Thanks the sup­port that every­body con­se­crates. this Com­man­der will make the res­o­lu­tion as soon as pos­si­ble. This mat­ter can­not spread to the armed forces, but also please six con­se­crate the se­cu­rity.” 脸上流露出一丝淡淡的微笑,橘子站起身,向六位九级魂导师点了点头。“谢谢各位供奉的支持。本帅会尽快做出决断。这件事不能传入军中,还请六位供奉保密。” „Yes!” Six big nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer si­mul­ta­ne­ously bow to com­ply. “是！”六大九级魂导师同时躬身答应。 The left first place con­se­crates to nod, said: „Mar­shal, you are sta­tic first, we get down first. How re­gard­less of you de­cided. We spare no ef­fort will sup­port.” 左侧首位供奉点了点头,道:“元帅,那您先静静,我们先下去。无论您如何决定。我们都会不遗余力的支持。” „Good.” “好。” Six con­se­crate one after an­other, in big com­man­der tent, only re­main­ing a Ju Zi(or­ange) per­son. 六位供奉鱼贯而出,偌大的帅帐之内,就只剩下了橘子一个人。 Ju Zi(or­ange) sits on the po­si­tion, the dig­nity and pow­er­ful on face soften grad­u­ally, at this time, she re­ally likely was a girl. 橘子坐在帅位上,脸上的威严与强势渐渐软化下来,在这个时候,她才真的像是一个女孩子。 Sits is in a daze after there long time, she once more stands up, ar­rives by com­man­der tent one side sand table, looks at the sand table, in the heart is cal­cu­lat­ing silently. 坐在那里发呆半晌之后,她才再次站起,走到帅帐一侧的沙盘旁边,看着沙盘,心中默默的计算着。 At pre­sent she is lead­ing the Sun-Moon Em­pire army, is at a very sub­tle po­si­tion. In this po­si­tion, she can have three choices. Re­cently was also the most di­rect choice, at­tacks Shrek City. But every­one knows that this ab­solutely is un­wise. The issue that the prime min­is­ter can see, Ju Zi(or­ange) nat­u­rally can also be able to see. Let alone, Shrek Acad­emy is she most is not will­ing to move, she is very clear, there is his Re­verse Scale! 目前她率领着日月帝国大军,正处在一个十分微妙的位置。在这个位置,她可以有三个选择。最近也是最直接的选择,就是攻击史莱克城。但谁都知道,这绝对是不明智的。首相能够看到的问题,橘子自然也能够看得到。更何况,史莱克学院是她最不愿意碰触的,她很清楚,那里是他的逆鳞啊！ After pass­ing through mat­ter that the pre­vi­ous son has been taken pris­oner, her mood had very big change, be­fore the mat­ters of many re­gard­ing as im­por­tant, in­stead de­sali­nated now, but be­fore force­fully was sup­pressed by her in the thing of own heart of hearts, ac­tu­ally grad­u­ally gushes out. 经过了上次儿子被掳走的事情之后,她的心境有了很大的变化,以前很多看重的事情,现在反而都淡化了,而以前一些被她强行压制在自己内心深处的东西,却渐渐涌出。 On the sand table, some ex­quis­ite small flag, these flags are the im­por­tant board game pieces that she arranges, in the Star Lou Em­pire bor­der is crowded. 沙盘上,有一个个精巧的小旗子,那些旗帜都是她安排的重要棋子,其中,在星罗帝国边境最是密集。 No­body can find out her true tac­ti­cal arrange­ment, that six con­se­crated a mo­ment ago, al­though knows, but also has a lim­ited view. 没有人能摸清楚她真正的战术安排,刚才那六位供奉虽然知道一些,但也只是管中窥豹罢了。 Judg­ing from the pre­sent sit­u­a­tion, at­tacks Star Lou Em­pire ob­vi­ously is wis­est. Be­cause Star Lou Em­pire and Sky Soul Em­pire and Sun-Moon Em­pire bor­der on, if at­tacks and oc­cu­pies Star Lou Em­pire, then, en­tire Con­ti­nent sur­passed 4/5 area to be re­ceived in the Sun-Moon Em­pire pouch. 从目前情况来看,攻击星罗帝国显然是最明智的。因为星罗帝国与天魂帝国和日月帝国接壤,如果将星罗帝国攻占下来,那么,整个大陆超过4的面积就全都被收入日月帝国囊中了。 Nat­u­rally, Star Lou Em­pire is not Sky Soul Em­pire may com­pare ab­solutely. The Star Lou Em­pire land area is also al­most the same com­pared with Sun-Moon Em­pire, is in it­self equal to Sky Soul Em­pire and Dou Ling Em­pire adding to­gether. Had ten thou­sand years of huge em­pire. The back­ground ac­tu­ally many, no­body may know. 当然,星罗帝国绝对不是天魂帝国可比。星罗帝国的国土面积比日月帝国也相差无几,本身相当于天魂帝国和斗灵帝国相加。乃是存在了万年的庞大帝国。其底蕴究竟有多少,无人可知。 Sky Soul Em­pire has Duke White Tiger to as­sume per­sonal com­mand, now above the bor­der, is 1 mil­lion armies spans sim­i­larly, makes to ac­cept a chal­lenge at any time the prepa­ra­tion. 天魂帝国更有白虎公爵坐镇,现在边境之上,同样是1000000大军横亘,随时作出应战准备。 The Star Lou Em­pire bor­der, Ju Zi(or­ange) al­to­gether has arranged 300,000 peo­ple, every 50,000 peo­ple pro­vide Soul Guid­ance Array place, is di­vided into six footholds to hold the crit­i­cal po­si­tion. Let the Star Lou Em­pire army not dare to act rashly. Mean­while she also arranged two re­or­ga­niz­ing Soul En­gi­neer Corp as co­or­di­nat­ing. 星罗帝国边境,橘子一共布置了300000人,每50000人配备一个魂导阵地,分为六个据点扼守要害位置。让星罗帝国大军不敢轻举妄动。同时她还安排了两个整编的魂导师团作为策应。 Star Lou Em­pire had car­ried on the ex­ploratory at­tack, but every time loses. 星罗帝国曾经进行过试探性进攻,但每一次都是铩羽而归。 That side Dou Ling Em­pire, the arrange­ment is sim­i­lar. Su­per­fi­cially, now the Ju Zi(or­ange) com­man­der Sun-Moon Em­pire army has com­pleted the com­plete de­fense to orig­i­nal Sky Soul Em­pire bor­der. Going for­ward or re­treat­ing de­pend­ing upon cir­cum­stances. 斗灵帝国那边,布置类似。从表面上来看,现在橘子统帅的日月帝国大军已经完成了对原天魂帝国国境的全部防御。进可攻、退可守。 These mat­ters, are Ju Zi(or­ange) com­plete within the short sev­eral months, even be­fore her army goes to bat­tle, many arrange­ment started. 这些事情,都是橘子在短短数月之内完成的,甚至在她大军出征之前,很多布置就已经开始了。 When her army ar­rives, that de­ci­sive bat­tle seems the gloom that kills, may in fact, ac­tu­ally all in her con­trol range. 当她大军到来之时,那一场决战看上去杀的天昏地暗,可实际上,却全都在她的掌控范围之中。 Not only Ju Zi(or­ange) ex­cels with the sur­prise-at­tack forces, this time, she has also proven her­self the com­mand ca­pa­bil­ity in frontal bat­tle­field. She has used five Soul En­gi­neer Corp strengths, routs Sky Soul and Dou Ling Em­pire al­lied armies main force in the frontage, even the pow­er­house abil­ity limit of Shrek Acad­emy, does not make them dis­play the true strength. 橘子不只是擅长用奇兵,这一次,她也证明了自己在正面战场上的指挥能力。她只是动用了五个魂导师团的力量,就在正面击溃天魂、斗灵帝国联军主力,甚至将史莱克学院的强者能力限制,根本不让他们发挥出真正实力。 The Sky Soul Em­pire rem­nant armed forces in fact have not been an­ni­hi­lated, but in see­ing the mat­ter may not be later, with­drew in Shrek City. 天魂帝国残军实际上并没有全军覆没,而是在见到事不可为之后,撤回到了史莱克城内。 Shrek City after ex­ten­sion, holds these seven and 80,000 rem­nant armed forces not to be a prob­lem, si­mul­ta­ne­ously ac­cepts, Sky Soul Em­pire some pow­er­houses and elites. But the Dou Ling Em­pire as­pect ac­tu­ally can­not draw back into Shrek City, they have the coun­try to pro­tect! There­fore has to re­turn to Dou Ling Em­pire, is ready in full bat­tle array in bor­der. 史莱克城经过扩建之后,容纳这七、80000残军不成问题,同时接受的,还有天魂帝国的一些强者与精英。但斗灵帝国方面却不能退入史莱克城,他们有国家要守护啊！所以不得不返回斗灵帝国,在边境严阵以待。 In the short time, in the Ju Zi(or­ange) mind is re­ver­ber­at­ing un­ceas­ingly at pre­sent var­i­ous sit­u­a­tions of front. Re­gard­ing Star Luo and Dou Ling both coun­tries, is fright­ened by the slight­est sound, anx­ious pre­pares to re­sist the Sun-Moon Em­pire army at any time. But what po­lar­ity is, under her com­man­der, the Sun-Moon Em­pire army passes through nearly ten days of re­cu­per­a­tion, not only the con­di­tion re­stored best, but also the morale was just pros­per­ous. Com­pletely is in top form. 短暂的时间内,橘子脑海中不断回荡着目前前线的各种局势。对于星罗和斗灵两国来说,风声鹤唳,紧张的随时准备对抗日月帝国大军。而正相反的是,在她的统帅下,日月帝国大军经过近十天的休整,不但状态恢复到了最佳,而且士气正旺。完全处于最佳状态之中。 „Is Yuhao, re­ally you?” Think­ing aloud that Ju Zi(or­ange) mut­tered, „, if were re­ally you, I will not feel ab­solutely strange. The good move to re­move fire­wood from under the pot!” “雨浩,真的是你吗？”橘子喃喃的自言自语,“如果真的是你,我绝对不会感到奇怪。好一招釜底抽薪啊！” „Will Monarch as­sign to have out­side not? This sim­ply is a joke. The Xu Tian­ran what kind char­ac­ter, how can he not con­trol in front me?” Here, on the Ju Zi(or­ange) face re­vealed one to sneer, woods cold sneer­ing. „Xu Tian­ran, were this time you in­jured?” “将在外君命有所不受？这简直是个笑话。徐天然何等人物,他又怎会不控制在前线的我呢？”说到这里,橘子脸上流露出一丝冷笑,森寒的冷笑。“徐天然,这次你又受了伤么？” Var­i­ous prepa­ra­tions that „it seems like, I make is right. Some things, must un­veil the veil even­tu­ally. Yuhao, thank you, you helped me cre­ate this con­di­tion ac­tu­ally. I here, wait for you. Re­ally an­tic­i­pates to see you very much once more, even if in bat­tle­field.” “看来,我所作的各种准备都是对的。有些东西,终究是要揭开面纱了。雨浩,谢谢你,倒是你帮我制造了这个条件。我就在这里,等你。真是很期待再次见到你,哪怕是在战场上。” When­ever she men­tioned Huo Yuhao this name time, ice-cold in look rapidly will change into gen­tly, even is also hav­ing a sat­is­fied smile. 每当她提到霍雨浩这个名字的时候,眼神中的冰冷就会迅速化为温柔,甚至还带着一丝满足的微笑。 She ex­tends her right hand slowly, above the sand table, makes a fist slowly. All grasp! 她缓缓伸出自己的右手,在沙盘上方,徐徐握拳。一切掌握！ After a dou­ble-hour, the order from War-God Em­press spreads over the army. All ex­pert reg­i­ment level above mil­i­tary of­fi­cers, com­man­der tent obey or­ders. 一个时辰后,来自帝后战神的命令传遍全军。所有师团级以上军官,帅帐听令。 The aura of with­er­ing, fills the air in com­man­der tent, a Ju Zi(or­ange) mil­i­tary garb, wears the pure gold hel­met, sits stands one's ground stead­fastly on the po­si­tion. Left side of her, but also sits one per­son, the whole body cov­ers in a very color long gown. Al­though he has con­trolled one­self aura, but meets not on own ini­tia­tive re­veals the gloomy air/Qi. 肃杀的气息,弥漫于帅帐之内,橘子一身戎装,头戴赤金盔,坐在帅位上岿然不动。在她左侧,还坐着一人,全身都笼罩在一件很色长袍之中。虽然他已经控制了自己身上的气息,但还是会不自觉的流露出阴森之气。 In this Men in Black be­hind, is stand­ing a per­son, if Huo Yuhao here, may rec­og­nize her. Im­pres­sively Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Mas­ter, Feng Ling. 在这黑衣人身后,站着一个人,如果霍雨浩在这里,或许会认出她来。赫然正是圣灵教副教主,凤菱。 Can make Feng Ling stand in one­self be­hind, the sta­tus of this per­son was vivid, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Mas­ter, Zongli Wu! 能够让凤菱站在自己身后,这个人的身份已经呼之欲出,正是圣灵教教主,钟离乌！ Yes, in the front army, has Zongli Wu to as­sume per­sonal com­mand in this un­ex­pect­edly. 是的,前线大军之中,竟是有钟离乌坐镇于此。 Under Zongli Wu and Feng Ling the head, is stand­ing an au­di­ences Sun-Moon Em­pire pow­er­house in­clud­ing Jing Hongchen, as for the Holy Spirit Cult pow­er­house, is ac­tu­ally one does not see, does not see ac­tu­ally does not rep­re­sent them not to exist. 钟离乌和凤菱下首,站着包括镜红尘在内的一众日月帝国强者,至于圣灵教强者,却是一个不见,不见却并不代表他们就不存在。 ---------------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------------------- Con­tin­ues to plead the monthly ticket sup­port, was an­tic­i­pat­ing we can in­crease in the monthly ticket list un­ceas­ingly. Thank you, later will have three times, cer­tain, I guar­an­teed. 继续恳求月票支持,期待着我们能够在月票榜上不断攀升。谢谢大家,之后还会有三更的时候,一定,我保证。 Asked the monthly ticket. 求月票。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #556 In fearful orange open intrigue


But an­other side, is stand­ing is also a pow­er­house, was headed by for­merly in the Ju Zi(or­ange) ac­count that six nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer. Both sides add, in this tent, Ti­tled Douluo and nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer total quan­ti­ties reaches twenty peo­ple. 而另一边,站着的也是一众强者,其中就是以先前橘子帐中那六位九级魂导师为首的。双方加起来,在这营帐之内,封号斗罗、九级魂导师的总数量多达二十几人。 Ex­cept that under these pow­er­house crowns, other is in the armed forces the high level, arranges ac­cord­ing to the sta­tus, sep­a­rately is Hand of the Na­tional Pro­tec­tor four big Soul En­gi­neer Corp as­sis­tant reg­i­men­tal com­man­ders and or­di­nary Com­man­der Soul En­gi­neer Corp, is le­gion is long, ex­pert reg­i­ment chief these peo­ple. 除了这些强者冕下,其他的就都是军中高层,按地位排列,分别是护国之手四大魂导师团的正副团长、普通魂导师团团长,然后才是军团长、师团长那些人。 These peo­ple put to­gether, is at pre­sent the Sun-Moon Em­pire army com­mand­ing so­cial stra­tum. 这些人加在一起,就是目前日月帝国全军的统领阶层了。 Ju Zi(or­ange) looks at the peo­ple to nod, said: „After the re­cu­per­a­tion, our army fight­ing in­tent is soar­ing at pre­sent, is the best op­por­tu­nity of com­bat. Passes on our army com­mand, the life, first, third, fifth, third largest le­gion march for­ward to the Shrek City di­rec­tion, as­sumes the po­ten­tial of at­tack­ing from a pin­cer-like po­si­tion to pitch camp, Evil Eye Soul En­gi­neer Corp and Ter­ror Claw Soul En­gi­neer Corp co­or­di­nate to march for­ward, march for­ward hun­dred li (0.5km), pitches camp. Es­tab­lishes the Soul Guid­ance Array place rapidly, pre­pares for at any time to Shrek City at­tack.” 橘子看着众人点了点头,道:“经过休整,我军目前战意高昂,正是作战的最好时机。传我军令,命,第一、第三、第五,三大军团向史莱克城方向行进,呈掎角之势扎营,邪眼魂导师团、恐爪魂导师团配合行进,行进百里,重新扎营。迅速建立魂导阵地,随时做好对史莱克城进攻的准备。” „After front­line po­si­tion es­tab­lishes com­pletes, other armed forces ac­com­pany to go, ac­cord­ing to the orig­i­nal lineup arrange­ment, waits to order.” “前线阵地建立完成后,其他各军随同前往,按原有阵型排列,等候命令。” Is lis­ten­ing to the Ju Zi(or­ange) words, sits in nearby Zongli Wu some sur­prise. In fact, after the army is sta­tioned here the re­cu­per­a­tion, he had pro­posed must to the opin­ion that Shrek City re­sorts to arms, Ju Zi(or­ange) ac­tu­ally show nei­ther ap­proval nor dis­ap­proval. Has not ac­tu­ally thought that this War-God Em­press ac­tu­ally fi­nally de­cided at this time must re­sort to arms to the Shrek City as­pect. This re­gard­ing Holy Spirit Cult nat­u­rally was greatly med­dle­some. They have treated as the eye-sore and thorn in the side to re­gard Shrek City. 听着橘子的话,坐在旁边的钟离乌有些诧异。事实上,大军驻扎在这里休整之后,他就已经提出过要向史莱克城用兵的意见,橘子却不置可否。却没想到,这位帝后战神此时却终于决定要对史莱克城方面用兵了。这对于圣灵教来说当然是大好事了。他们一直将史莱克城当做眼中钉、肉中刺看待。 Al­though to Ju Zi(or­ange) some mil­i­tary order sur­prise, but clearly, Zongli Wu not any truth of op­po­si­tion. 虽然对橘子的军令有些诧异,但很明显,钟离乌没有任何反对的道理。 The armies set out, vast soup ap­proaches in the Shrek City di­rec­tion. Has Wu Yun (black clouds) to press the city to want greatly to de­stroy the po­ten­tial. At dusk, the en­tire Sun-Moon Em­pire army has com­pleted in the Shrek City hun­dred in­side and out­side line­ups. By the po­ten­tial of half sur­round­ing re­mote to Shrek. 大军开拔,浩浩汤汤的朝着史莱克城方向逼近。大有乌云压城城欲摧之势。傍晚时分,整个日月帝国大军已经完成了在史莱克城百里外的布阵。以半包围之势遥对史莱克。 The Shrek City di­rec­tion does not have any re­sponse, but the city gate shuts tightly. 史莱克城方向却没有任何反应,只是城门紧闭。 The night falls, an ar­tillery made a sound has ac­tu­ally alarmed en­tire Shrek City. 夜幕降临,声声炮响却惊动了整个史莱克城。 In the upper air, bunch of en­chant­ing bril­liance blast out, com­pose large char­ac­ters, can see in Shrek City any cor­ner clearly that „hands over Huo Yuhao, oth­er­wise, in ten day, mas­sacres city!” 高空中,一团团炫丽的光焰炸开,组成一个个大字,在史莱克城任何角落中都能清晰看到,“交出霍雨浩,否则,十日内,屠城！” Sta­tic float in night­time sky, Huo Yuhao dis­tant looks at air­borne twin­kle light shadow, sud­denly, brow tight wrin­kle. 静静的悬浮在夜空中,霍雨浩远远的看着空中所闪烁光影,一时间,不禁眉头紧皱。 He just flew is away from Shrek Acad­emy not far away, saw this. 他才刚刚飞到距离史莱克学院不远处,就看到了这一幕。 In ten day, hands over me? 十日内,交出我？ Does Sun-Moon Em­pire ac­tu­ally want sol­dier trapped|sleepy Shrek? 日月帝国竟然要兵困史莱克？ Tang Wu­tong is also sur­prised of face, has turned head, some doubts looks to Huo Yuhao, „this Sun-Moon Em­pire three ser­vices isn't com­man­der, Ju Zi(or­ange)? Is this wants?” 唐舞桐也是一脸的惊讶,扭过头,有些疑惑的看向霍雨浩,“这次日月帝国的三军统帅,不是橘子吗？她这是要？” Huo Yuhao shook the head, „walks, we re­turned to Acad­emy to say first again.” At the same time was say­ing, he is bring­ing Tang Wu­tong and Blue Sil­ver Em­peror ac­cel­er­ates once more, flies in the Shrek Acad­emy di­rec­tion. Is re­ly­ing on Im­i­ta­tion Soul Abil­ity and Spir­i­tual Dis­tur­bance do­main, he has not alarmed any­body, fell di­rectly re­turned to the Shrek City inner city. 霍雨浩摇了摇头,“走,咱们先回学院再说。”一边说着,他带着唐舞桐和蓝银皇再次加速,朝着史莱克学院方向飞去。凭借着模拟魂技和精神干扰领域,他没有惊动任何人,直接落回到了史莱克城内城之中。 Has not gone to Acad­emy first, but re­turns to Tang Sect, opens the King front door, has di­rected first Tang Sect nu­mer­ous high lev­els. 没有先去学院,而是回到唐门之中,开启王者大门,将唐门一众高层们先都引了出来。 „This is......”, when Beibei sees side Huo Yuhao to stand Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, whole per­son dumb­founded. “这是……”当贝贝一眼看到霍雨浩身边站着的蓝银皇时,整个人都不禁目瞪口呆。 Al­though he has not rec­og­nized this is can save the Tang Ya life Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, but also has ac­tu­ally guessed cor­rectly 12. 他虽然并没有一眼就认出这是能够救唐雅性命的蓝银皇,但却也猜到了12。 Huo Yuhao sink­ing sound track: „First Se­nior Brother, Sun-Moon Em­pire sol­dier trapped|sleepy Shrek, we must ar­rive at that side Acad­emy to ask the sen­ti­ment sit­u­a­tion first. This is the Blue Sil­ver Em­peror se­nior, I seek in Sun-Moon Em­pire. Third Se­nior Brother, trou­bles you to give se­nior to arrange a dwelling first. First Se­nior Brother, we go to Acad­emy first, when had de­ter­mined after Acad­emy here sit­u­a­tion, comes back me to help Lit­tle Ya Teacher treat.” 霍雨浩沉声道:“大师兄,日月帝国兵困史莱克,我们要先到学院那边问情情况。这位就是蓝银皇前辈,我在日月帝国寻到的。三师兄,麻烦你先给前辈安排个住处。大师兄,咱们先去学院一趟,等确定了学院这边的情况后,回来我就帮小雅老师治疗。” The breath of Beibei some­what is ob­vi­ously rapid, front fluc­tu­at­ing was also fiercer, but he must un­ex­pect­edly be Tang Sect First Se­nior Brother, after the short mood dras­tic fluc­tu­a­tion, is even­tu­ally tran­quil, nod­ded, said: „Good, walks. We go to Acad­emy to­gether.” 贝贝的呼吸明显有些急促,胸前起伏也剧烈了一些,但他必竟是唐门大师兄,在短暂的情绪剧烈波动之后,终究还是平静下来,点了点头,道:“好,走。咱们一起去学院。” Leaves is so long, al­though just came back, but rested at this time can­not give a thought to the rest, Huo Yuhao, Beibei and Tang Wu­tong three peo­ple di­rectly soars Acad­emy to go to­gether, but other peo­ple also per­formed its own func­tions, these days after processes left the Tang Sect busi­ness. 离开这么久,虽然是刚回来,但在这个时候睡也顾不上休息,霍雨浩、贝贝和唐舞桐三人一起直奔学院而去,而其他人也是各司其职,去处理这段时间离开后的唐门事务。 Whirls, the Huo Yuhao three peo­ple ar­rive at Acad­emy fast. 一路急行,霍雨浩三人快速来到学院。 Just now be­fore the Shrek Acad­emy gate, two forms dodged from the both sides, has blocked their way. 才刚到史莱克学院门前,两道身影就从两侧闪了出来,拦住了他们的去路。 „What per­son?” That is two wears the youth of Shrek Acad­emy school uni­form. They asked these words, saw clearly the Huo Yuhao three peo­ple of ap­pear­ances. “什么人？”那是两名身穿史莱克学院校服的青年。他们才问出这句话,就已经看清楚了霍雨浩三人的样貌。 They stared in a big way the eye im­me­di­ately, one of them 's sur­prised [say / way]: „Huo, Huo Se­nior Brother?” 两人顿时瞪大了眼睛,其中一人吃惊的道:“霍、霍师兄？” Huo Yuhao has se­lected to them, said: „We must go to Inner Court. Now de­fends in­clud­ing some evening's per­son of val­ues?” Must know that be­fore­hand Shrek Acad­emy, ab­solutely is the model of law and order pre­vail, never has any de­fen­sive mea­sure. 霍雨浩向他们点了下头,道:“我们要去内院。现在连晚上都有人值守了吗？”要知道,以前的史莱克学院,绝对是夜不闭户的典范,从来没有任何防御手段的。 That stu­dent nod­ded, said: „Yes, since Sky Soul Em­pire ex­tin­guishes the coun­try, Acad­emy strength­ened the de­fense, the pre­sent is very spe­cial pe­riod.” 那名学员点了点头,道:“是啊,自从天魂帝国灭国之后,学院就加强了防御,现在是非常时期。” „What?” The Huo Yuhao three peo­ple al­most si­mul­ta­ne­ously call out in alarm make noise. They have not known that Sky Soul Em­pire al­ready the ex­tin­guished news, lis­ten­ing to this stu­dent say­ing that im­me­di­ately was sur­prised, on three faces re­vealed color with amaze­ment. “什么？”霍雨浩三人几乎是同时惊呼出声。他们还都不知道天魂帝国已经被灭的消息,听了这名学员所说,顿时大吃一惊,三人脸上都流露出了骇然之色。 No won­der and no won­der Sun-Moon Em­pire can the at­tack­ing army has reached the city, ar­rive at out­side Shrek City, Sky Soul Em­pire was ex­tin­guished un­ex­pect­edly. 难怪、难怪日月帝国能够兵临城下,来到史莱克城外,天魂帝国居然已经真的被灭了。 Al­though Huo Yuhao is not the Sky Soul Em­pire per­son, but Beibei can ac­tu­ally be, sud­denly, three peo­ple of hearts be­come heavy. 霍雨浩虽然不是天魂帝国人,但贝贝却可以算是,一时间,三人心头都不禁变得沉重起来。 „We must enter Acad­emy now, what pro­ce­dure but also needs?” Tang Wu­tong asked. “我们现在要进学院,还需要什么手续吗？”唐舞桐问道。 Fac­ing the Tang Wu­tong Li's ap­pear­ance, two stu­dent some do not dare to look straight ahead cer­tainly, hurry to shake the head say­ing: „, Has not had, three Se­nior come.” 面对唐舞桐绝丽的容颜,两名学员都有些不敢直视,赶忙摇头道:“没有、没有,三位学长请进。” The Huo Yuhao three peo­ple then enter Acad­emy, to the Sea God Lake bank, three peo­ple si­mul­ta­ne­ously jumped, has flown Sea God Is­land di­rectly. 霍雨浩三人这才进入学院,到了海神湖畔,三人同时腾身而起,直接飞上了海神岛。 Sky Soul Em­pire was ex­tin­guished, this news was re­ally too as­ton­ish­ing, ini­tially, Huo Yuhao had been to that side the front per­son­ally, his very clear front lo­cated the arrange­ment of Sky Soul Em­pire. Al­though can­not com­pared with Sun-Moon Em­pire for­mi­da­ble Soul En­gi­neer Corp, but, was in­suf­fi­cient in such a short time to be ex­tin­guished the coun­try? Sky Soul Em­pire was ex­tin­guished, means that Shrek City and be­tween Sun-Moon Em­pire armies, does not have any cush­ion lee­way again. Si­mul­ta­ne­ously Sun-Moon Em­pire also fi­nally com­pleted them to unify the Con­ti­nent first step, then, they mo­men­tar­ily can aim at Star Luo or are Dou Ling Em­pire. As­pect re­gard­ing be­long­ing to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries, is ex­tremely dis­ad­van­ta­geous. 天魂帝国被灭,这个消息实在是太惊人了,当初,霍雨浩亲自到过前线那边,他很清楚前线处天魂帝国的布置。虽说不能和日月帝国强大的魂导师团相比,可是,也不至于在这么短时间内就被灭国了吧？天魂帝国被灭,也就意味着史莱克城和日月帝国大军之间,再无任何缓冲余地。同时日月帝国也终于完成了他们统一大陆的第一步,接下来,他们随时都可以以星罗或者是斗灵帝国为目标。局面对于原属斗罗大陆三国来说,已经是极其不利。 Huo Yuhao they stir the wind to stir the rain in Sun-Moon Em­pire, thinks can play cer­tain role, who knows that in the frontal bat­tle­field, Sky Soul Em­pire has ac­tu­ally col­lapsed com­pletely, this made their achieve­ment pro­duce the re­sults to sell at a dis­count greatly. 霍雨浩他们在日月帝国搅风搅雨,原本以为能够起到一定作用,可谁知道,在正面战场上,天魂帝国却已是一败涂地,这就让他们的作为所产生效果大打折扣了。 Golden Tree is in sight, Huo Yuhao brow tight wrin­kle, stops the foot­steps, is draw­ing the Tang Wu­tong same place, kneels down be­fore Golden Tree, Beibei also to­gether knees down. 黄金树在望,霍雨浩眉头紧皱,停下脚步,拉着唐舞桐一起,在黄金树前跪下,贝贝也是一同跪倒在地。 „Teacher, we came back, hopes comes back is not late.” Huo Yuhao re­spect­ful did obei­sance three to do obei­sance to­ward Golden Tree. “老师,我们回来了,希望回来的还不算晚。”霍雨浩恭敬的向着黄金树拜了三拜。 In Sea God Pavil­ion, bril­liantly il­lu­mi­nated. When the Huo Yuhao three peo­ple enter a build­ing hall, Sea God Pavil­ion An­cient Elder, be­sides them, a Huo Yuhao ac­quain­tance. Sky Soul Em­pire Princess Wei Na. 海神阁内,灯火通明。当霍雨浩三人走进一楼大厅的时候,诸位海神阁宿老都在,除了他们之外,还有一位霍雨浩的熟人。正是天魂帝国的维娜公主。 Saw that three peo­ple walk, Princess Wei Na stands up, when with pre­vi­ous time meets com­pares, this princess was al­most old ten years old, the skin did not have the light gloomily, the el­e­gant face was pale, in the look was full of sor­row­fully. 看到三人走进来,维娜公主不禁站起身,和上一次相见时相比,这位公主殿下几乎老了十岁,皮肤暗淡无光,俏脸苍白,眼神中饱含悲痛。 „Yuhao.” Wei Na sum­moned one, in the eye to have the teardrops to tum­ble im­me­di­ately. “雨浩。”维娜呼唤一声,眼中顿时有泪珠滚落。 The Huo Yuhao heart be­came heav­ier, Princess Wei Na will ap­pear here, has proven the Sky Soul Em­pire re­sult. Oth­er­wise, she is im­pos­si­ble to break through the Shrek Acad­emy tra­di­tion, ar­rived here as non- Sea God Pavil­ion mem­ber. 霍雨浩心头变得更加沉重了,维娜公主会出现在这里,已经证明了天魂帝国的结果。否则,她也不可能突破史莱克学院的传统,以非海神阁成员的身份来到这里。 Old Xuan beck­ons to the Huo Yuhao three peo­ple, said: „Just right that you come back, sits down.” 玄老向霍雨浩三人招了招手,道:“你们回来的正好,都坐下吧。” „Yes.” Huo Yuhao re­spect­ful com­plies with one, takes a seat with Beibei and Tang Wu­tong. “是。”霍雨浩恭敬的答应一声,和贝贝、唐舞桐一起落座。 An­cient Elder com­plex­ion ap­pears very sinks to con­geal, this time, Shrek Acad­emy is going to face, since with­out doubt has been the orig­i­na­tion one of the max­i­mum dis­as­ters. Even must sur­pass beast tide that pre­vi­ous Star Dou For­est starts. 诸位宿老的脸色都显得十分沉凝,这一次,史莱克学院将要面对的,无疑是创办以来最大的劫难之一。甚至还要超过上一次星斗大森林发动的兽潮。 beast tide that time, Shrek Acad­emy faces at least is the tra­di­tional fight, but this time, they must face, is ac­tu­ally now on Douluo Con­ti­nent most top Soul Guid­ance Tech­nol­ogy. Who dares say­ing that he does have con­fi­dence? 兽潮那次,史莱克学院面对的至少是传统战斗,而这一次,他们要面对的,却是当今斗罗大陆上最顶级的魂导科技。谁又敢说,自己有把握呢？ Old Xuan looks to Huo Yuhao, „out­side fire­works did you see?” 玄老看向霍雨浩,“外面的烟花你们都看到了？” Huo Yuhao nod­ded silently. Those who made his ac­ci­dent was, he saw a smil­ing face from the Old Xuan face un­ex­pect­edly. 霍雨浩默默地点了点头。令他意外的是,他竟然从玄老脸上看到了一丝笑容。 Old Xuan said in­dif­fer­ently: „Can see from this fire­works that you have cer­tainly made not the small noise in Sun-Moon Em­pire, al­though can­not make the Sun-Moon Em­pire army with­draw, but at least also made them anx­ious, will oth­er­wise not pre­sent the at­tack­ing army has reached the city. Said, you have made any­thing.” 玄老淡然道:“从这烟花就能看出,你们在日月帝国境内一定是闹出了不小的动静,虽然没能让日月帝国大军撤回,但至少也让他们紧张了,否则就不会出现兵临城下的一幕。说说吧,你们都做了什么。” Since be­com­ing Limit Douluo, the Old Xuan im­pos­ing man­ner be­came even more calm. Looks at pre­sent Old Xuan, Huo Yuhao even some­what saw ini­tially the feel­ing of Old Mu. 自从成为了极限斗罗之后,玄老的气势变得越发沉稳了。看着现在的玄老,霍雨浩甚至有些见到了当初穆老的感觉。 In this crit­i­cal time, Old Xuan does not have the di­rect dis­cus­sion to deal with the method of enemy, in­stead asked about their trip of sit­u­a­tions of first, this sta­ble men­tal­ity, made the anx­i­ety of all peo­ple melt sev­eral points. 在这危急时刻,玄老没有直接讨论应对敌人的方法,反而是先询问他们此行的情况,这份稳定的心态,也让所有人的紧张化解了几分。 Huo Yuhao said: „After leav­ing Acad­emy, I go to Bright Strug­gle Moun­tain Range di­rectly, en­ters Sun-Moon Em­pire from the Bright Strug­gle Moun­tain Range di­rec­tion......” 霍雨浩道:“离开学院之后,我直接前往明斗山脉,从明斗山脉方向进入日月帝国……” Is lis­ten­ing to his nar­ra­tion, nu­mer­ous po­si­tion An­cient Elder nod again and again. Es­pe­cially when they heard that Huo Yuhao is ac­tu­ally bring­ing three Soul En­gi­neer Corp sur­prise at­tack Bright Cap­i­tal City, and by one nine lev­els surely in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to ex­plode the Bright Cap­i­tal City im­pe­r­ial palace the time, ter­ri­fied changes coun­te­nance. Princess Wei Na ex­cited has grasped the table edge. 听着他的讲述,众位宿老们连连点头。尤其是当他们听说霍雨浩竟然带着三支魂导师团奇袭明都,并且以一枚九级定装魂导炮弹炸了明都皇宫的时候,都不禁悚然动容。维娜公主更是激动的抓紧了桌子边缘。 How­ever, in nar­rat­ing in process, Huo Yuhao can avoid and un­dead Demi-plane re­lated part, after all, this is he most im­por­tant se­cret, how re­gard­less to say that Princess Wei Na is a by­stander. 不过,在讲述的过程中,霍雨浩可以回避了和亡灵半位面有关的部分,毕竟,这是他最重要的秘密,无论怎么说,维娜公主都是外人。 Asked the monthly ticket, to seek rec­om­men­da­tion vote sup­port. Let our dou­ble list Qi Fei! 求月票、求推荐票支持。让我们双榜齐飞吧！

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #556 Under fearful orange open intrigue


„......, After flee­ing Bright Cap­i­tal City, we slightly make the re­cu­per­a­tion, be­cause does not know here news, there­fore came back. The wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test just ac­tu­ally heard Sky Soul Em­pire......” “……,逃离明都之后,我们略作休整,因为不知道这边消息,所以就回来了。水印广告测试水印广告测试刚刚却听到了天魂帝国……” Old Xuan nod­ded, „this no won­der. You at­tacked these or­di­nary cities are not any­thing, Sun-Moon Em­pire will there­fore not af­fect the front. But your di­rect at­tack Bright Cap­i­tal City, and was suc­cess­ful, this made that Em­peror Sun-Moon Em­pire have to at­tach great im­por­tance. It seems like that you have shown some some­thing that gives one away, mak­ing them guess cor­rectly that this mat­ter is re­lated with you, thus lets the front army to our im­por­tant peo­ple. Within ten days hand over you.” 玄老点了点头,“这就难怪了。你们攻击了那些普通城市不算什么,日月帝国也不会因此而影响到前方。但你们直接攻击明都,并且获得了成功,这就让那日月帝国皇帝不得不重视了。看来,你们还是露出了一些马脚,让他们猜到这件事情和你有关,从而让前线大军向我们要人。十天之内将你交出去。” Huo Yuhao [say / way] look­ing pen­sive: „Old Xuan, I thought that is not such sim­ple.” 霍雨浩若有所思的道:“玄老,我觉得不是这么简单。” „?” The Old Xuan look moves slightly, „said your idea.” “哦？”玄老眼神微动,“说说你的想法。” Huo Yuhao sink­ing sound track: „Sun-Moon Em­pire as­pect, if were trans­mit­ting or­ders lets the front army to the Acad­emy im­por­tant per­son, I thought that this pos­si­bil­ity was very small. After all, in their opin­ion, I should be right in Sun-Moon Em­pire. But our Acad­emy was im­pos­si­ble to sub­poena in a short time found my. Even to hand over me, not pos­si­ble!” 霍雨浩沉声道:“日月帝国方面,如果是传令让前线大军向学院要人,我觉得这个可能性是很小的。毕竟,在他们看来,我应该还在日月帝国境内才对。而我们学院这边是不可能在短时间内传讯找到我的。就算是想要将我交出去,也没可能啊！” Zhang Lex­uan said: „Can that be they finds an ex­cuse, is used to at­tack Acad­emy?” 张乐萱道:“那会不会是他们找个借口,用来攻击学院？” Huo Yuhao shakes the head once more, „should not, be­cause the time was too long. Ten days of time, had in the Soul Guid­ance Tech­nol­ogy war to be very long the pre­sent. They are will­ing ten days of time to hand over me to us, this likely does not want the di­rect at­tack we. Nat­u­rally, does not re­move them is lulling us, quick will launch the of­fen­sive. The pos­si­bil­ity that but this sit­u­a­tion in my opin­ion, has is very low.” 霍雨浩再次摇头,“应该不会,因为时间太长了。十天时间,在现在拥有魂导科技的战争中已经很长了。他们肯给我们十天时间把我交出去,这就不像是要直接攻击我们。当然,也不排除他们是在麻痹我们,很快就会发起攻势。可这种情况在我看来,发生的可能性很小。” [Say / Way] that Princess Wei Na has doubts: „Why?” 维娜公主疑惑的道:“为什么？” Huo Yuhao said: „Now Sun-Moon Em­pire three ser­vices com­man­der is War-God Em­press. I know her. Ini­tially, I when Sun-Moon Em­pire as ex­change lived the study, she once is my Se­nior Sis­ter, stud­ied under a guid­ance of Teacher, among us also had the quite good re­la­tions.” 霍雨浩道:“现在日月帝国的三军统帅乃是帝后战神。我认识她。当初,我在日月帝国作为交换生学习的时候,她曾经是我的师姐,在一个老师的教导下进行学习,我们之间也有较为良好的关系。” He said here, below thigh had ac­tu­ally been pinched by Tang Wu­tong. 他说道这里,下面大腿却已经被唐舞桐捏了一把。 Huo Yuhao does not cer­tainly dare to dis­play. Only can en­dure to con­tinue to say sorely: „My this Se­nior Sis­ter, in Soul En­gi­neer prac­tice, the tal­ent is or­di­nary. But in the mil­i­tary as­pect, has star­tled cer­tainly the col­or­ful strong ca­pa­bil­ity. Ini­tially. De­cep­tive at­tack Bright Strug­gle Moun­tain Range. Ac­tu­ally ac­tu­ally at­tacks the plan of Sky Soul Em­pire, is her plan. Thus has pro­duced such re­sults. Has bro­ken through the Sky Soul Em­pire bor­der. But, she re­turns to Sun-Moon Em­pire to give birth to the crown prince, dur­ing that time, is the Sun-Moon Em­pire army is qui­etest. Now. She came back. Her wis­dom idea is al­ways full, never does the sense­less mat­ter. She clearly knows that Acad­emy im­pos­si­ble to hand over me, ac­tu­ally uses this rea­son at­tack­ing army has reached the city, cer­tainly has any­thing to plan to carry on. Re­gard­ing di­rect at­tack Acad­emy, I be­lieve that the pos­si­bil­ity is not big.” 霍雨浩当然不敢表现出来。只能是忍着疼继续说道:“我这位师姐,在魂导师修炼方面,天赋一般。但在军事方面,却有着惊才绝艳的强大能力。当初。佯攻明斗山脉。却实际攻击天魂帝国的计划,就是她一手策划的。从而产生了那样的效果。攻破了天魂帝国边境。而之后,她返回日月帝国生下太子,那段时间,也是日月帝国大军最为沉寂的。现在。她又回来了。她一向智计百出,从不做无谓之事。她明知道学院不可能将我交出去,却用这个理由兵临城下,一定是有什么计划要进行。至于说,直接攻击学院,我认为,可能性不大。” Yan Shaozhe Dean said: „But can­not rule out this pos­si­bil­ity. Oth­er­wise, once their all-out at­tack, the Acad­emy ten thou­sand years of base in­dus­try is likely de­stroyed in a mo­ment, this is we can­not with­stand.” 言少哲院长道:“但也不能排除这种可能。否则的话,一旦他们全力攻击,学院万年基业很可能毁于一旦,这是我们都承受不了的。” Huo Yuhao sighed one darkly. Nod­ded, said: „This is also the Ju Zi(or­ange) in­tel­li­gent place. She clearly knows that we have to res­cue, there­fore, com­pels us with this way. But at this time, ac­tu­ally re­gard­less of Star Lou Em­pire or Dou Ling Em­pire, most is will­ing to see that Sun-Moon Em­pire such does.” 霍雨浩暗叹一声。点了点头,道:“这也正是橘子聪明的地方。她明知道我们不得不救,所以,才用这种方式挟制我们。而在这种时候,其实无论星罗帝国还是斗灵帝国,都是最愿意看到日月帝国这么做的。” „Why?” Sits can­not bear ask in Huo Yuhao Tang Wu­tong. “为什么？”坐在霍雨浩身边的唐舞桐忍不住问道。 Huo Yuhao said: „Is very sim­ple. Sun-Moon Em­pire launches the at­tack to us, then, our can Shrek not go to face whole-heart­edly? Shrek City be­came a pivot, here, has our Shrek com­plete strength, if again cen­tral­ized Star Luo and strengths of Dou Ling two big em­pires, is most likely to repel the Sun-Moon Em­pire army. But Star Luo and Dou Ling both coun­tries are away from us is very near, can trans­fer in a short time the army, ten days of time, was enough.” 霍雨浩道:“很简单。日月帝国向我们发动攻击,那么,我们史莱克怎能不全力以赴去面对？史莱克城就成为了一个支点,在这里,有我们史莱克全部的力量,如果再集中了星罗和斗灵两大帝国的力量,是最有可能将日月帝国大军击退的。而星罗和斗灵两国距离我们都很近,可以在短时间内将军队调动过来,十天时间,足够了。” Lis­tened to his such say­ing, the com­plex­ion of peo­ple some­what changed, they also sim­i­larly felt plot fla­vor. No, or this should be open in­trigue, at­tacks the enemy to res­cue, can ad­vance or re­treat. No one can find out, the Ju Zi(or­ange) true tac­tic is any­thing. 听他这么一说,众人的脸色都有些变了,他们也同样感觉到了这其中的阴谋味道。不,或者说这应该是阳谋,攻敌所必救,又可进可退。谁也摸不清,橘子真正的战术是什么。 If Ju Zi(or­ange) launched the of­fen­sive, then, Shrek Acad­emy own strength can­not re­sist ob­vi­ously. There­fore, must re­quest re­in­force­ments out­ward. The loss of bro­ken city, Shrek can­not with­stand! 如果橘子发动了攻势,那么,史莱克学院自己的力量显然是抵挡不住的。所以,必须向外求援。破城的损失,史莱克承受不起啊！ But if, came the re­in­force­ments, the Sun-Moon Em­pire army ac­tu­ally to hold troops at the ap­pointed time re­ally? Or do they have other move­ments? This deals? 可是,如果到时真的来了援军,日月帝国大军却按兵不动呢？或者说,他们还有其他动作呢？该怎么应对？ Sud­denly, in Sea God Pavil­ion, is a si­lence. The com­plex­ion of every­one is very ugly. The Sun-Moon Em­pire army made one to move ahead hun­dred li (0.5km), and fired some shells from the sky has be­come the char­ac­ter, made Shrek Acad­emy fall into the as­pect of being in a dilemma. 一时间,海神阁内,已是一片沉默。每个人的脸色都很难看。日月帝国大军只是做了一个前移百里,并发射了一些炮弹在空中成字,就让史莱克学院陷入了进退维谷的局面。 Calm calm Old Xuan, frowned at this time. On the face the look also be­comes dig­ni­fied. 就连原本沉稳淡定的玄老,在这个时候都不禁皱起了眉头。脸上神色也变得凝重起来。 Xian Lin'er said: „Old Xuan, can we reply on Star Dou For­est that side strength? After all re­cently, we and their co­op­er­a­tion have been very happy. Spirit Trans­fer­ring Pagoda head­quar­ters also in our city, if can reply on their some strengths, re­sisted the Sun-Moon Em­pire at­tack to be much eas­ier.” 仙琳儿道:“玄老,我们有没有可能借助星斗大森林那边的力量？毕竟这些日子,我们和它们的合作一直都很愉快。传灵塔总部也在我们城内,若是能够借助它们一些力量,抵挡日月帝国进攻就会容易得多了。” Old Xuan shook the head, said: „The Beast God Di Tian men­tal­ity I was too clear, wish makes him help us, that is im­pos­si­ble. He looks for­ward to our hu­man­ity to kill one an­other, thus weak­ens the human the strength. Such Soul Beast ex­ist­ing space will be much big­ger. Let alone the main force of war is to need Soul Ring Soul Mas­ter and Soul En­gi­neer now. Every time dies, to Soul Beast, is the good deeds.” 玄老摇了摇头,道:“兽神帝天的心态我太清楚了,想要让他帮助我们,那是不可能的。他巴不得我们人类自相残杀,从而削弱人类的力量。那样魂兽的生存空间就会大得多。更何况现在战争的主力都是需要魂环的魂师和魂导师。每死一个,对魂兽来说,都是好事。” Qian Duo­duo said: „If we do at­tack on own ini­tia­tive? Star Luo and Dou Ling both coun­tries after re­ceiv­ing our Dis­tress Sig­nal, cer­tainly at the max­i­mum speed will dis­patch troops. In this case, we gather fully, fights a de­ci­sive bat­tle with Sun-Moon Em­pire di­rectly, will have the op­por­tu­nity? At least this can di­vert them not to han­dle other mat­ters.” 钱多多道:“那如果我们主动出击呢？星罗和斗灵两国在接到我们的求援信号后,一定会以最快的速度派兵过来。在这种情况下,我们聚集全力,和日月帝国正面决战一场,是不是会有机会？至少这样可以牵制他们不去做其他事情。” Huo Yuhao shakes the head say­ing: „Frontage de­ci­sive bat­tle, is very dif­fi­cult. Wanted to re­sist our frontal at­tack, Sun-Moon Em­pire these Soul Guid­ance Array only needs to change to de­fense to be enough com­pletely. Even if can at­tack, the price that we must pay is also huge. More­over the pos­si­bil­ity that at­tacks is very low. Our su­pe­ri­or­ity be only the pop­u­la­tion in high-end strength, in the over­all strength, truly must miss were too many.” 霍雨浩摇头道:“正面决战,很难。想要抵抗住我们的正面攻击,日月帝国那些魂导阵地只需要全部改为防御型就足够了。就算能够攻进去,我们要付出的代价也是巨大。而且攻进去的可能性还很小。我们的优势只有高端战力方面的人数,在整体实力上,确实是要差的太多了。” Xian Lin'er del­i­cate eye­brows tight wrin­kle, „can that be good? Can­not at­tack, de­fends is also very dif­fi­cult to de­fend.” 仙琳儿秀眉紧皱,“那可怎么才好？不能攻,守又很难守住。” Tang Wu­tong opens the mouth to say sud­denly: „The best means should hold troops. Not re­quests re­in­force­ments to Dou Ling and Star Luo both coun­tries, mak­ing them con­sol­i­date own de­fense line.” 唐舞桐突然开口道:“最好的办法应该就是按兵不动。不向斗灵和星罗两国求援,让他们稳固自己的防线。” Lis­tened to her to say these words, Huo Yuhao changed her the vi­sion in­stan­ta­neously, this also sim­i­larly was he wants say­ing that was only, he hes­i­tates. 听她说出这句话,霍雨浩瞬间就将目光转向了她,这也同样是他想说的,只是,他还在犹豫。 „? Why?” Old Xuan some­what sur­prised looks at Tang Wu­tong. But other An­cient Elder, ma­jor­ity are the look is bad. Tang Wu­tong the means that must give up Shrek City sim­ply! “哦？为什么？”玄老有些惊讶的看着唐舞桐。而其他诸位宿老们,大多数却是眼神不善。唐舞桐的这个办法,简直就是要放弃史莱克城啊！ Tang Wu­tong looked at Huo Yuhao one, snort|hum, said: „Some words, you did not say, I said for you. Rea­son that I this propo­si­tions, are be­cause Ju Zi(or­ange) at­tacks the Shrek City pos­si­bil­ity to be very small. So long as we make Yuhao exit to make an ap­pear­ance, mak­ing her know that Yuhao truly in city, be­lieves that she will not order to at­tack Shrek City.” 唐舞桐看了霍雨浩一眼,哼了一声,道:“有些话,你不好说,我替你说。我之所以有这个提议,是因为橘子攻击史莱克城的可能性很小。只要我们让雨浩出去露个面,让她知道雨浩确实是在城内,相信她就不会下令攻击史莱克城。” Yan Shaozhe sur­prised [say / way]: „Is this pos­si­ble? Has she feared Yuhao?” 言少哲惊讶的道:“这怎么可能？难道她怕了雨浩？” Tang Wu­tong curled the lip, very some been jeal­ous lit­tle girl fla­vors, „did not fear, but loves. She likes Yuhao. I be­lieve that she will not in­jure Yuhao. There­fore, so long as knows that Yuhao in city, the pos­si­bil­ity that she or­dered to at­tack a city was very low. I looked that she makes us hand over Yuhao, ab­solutely is a smoke shell.” 唐舞桐撇了撇嘴,很有些吃醋的小女孩儿味道,“不是怕,而是爱。她喜欢雨浩。我相信她不会伤害雨浩的。所以,只要知道雨浩在城内,她下令攻城的可能性就很小。我看,她让我们交出雨浩,绝对是个烟雾弹。” „Ah?” noon An­cient Elder hear of her such say­ing, im­me­di­ately were sur­prised. Sun-Moon Em­pire does War-God Em­press like Huo Yuhao un­ex­pect­edly? This news is not gen­eral un­think­able! “啊？”中午宿老听她这么一说,顿时大吃一惊。日月帝国帝后战神竟然喜欢霍雨浩？这个消息可不是一般的匪夷所思啊！ On the Huo Yuhao face re­veals to shame the em­bar­rassed color, Tang Wu­tong after say­ing these words, re­al­ized own mood some are not right, turns head to look to Huo Yuhao, spits the tongue. 霍雨浩脸上流露出羞窘之色,唐舞桐在说出这番话之后,也意识到自己情绪有些不对,扭头看向霍雨浩,吐了吐舌头。 Had not opened the mouth Old Song said: „This also too child's play. This war, is Sun-Moon Em­pire must sweep across the en­tire Con­ti­nent ag­gres­sive war, that War-God Em­press con­trols the Sun-Moon Em­pire 1 mil­lion armies, will af­fect her res­o­lu­tion be­cause of the chil­dren per­sonal re­la­tion­ships?” 一直没有开口过的宋老道:“这也太儿戏了。这场战争,乃是日月帝国要席卷全大陆的侵略战争,那帝后战神掌控日月帝国1000000大军,会因为儿女私情而影响到她的决断吗？” Lis­tened to Old Song this word, nu­mer­ous po­si­tion An­cient Elder slightly nod the head. In the Tang Wu­tong words the jeal­ousy is full, they nat­u­rally that hear of com­ing out. But must say that makes them be­lieve Sun-Moon Em­pire three ser­vices com­man­der will make a de­ci­sion be­cause of the per­sonal re­la­tion­ships, they are very dif­fi­cult to be­lieve. 听了宋老此言,众位宿老都不禁微微颔首。唐舞桐的话中醋意十足,他们当然那听的出来。但要说让他们相信日月帝国三军统帅会因为私情而决断,他们还是很难相信的。 At this time Huo Yuhao was not in­stead good to say any­thing again, ac­tu­ally, in his heart, the idea was the same with Tang Wu­tong. Just saw that fire­works from him the time, he judges, this cer­tainly is the smoke shell that Ju Zi(or­ange) emits, but, Ju Zi(or­ange) should not think that he such will quickly re­turn to Acad­emy, hap­pen to was seen by him. 这个时候霍雨浩反而不好再说什么了,其实,在他心中,想法和唐舞桐是一样的。从他刚刚看到那烟花的时候,他就判断出,这一定是橘子放出的烟雾弹,只不过,橘子应该没想到他这么快会回到学院,正好被他看到。 Ju Zi(or­ange) on fierce on was too fiercely fierce, be­fore 600,000 armies who this smoke shell put pressed, threat­ens Shrek City, mak­ing Shrek not dare not to deal. At this time, if he also pro­posed that with the Tang Wu­tong same sug­ges­tion, def­i­nitely will suf­fer re­sist­ing of nu­mer­ous po­si­tion An­cient Elder. 橘子厉害就厉害在她这烟雾弹放的太厉害了,600000大军前压,威胁史莱克城,让史莱克不敢不有所应对。在这种时候,如果他也提出和唐舞桐一样的建议,必然会遭受到众位宿老的抵制。 Old Xuan hes­i­tates say­ing: „This as­pect is com­plex, ac­tu­ally has to guard, in Shrek City has 100,000 gar­ri­son troops, hap­pen to Yuhao you also came back. Takes place three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp arrange­ment as soon as pos­si­ble, pre­pares for ac­tion. Pre­pare Soul Guid­ance Array place. Lex­uan, you here the sit­u­a­tion will no­tify Star Luo and Dou Ling both coun­tries, in­vites they pay at­ten­tion to the bor­der de­fense at the same time, pre­pares to reen­force to us.” 玄老沉吟道:“这次局面复杂,却又不得不防,史莱克城内现有100000守军,正好雨浩你们也回来了。尽快将三大魂导师团布置就位,准备作战。布置好魂导阵地。乐萱,你将这边情况通报星罗、斗灵两国,请他们注意边境防御的同时,准备对我们增援。” „Yes.” Zhang Lex­uan com­plies with one. “是。”张乐萱答应一声。 „Yes.” Huo Yuhao has hes­i­tated, com­plies. “是。”霍雨浩迟疑了一下,也答应下来。 The in­struc­tion of Old Xuan, after is two opin­ions mu­tu­ally com­pro­mise, after all, is Sea God Pavil­ion Pavil­ion Mas­ter, he must give pri­or­ity to the Shrek life or death. 玄老的吩咐,已经是两种意见相互折中之后,毕竟,身为海神阁阁主,他也要以史莱克存亡为重。 Then dis­cussed that was some de­fense de­tails, Princess Wei Na also said that the Sky Soul Em­pire rem­nants of de­feated troops will as­sist Shrek to de­fend stub­bornly whole-heart­edly. 接下来商议的,就是一些防御细节了,维娜公主也表示,天魂帝国残部将全力以赴协助史莱克固守。 The con­fer­ence was held late at night to end. 会议一直进行到深夜才结束。 Left Acad­emy, Huo Yuhao, Tang Wu­tong and Beibei walks to­ward Tang Sect. 出了学院,霍雨浩、唐舞桐和贝贝向唐门走去。 In the Beibei eye is re­veal­ing the color of think­ing con­sis­tently, „Yuhao, how I thought that some are not right. Has the feel­ing of plant­ing lead by the nose?” 贝贝眼中一致都流露着思索之色,“雨浩,我怎么觉得有些不对。有种被人牵着鼻子走的感觉？”

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #557 Comes to understand


Huo Yuhao sighed, „per­haps, we came back is a mis­take. We not only can­not di­vert the Sun-Moon Em­pire army, in­stead was di­verted by them in Shrek City. Can­not pose the threat to the Sun-Moon Em­pire na­tive place, as the mat­ter stands, our orig­i­nal strate­gies all be­came the bub­ble. More­over, Wu­tong said right, I be­lieve that by the Ju Zi(or­ange) wis­dom, will not place Shrek City the main ob­jec­tive of at­tack. At­tack­ing a for­ti­fied po­si­tion, but may also be at­tacks the two coun­tries whole-heart­edly sup­port the firm city, com­pelling Acad­emy to go all out, this is not the mat­ter that pre­sent Sun-Moon Em­pire should do.” 霍雨浩叹息一声,“或许,我们回来是个错误。我们不但没能将日月帝国大军牵制回去,反而被他们牵制在了史莱克城。再不能对日月帝国本土构成威胁,这样一来,我们原来的战略就全都成为泡影了。而且,舞桐说得对,我相信,以橘子的智慧,绝不会将主要攻击目标放在史莱克城。攻坚,还有可能是攻击两国全力以赴支持的坚城,逼学院拼命,这可不是现在日月帝国应该做的事。” „Sorry, Yuhao, I should not say, if you an­a­lyzes, can per­haps say obe­di­ence po­si­tion An­cient Elder.” Tang Wu­tong low­ers the head, seems like the child of wrong thing. “对不起,雨浩,我不该那么说,如果是你自己来分析的话,说不定能说服众位宿老。”唐舞桐低着头,就像是个做错事的孩子。 Huo Yuhao grips her hand, shook the head, said: „Does not blame you, even if me, the re­sult will not change. Ju Zi(or­ange) is re­ally fierce, this move of open in­trigue, com­pelling Acad­emy to help one­self, no one dares to make the gam­bling stake with the Acad­emy safety. This is she most as­tute place. Re­ally is quite fierce!” 霍雨浩握住她的手,摇了摇头,道:“不怪你,就算是我来说,结局也不会改变的。橘子真是厉害,这一招阳谋,逼得学院不得不自救,谁也不敢用学院的安危做赌注。这才是她最精明的地方。果然是好厉害啊！” Beibei said: „We can­not this way, if cer­tainly wants the means to deal, oth­er­wise, this time was per­haps dan­ger­ous.” 贝贝道:“那我们也不能就这样下去,一定要想办法应对,否则的话,这次恐怕就危险了。” Huo Yuhao nod­ded, said: „This, Wu­tong, you re­turns to Acad­emy, to Inner Court that side in­quired that a de­ploy­ment of next pre­sent Star Lou Em­pire, where has a look at Duke White Tiger as well as Star Lou Em­pire main force. First Se­nior Brother, we go back first are the Lit­tle Ya Teacher treat­ments, then I look for a Duke White Tiger, to his Chen by the stake, mak­ing him pay at­ten­tion to the se­cu­rity. As for Dou Ling Em­pire that side, I come back to go from Star Lou Em­pire, that side we only know Heav­enly Sun Douluo, can only ask him to help. Can look con­vince Dou Ling Em­pire many main forces do not send.” 霍雨浩点了点头,道:“这样吧,舞桐,你回学院,到内院那边打听一下现在星罗帝国的部署,看看白虎公爵以及星罗帝国主力在什么地方。大师兄,我们先回去为小雅老师治疗,然后我去找一趟白虎公爵,向他陈以利害关系,让他注意安全。至于斗灵帝国那边,我从星罗帝国回来就去,那边我们只认识天阳斗罗,只能请他老人家帮忙了。看看能不能说服斗灵帝国也不要将过多的主力派过来。” „Sev­eral thou­sand years ago, under co­or­di­na­tion of Acad­emy, con­cen­trates the strengths of three big em­pires, routs the Sun-Moon Em­pire main force, thus makes them lose to re­turn, es­tab­lishes these for sev­eral thou­sand years peace. Feared that this Star Luo and Dou Ling both coun­tries are hold­ing the sim­i­lar faith, if so, they will def­i­nitely turn out in full strength, such trou­bled. We fell into the sub­se­quent party now, can only be deals pas­sively.” “数千年前,就是在学院的牵头之下,集中三大帝国的力量,击溃日月帝国主力,从而让他们兵败而回,奠定这数千年来的和平。就怕这一次星罗、斗灵两国还是抱着同样的信念,如果是这样的话,他们必然会倾巢出动,那样就麻烦了。我们现在已经落入了后手,只能是被动应对。” Here, in the Huo Yuhao heart raised a di­lut­ed­ness, he dis­cov­ered that his strength was too tiny, by strength of the, is un­able to change the cur­rent sit­u­a­tion. 说到这里,霍雨浩心中不禁升起一丝无力感,他发现,自己的力量还是太渺小了,以一己之力,无法改变目前的局势。 Thinks had very good ef­fect in Sun-Moon Em­pire do­mes­tic de­struc­tion, who knows, the front, the di­rec­tion of Ju Zi(or­ange) to Sun-Moon Em­pire army is swifter and fiercer, ar­rived has let his some de­grees of being at wit's end. 原本以为在日月帝国境内的破坏已经有了很好的效果,可谁知道,前线这边,橘子对日月帝国大军的指挥更加凌厉,已经到了让他有些无计可施的程度了。 Not is very for­mi­da­ble! 还是不够强大啊！ „Yuhao.” Tang Wu­tong called him sud­denly. “雨浩。”唐舞桐突然叫了他一声。 „Um?” Huo Yuhao turns head to look to her. “嗯？”霍雨浩扭头看向她。 Tang Wu­tong stretches across one step, ar­rives in front of him, she com­pared with Huo Yuhao also short many, they al­most hor­i­zon­tally view. Her vi­sion bril­liant looks at Huo Yuhao, said: „Can­not lose the con­fi­dence!” 唐舞桐横跨一步,走到他面前,她比霍雨浩也矮不了多少,两人几乎是平视的。她目光灼灼的看着霍雨浩,道:“不能失去信心啊！” In Huo Yuhao heart one cold, im­me­di­ately un­der­stood her mean­ing, nods the head slightly, nod­ded to her. 霍雨浩心中一凛,顿时明白了她的意思,微微颔首,向她点了点头。 Tang Wu­tong said: „Ini­tially, Teacher passed on our legacy, was hopes that we can be­come the main­stays of Acad­emy in the fu­ture, pro­tected Acad­emy, de­vel­oped Acad­emy. We can­not dis­ap­point Teacher. Yuhao, you thought that in­di­vid­ual strength was ex­tremely tiny, looks that the Sun-Moon Em­pire army threat­ens the bor­der, our in­di­vid­ual strengths have not been able to change the re­sult of this war, feel­ing that even some­what is hard to re­sist?” 唐舞桐道:“当初,老师传我们衣钵,就是希望我们未来能够成为学院的中流砥柱,守护学院,发展学院。我们不能让老师失望。雨浩,你是不是觉得,个人的力量太过渺小了,看着日月帝国大军压境,我们个人的力量已经无法改变这场战争的结局,甚至都有些难以抗拒的感觉？” Huo Yuhao sur­prised looks at this Tang Wu­tong, „Wu­tong, you are re­ally in­ter­linked with my re­gard! I re­ally had this thought a mo­ment ago.” 霍雨浩惊讶的看这唐舞桐,“舞桐,你果然和我心意相通啊！我刚才确实是有了这个念头。” Tang Wu­tong stern [say / way]: „Right, in­di­vid­ual strength, in the face of the col­lec­tive truly is very tiny. How­ever, after in­di­vid­ual ef­fort as for­mi­da­ble as cer­tain ex­tent, is ac­tu­ally not can­not af­fect the en­tire war! Oth­ers can­not, you also should the en­ergy. Don't for­get, you are only Ul­ti­mate Sol­dier that Shrek Acad­emy trains! More­over, you are not a per­son are al­ways fight­ing, you have me, First Se­nior Brother, our Tang Sect part­ner, in your back, has the en­tire Shrek Acad­emy sup­port. There­fore, no mat­ter, you can­not be dis­cour­aged. You have the ad­van­ta­geous abil­ity, Twin Mar­tial Souls, un­dead Demi-plane, if also who can change the course of events, that only then you! Re­gard­less of your me, is not very truly for­mi­da­ble, we must be­come stronger, can truly be­come the leader of this war.” 唐舞桐正色道:“没错,个人的力量,在集体面前确实是十分渺小。但是,当个人力量强大到一定程度后,却并不是不能影响整个战局啊！别人不能,你也应该能。别忘了,你可是史莱克学院培养出来的唯一一个极限单兵！而且,你从来都不是一个人在战斗,你还有我,还有大师兄,还有咱们唐门的伙伴,在你的背后,更有着整个史莱克学院支持。所以,无论什么时候,你都不能气馁。你有着得天独厚的能力,双生武魂,还有亡灵半位面,如果说,还有谁能扭转乾坤,那就只有你了！只是,无论你我,确实还都不够强大,我们必须要变得更强,才能真正成为这场战争的主导者。” Beibei be with smile on the face looks at Tang Wu­tong and Huo Yuhao, „Wu­tong said right, no mat­ter, we can­not be dis­cour­aged, even if were de­feated fi­nally, again? At least we whole-heart­edly, did not re­main re­gret­tably.” 贝贝面带微笑的看着唐舞桐和霍雨浩,“舞桐说得对,无论什么时候,我们都不能气馁,哪怕是最终失败了,又如何呢？至少我们全力以赴了,不留遗憾。” Huo Yuhao was silent, a mo­ment ago his heart truly was chaotic, the Tang Wu­tong words just liked se­vere warn­ing, awak­ened from the con­fu­sion him. 霍雨浩沉默了,刚才他的心确实是乱了,唐舞桐的话犹如当头棒喝,将他从混乱中唤醒。 Saw him to fall into the pon­der, Tang Wu­tong no longer spoke, ar­rived at side him, gripped his hand, gave him to sup­port with the tem­per­a­ture of one­self palm silently. 见他陷入思考,唐舞桐就不再吭声了,重新来到他身边,握住他的手,用自己手掌的温度默默地给予他支持。 In the Huo Yuhao heart mused that Ju Zi(or­ange) Ju Zi(or­ange), you gave me to have a huge dif­fi­cult prob­lem re­ally! How bro­ken bu­reau, im­por­tant, once the bro­ken bu­reau has made a mis­take, then likely loses 100 per­cent. 霍雨浩心中暗想,橘子啊橘子,你真是给我出了一个天大的难题啊！如何破局,至关重要,一旦破局错了,那么,接下来很可能就是满盘皆输。 Some­times, the plot is in­stead good to deal, is such open in­trigue, more­over open in­trigue that op­presses oth­ers by the po­ten­tial, in­stead is most for­mi­dabe. 有的时候,阴谋反而好应对,越是这样的阳谋,而且是以势压人的阳谋,反而最难对付。 Wants the bro­ken bu­reau, must de­feat the enemy by a sur­prise at­tack! 想要破局,必须出奇制胜！ In­di­vid­ual strength, Ul­ti­mate Sol­dier? 个人的力量,极限单兵？ Sud­denly, in the Huo Yuhao mind re­mem­bered Tang Wu­tong just to say words, in the mind was sim­i­lar to has a light­ning to pass over gen­tly and swiftly in­stan­ta­neously gen­eral. 突然,霍雨浩脑海中想起唐舞桐刚刚说过的话,脑海中如同有一道闪电瞬间掠过一般。 In his mind re­called sud­denly at the point of death mother be­fore has spo­ken a few words: 他脑海中突然回想起妈妈在临死前说过的一句话: „Yuhao, the fu­ture road, can only be you walked, mother can­not ac­com­pany you. You must re­mem­ber, on this world, you can en­tirely be­lieve per­son who can com­pletely de­pend upon, only then you. Only then be­come for­mi­da­ble, can be you to do, pro­tects you to pro­tect.” “雨浩,未来的路,只能是你自己走了,妈妈不能陪你了。你要记住,在这个世界上,你能够完全相信又能完全依靠的人,只有你自己。只有自己变得强大,才能做你想做的,守护你要守护的。” Only then one­self! 只有自己！ Bang 轰 His top of the head above fierce dis­tor­tion fluc­tu­a­tion that rid­dle in­stan­ta­neous to shat­ter in Huo Yuhao mind, the in­tense mind fluc­tu­a­tion ini­ti­ates ap­pears, en­ters air­borne. 霍雨浩脑海中的谜团瞬间破碎,强烈的精神波动引发的他头顶上空一阵剧烈的扭曲波动出现,直入空中。 The air­borne fog will shortly dis­pel, be­comes sunny. 空中云雾顷刻排开,重新变得晴朗起来。 takes a deep breath, in Huo Yuhao dou­ble pupil none re­main­ing twin­kle, sink­ing sound track: „First Se­nior Brother, Wu­tong, we can­not be chaotic at this time. Ac­cord­ing to me a mo­ment ago said that Wu­tong you re­turns to Acad­emy, in­quired that Star Lou Em­pire that side de­ploy­ment, must find the place that Duke White Tiger is sta­tioned. Then First Se­nior Brother trou­bles you to go per­son­ally, sees Duke White Tiger, told him my spec­u­la­tion and here sit­u­a­tion, mak­ing him prob­a­bly prob­a­bly bear, do not send the com­plete main force, then or­ga­nized elite le­gion, pre­pared to move at any time.” 深吸口气,霍雨浩双眸中精光闪烁,沉声道:“大师兄,舞桐,这个时候我们不能乱。还按我刚才说的,舞桐你回学院,打听一下星罗帝国那边的部署,一定要找到白虎公爵驻扎的地方。然后大师兄麻烦您亲自去一趟,去见白虎公爵,将我的推测和这边的情况告诉他,让他务必要忍住,不要将全部主力派过来,然后组织一支精锐的军团,随时准备行动。” „Wu­tong, you go to Dou Ling Em­pire, only then you same know Heav­enly Sun Douluo with me, found him, told him the sit­u­a­tion sim­i­larly. Said said to Duke White Tiger with First Se­nior Brother is the same. Good that if I guess, the Ju Zi(or­ange) true goal is very pos­si­ble is Dou Ling Em­pire. Be­cause Dou Ling Em­pire is small­est and weak­est, some­times, the sim­plest guess is most cor­rect, be­cause is re­verse re­verse.” “舞桐,你去斗灵帝国,只有你跟我一样认识天阳斗罗,找到他,把情况同样告诉他。说的和大师兄对白虎公爵说的一样。如果我猜的不错,橘子的真正目标很可能是斗灵帝国。因为斗灵帝国最为弱小,有的时候,最简单的猜测才是最正确的,因为是反向的反向。” Tang Wu­tong said: „You?” 唐舞桐道:“那你呢？” Huo Yuhao hugs into her the bosom, has ca­ressed her pink-blue color long hair, „I give the Lit­tle Ya Teacher treat­ment first, then im­me­di­ately closes up, at­tacks Ti­tled Douluo. You said right, if in­di­vid­ual strength can change the war, then, this per­son can only be I. Only then I have to sub­merge the abil­ity of hos­tile camp. My this Ul­ti­mate Sol­dier, must achieve Ab­solute!” 霍雨浩将她搂入怀中,抚了抚她那一头粉蓝色长发,“我先给小雅老师治疗,然后立刻闭关,冲击封号斗罗。你说得对,如果个人的力量能够改变战局,那么,这个人就只能是我。只有我拥有潜入敌营的能力。我这个极限单兵,一定要做到极致！” Tang Wu­tong silent, then makes an ef­fort has se­lected, turned around to run, di­rectly soars Acad­emy. She is very clear, risk of Huo Yuhao this im­pact, but, she sim­i­larly is also clear, now at this time, this was best to choose. Once Huo Yuhao sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus breaks through, then, he is not Ti­tled Douluo of or­di­nary sig­nif­i­cance! 唐舞桐沉默了一下,然后才用力的点了下头,转身就跑,直奔学院去了。她很清楚,霍雨浩这次冲击的危险性,但是,她也同样明白,现在这个时候,这才是最好选择。霍雨浩的第二魂核一旦突破,那么,他绝不是普通意义的封号斗罗啊！ Beibei looks at Huo Yuhao, the look is some­what com­plex, „Yuhao, you......” 贝贝看着霍雨浩,眼神有些复杂,“雨浩,你……” Huo Yuhao lifts the hand, stops Beibei the words that wants say­ing that smiles, said: „First Se­nior Brother, man real man, this forc­ing up time, can­not be timid. Lets me and Ju Zi(or­ange), well fights, she leaves the open in­trigue, I also leave the open in­trigue. Who has a look is can achieve the final suc­cess.” 霍雨浩抬手,止住贝贝想要说出来的话,粲然一笑,道:“大师兄,男子汉大丈夫,该顶上去的时候,绝不能怯懦。就让我和橘子,好好的斗上一场,她出阳谋,我就也出阳谋。看看到底是谁能够获得最后的胜利。” Re­turns to Tang Sect, other peo­ple went to be busy, in the hall only sits one per­son. 回到唐门,其他人都去忙了,大厅中只坐着一人。 The Tang Ya com­plex­ion is as be­fore pale, sits there, looks like a take pity on lily, looks at her ap­pear­ance, let alone is Beibei, even if Huo Yuhao, in the heart slightly aches. He still clearly re­mem­bers own that lively adorable Lit­tle Ya Teacher! 唐雅的脸色依旧苍白,坐在那里,就像是一朵让人怜惜的百合花,看着她的样子,别说是贝贝,就算是霍雨浩,心中都是微微作痛。他还清楚地记得自己那个活泼可爱的小雅老师啊！ Just, this time Tang Ya, on face has the ex­cite­ment that can­not con­ceal, sits there, both hands ac­tu­ally grip the tight lower hem cor­ner, some­what in­tensely is wait­ing. 只不过,此时的唐雅,脸上却有着一些掩饰不住的兴奋,坐在那里,双手却攥紧衣角,有些紧张的等待着。 „Lit­tle Ya Teacher!” The Huo Yuhao half step en­ters the hall, Beibei in­stead slow his some, lip sip tight, in the eye the tears are partly vis­i­ble. “小雅老师！”霍雨浩快步走进大厅,贝贝反而慢了他一些,嘴唇抿的紧紧的,眼中泪光若隐若现。 Sev­eral years, al­though res­cues Tang Ya, but Beibei sings in a cho­rus un­able to see, Tang Ya never true joy­ful. 几年了,虽然将唐雅救回来,可贝贝又合唱看不出,唐雅从来就没有真正快乐过。 Her is not joy­ful, is not be­cause own is not healthy, be­cause Tang Sect under every­body's work­ing as one pro­gresses day by day shortly, but one­self can­not add on any busily, there­fore is painful! 她的不快乐,并不是因为自己的身体不好,而是因为眼看着在大家的齐心协力下唐门蒸蒸日上,而自己又帮不上任何忙,所以才痛苦啊！ Re­con­structs Tang Sect, is in her heart had vainly hoped for that for this dream, she ini­tially even chose left Beibei. Ob­vi­ously this mat­ter in her heart is im­por­tant. But now, the Tang Sect re­con­struc­tion started, and has been de­vel­op­ing high-speed, but this sect mas­ter ac­tu­ally any­thing could not do, can only see every­body to bus­tle about, looks that every­body risked one's life, for her, the suf­fer­ing of in­ner­most feel­ings won the pain on body by far. 重建唐门,一直是她心中梦想,为了这个梦想,她当初甚至选择了离开贝贝。可见这件事在她心中是何等重要。而现在,唐门重建已经开始,而且一直在高速发展,可她这个门主却什么也干不了,只能眼看着大家忙碌,看着大家去出生入死,对她来说,内心的煎熬远远胜于身体上的痛苦。 Is re­ly­ing on Sword of Life that Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill and Huo Yuhao pro­vide, the Tang Ya pre­sent phys­i­cal con­di­tion is sta­ble, but she ac­tu­ally as be­fore is a del­i­cate or­di­nary young girl. 凭借着乾坤造化丹和霍雨浩提供的生灵之剑,唐雅现在的身体状况是稳定的,但她却依旧是一个弱不禁风的普通少女罢了。 -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------- The peer­less Tang Sect car­toon just up­loaded five in our pres­ti­gious plat­forms, Wang Dong en­ters the stage of­fi­cially!!!! Has a look quickly. I the group have sent, if after is, joins the book friend in plat­form, the trans­mis­sion: Peer­less Tang Sect 125, con­sult, con­sults the front car­toon, so long as changed Chi­nese fig­ure to be good, for ex­am­ple: Peer­less Tang Sect one, and so on. 绝世唐门漫画在我们的威信平台刚刚上传五张,王冬正式出场！！！！快去看看吧。我已经群发了,如果是后加入平台的书友,发送:绝世唐门125,进行查阅,查阅前面的漫画,只要更改中文数字就行了,譬如:绝世唐门一,以此类推。 Joins the method of our plat­form to be very sim­ple, pres­tige - top right-hand cor­ner plus sign - in­creases friend - search pub­lic num­ber - searches Tang three few, has the au­then­ti­ca­tion, is our fam­i­lies. Then, the car­toon is Yuhao and Wang Dong splen­did match play! 加入我们平台的方法很简单,威信-右上角加号-添加朋友-查找公众号-搜索唐家三少,带认证的,就是我们的家哦。接下来,漫画将是雨浩和王冬精彩的对手戏啦！ The quick­est re­newal, non- ball win­dow read­ing in­vited. 最快更新,无弹窗阅读请。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #557 Came to understand


But in just, Tang Ya heard that Huo Yuhao calmly how­ever looked for Blue Sil­ver Em­peror to come back, she fi­nally hope­fully re­stored, can she not be un­happy? 而就在刚刚,唐雅听说,霍雨浩静然找了蓝银皇回来,她终于有希望恢复了,她又怎能不喜呢？ „ Yuhao! Thank you. Wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test “雨浩！谢谢你。水印广告测试 Wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test ” sees Huo Yuhao, Tang Ya stands up at the same time, has wept co­pi­ously. 水印广告测试”看到霍雨浩,唐雅站起身的同时,已是泪如雨下。 Huo Yuhao hur­ries say­ing: „Lit­tle Ya Teacher, did not have ini­tially you and First Se­nior Brother giv­ing shel­ter, does not have my today, said that thanked is too po­lite. I im­me­di­ately start to give you to treat. First cured you said again that was good?” 霍雨浩赶忙道:“小雅老师,没有当初你和大师兄的收留,就没有我的今天,说谢就太客气了。我马上就开始给你治疗。先把你治好了再说,好不好？” At the same time was say­ing, his Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion re­leases, very easy had found that Blue Sil­ver Em­peror in Tang Sect. 一边说着,他的精神探测就释放开来,很容易的就在唐门之中找到了那位蓝银皇。 Beibei ar­rives at side Lit­tle Ya, sup­port­ing gen­tly she, at this time, this re­fined Tang Sect First Se­nior Brother was a few words could not say. His sen­ti­ment to Tang Ya that blaz­ing, is, in re­cent years, for Tang Ya, the suf­fer­ing in his heart with­stand­ing even must above Tang Ya! 贝贝走到小雅身边,轻轻的拥住她,这个时候,这位儒雅的唐门大师兄却是一句话也说不出来了。他对唐雅的感情是那么的炽烈,可是,这些年来,为了唐雅,他心中承受的煎熬甚至还要在唐雅自己之上啊！ Waited these many years, healthy Tang Ya must re­turn to side him fi­nally, can he not be ex­cited? 等了这么多年,一个健康的唐雅终于要回到他身边了,他又怎么能不激动呢？ After a lit­tle while, Blue Sil­ver Em­peror goes to the hall, when its first saw Tang Ya knows that this was own goal. Tang Ya Blue Sil­ver Grass Mar­tial Soul aura was very weak, but ac­tu­ally as be­fore ex­ists, is sov­er­eign in Blue Sil­ver Grass, he nat­u­rally can feel clearly. 少顷,蓝银皇来到大厅之中,当它第一眼看到唐雅的时候就知道这是自己的目标了。唐雅身上的蓝银草武魂气息已经十分微弱了,但却依旧存在着,身为蓝银草中的皇者,他自然能够清楚的感觉到。 „Hello! Blue Sil­ver Em­peror.” Beibei can say the words to come fi­nally, he very earnest bows to salute to Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, Lit­tle Ya is also so. “您好！蓝银皇。”贝贝终于能说出话来了,他很认真的向蓝银皇躬身行礼,小雅也是如此。 Huo Yuhao said to Blue Sil­ver Em­peror: „Se­nior, this is my First Se­nior Brother, this is Lit­tle Ya Teacher, be­lieves that you also looked, Lit­tle Ya Teacher Mar­tial Soul re­ceived heavy wound, there­fore we needed your help. My First Se­nior Brother had also pledged, so long as does not come under the Soul Beast ac­tive threat, does not hunt and kill Soul Beast on own ini­tia­tive.” 霍雨浩向蓝银皇道:“前辈,这位是我大师兄,这位就是小雅老师,相信您也看出来了,小雅老师的武魂受到重创,所以我们需要您的帮助。我大师兄也发过誓,只要不受到魂兽主动攻击,绝不主动去猎杀魂兽。” Blue Sil­ver Em­peror nod­ded, very di­rect [say / way]: „That starts. First treats the wound to her. Then said other.” 蓝银皇点了点头,很直接的道:“那就开始吧。先给她治伤。然后再说其他。” At the same time was say­ing, Blue Sil­ver Em­peror that the arm that is formed by the vine lifts, shakes gen­tly, sec­tion of glit­ter­ing and translu­cent carv­ing blue vine flut­tered. Falls in the Huo Yuhao hand. 一边说着,蓝银皇那由藤蔓形成的手臂抬起,轻轻一抖,一截晶莹剔透的蓝色藤蔓就飘了出来。落在霍雨浩手中。 Sought dili­gently was so long. Every one time fails when suc­cess seemed within reach, even con­tin­u­ously in the en­tire Con­ti­nent dis­per­sion news. allow at the large sum of money, Blue Sil­ver Em­peror that can­not find, fi­nally ap­peared in Tang Sect. 努力寻找了这么久。每一次都功败垂成,甚至一直在全大陆的散布消息。许以重金,都没能找到的蓝银皇,终于出现在了唐门之中。 Huo Yuhao turns head to say to Beibei: „First Se­nior Brother, we look for quiet room. Now starts. The Blue Sil­ver Em­peror se­nior, do you also come?” 霍雨浩扭头向贝贝道:“大师兄,咱们找一间静室。现在就开始。蓝银皇前辈,您也来吗？” „Um, I have a look.” Blue Sil­ver Em­peror nod­ded, after all, Lit­tle Ya will be very pos­si­ble in the fu­ture is the load bear­ing the mas­ter of his spirit, he must pay at­ten­tion. “嗯,我也看看。”蓝银皇点了点头,毕竟,小雅未来很可能是承载他魂灵的主人,他还是要多关注一下。 Looked for quiet room to be too easy, in back­yard. Chose quiet room, Beibei pro­tec­tor, Huo Yuhao is the Tang Ya treat­ment, Blue Sil­ver Em­peror looks in the one side per­son­ally. 找静室太容易了,在后院之中。选择了一间静室,贝贝亲自护法,霍雨浩为唐雅治疗,蓝银皇在一旁看。 „Lit­tle Ya Teacher. You sit cross-legged to sit, then re­laxes the body. After I help you Mar­tial Soul awak­ens, you at­tempt to start to re­volve your Soul Power, should not be anx­ious, our lit­tle. Ok?” “小雅老师。您盘膝坐好,然后放松身体。等我帮您将武魂唤醒后,您就尝试着开始运转自己的魂力,不要急,我们一点点的来。好吗？” Tang Ya nod­ded, how she can not be anx­ious! She even wins the past to the hope of strength now. But she also knows that is cer­tainly calm at this crit­i­cal mo­ment, oth­er­wise over­stated trou­bles. 唐雅点了点头,她怎能不急啊！她现在对力量的渴望甚至更胜从前。但她也知道,在这个关键时刻一定要冷静,否则走火入魔就麻烦了。 takes a deep breath, dili­gently was been tran­quil by one­self, Tang Ya sits cross-legged to sit. 深吸口气,努力的让自己平静下来,唐雅盘膝坐好。 Nearby Blue Sil­ver Em­peror lifts both hands sud­denly, makes the move­ment that empty has pressed to Tang Ya. Im­me­di­ately, a blue misty halo float­ing falls on Tang Ya. 一旁的蓝银皇突然抬起双手,向唐雅做出了一个虚按的动作。顿时,一蓬蓝蒙蒙的光晕飘然落在唐雅身上。 Strange say­ing that the Tang Sect peo­ple try var­i­ous types to treat Soul Abil­ity in­valid Tang Ya, under the sweep of this blue light, the whole per­son re­ally has the body and mind peace­ful feel­ing. 说也奇怪,唐门众人尝试过各种治疗魂技都无效的唐雅,在这层蓝光的笼罩下,整个人竟然都有种身心安宁的感觉。 Grat­i­tude looked at Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, nod­ded to him. 感激的看了一眼蓝银皇,向他点了点头。 Huo Yuhao ar­rives in front of Tang Ya, grasps Blue Sil­ver Em­peror that vine in the hand. Pure Mys­te­ri­ous Heaven Skill Soul Power pours into slowly. On this Blue Sil­ver Em­peror vine sends out the in­tense blue halo im­me­di­ately. 霍雨浩走到唐雅面前,将蓝银皇的那段藤蔓握在手中。纯正的玄天功魂力缓缓注入其中。这蓝银皇藤蔓上顿时散发出强烈的蓝色光晕。 The Tang Ya ten­der body shakes slightly, she as if felt one­self within the body to have any thing to start to have the fluc­tu­a­tion in the aura of that Blue Sil­ver Em­peror vine, be­cause al­though the vi­tal­ity of her within the body the Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill rea­son no longer passed, but will not in­crease, but at this time, some whole body warm feel­ings, as if within the body had any thing to be awak­ened. 唐雅娇躯微微一震,她似乎感受到了自己体内有什么东西在那蓝银皇藤蔓的气息中开始产生了波动,她体内的生命力虽然因为乾坤造化丹的原因不再流逝,但也不会增加,而这时候,却有种全身暖融融的感觉,仿佛体内有什么东西真的被唤醒了似的。 Huo Yuhao Soul Power in­jects the en­hance­ment, „pū” a light sound, that Blue Sil­ver Em­peror vine to shat­ter, changes into the in­nu­mer­able blue bur­nish­ing pow­ders to drift about sud­denly in the midair. 霍雨浩魂力注入增强,“噗”的一声轻响,那段蓝银皇藤蔓骤然破碎,化为无数蓝色光粉漂荡在半空之中。 At this time, saw the Huo Yuhao for­mi­da­ble con­trol­ling force. These bur­nish­ing pow­ders do not pro­lif­er­ate under his Soul Power con­trol, but is the even dis­per­sion in the air. Part in­te­grates from the Tang Ya pore place qui­etly, an­other part en­ters within the body with her breath. 在这个时候,就看出霍雨浩强大的控制力了。那些光粉在他的魂力控制下绝不扩散,而是均匀的分散在空气之中。一部分悄然从唐雅的毛孔处融入,另一部分则是伴随着她的呼吸进入体内。 The body of Tang Ya starts slightly shiv­ers, the body of whole per­son has also cov­ered light blue color. 唐雅的身体开始轻微的颤抖起来,整个人的身上也都蒙上了一层淡淡的蓝色。 Huo Yuhao re­laxed slightly, cur­rently speak­ing, the sit­u­a­tion is at least nor­mal. As for fol­low­ing, must look at Tang Ya own. 霍雨浩略微松了口气,至少目前来看,情况是正常的。至于接下来,就要看唐雅自己的了。 The lead­ing role of this Blue Sil­ver Em­peror vine, awak­ens Tang Ya own Mar­tial Soul Blue Sil­ver Grass. Be­cause her Blue Sil­ver Grass Mar­tial Soul was re­jected the dark part, there­fore it­self for weak, but the Blue Sil­ver Em­peror aura is for­mi­da­ble enough, so long as awak­ens its Mar­tial Soul, mak­ing Mar­tial Soul have the vi­tal­ity, then, her cul­ti­vat­ing to re­turn slowly, the vi­tal­ity will there­fore also save, is thor­ough was good. 这蓝银皇藤蔓的主要作用,是唤醒唐雅自己的武魂蓝银草。她那蓝银草武魂因为被剔除了暗黑的部分,所以本身即为虚弱,而蓝银皇的气息足够强大,只要唤醒它的武魂,让武魂重新具备生命力,那么,她的修为都会慢慢回归,生命力也会因此而积蓄,才是彻底的好了。 The Tang Ya tooth fas­tens to nip, she can feel that the strength of own within the body started to be awak­ened, was only this sum­mon strength seemed to be weak, al­though she felt, but ac­tu­ally as be­fore can­not have the source strength with the aid of this sum­mon strength. 唐雅牙关紧咬,她能感觉到自己体内的力量开始被唤醒了,只是这呼唤的力量似乎弱了一些,她虽然有所感觉,但却依旧不能借助这呼唤的力量将自己本源的力量带起来。 In the Tang Ya heart wor­ries! This op­por­tu­nity is how rare, if were de­feated, she can­not want to be fi­nally what kind of. 唐雅心中着急啊！这个机会何其难得,如果失败了,她真不敢想结果会怎么样。 More wor­ries, she more has the feel­ing of not being able to make an ef­fort, the aura in within the body does not have the means to be sum­moned as be­fore, but the Blue Sil­ver Em­peror aura and ef­fect with un­ceas­ing in­te­gra­tion, started to be weaken. 越是着急,她就越是有种使不上力的感觉,体内的气息依旧没办法被呼唤出来,而蓝银皇的气息和功效伴随着不断的融入,已经开始减弱了。 Not and not! 不、不可以！ In the Tang Ya heart is greatly anx­ious, going all out wants to at­tract that strength, in the anx­i­ety, en­tered the Blue Sil­ver Em­peror en­ergy of her within the body in­stead to start the dis­or­der to get up. 唐雅心中大急,拼命的想要去吸引那股力量,在焦急之中,进入她体内的蓝银皇能量反而开始紊乱起来了。 Huo Yuhao was also star­tled, he has ob­served the Tang Ya phys­i­cal con­di­tion through Spir­i­tual De­tec­tion, Tang Ya sud­denly has within the body aura dis­or­der, he some­what was also anx­ious. But at this time, no one could add on her! This is to in­spir­ing of own Mar­tial Soul, is not Soul Power can achieve. But is in Mar­tial Soul strange con­nec­tion is hav­ing the func­tion. 霍雨浩也是吃了一惊,他一直通过精神探测来观察唐雅的身体状况,唐雅突然出现体内气息紊乱,他也有些急了。可这个时候,谁也帮不上她啊！这是对自己武魂的引动,并非魂力所能做到的。而是武魂之中奇异的关联在产生作用。 In this time, a blue form qui­etly is ap­pear­ing in Tang Ya be­hind, his both arms lift, slen­der vines walk ran­domly qui­etly, dis­turbed the body of Tang Ya, his whole body blue light flaminged greatly, the in­tense aura bloomed out­ward. 正在这时,一道蓝色身影悄然出现在唐雅身后,他双臂抬起,一条条纤细的藤蔓悄然游走而出,缠扰住了唐雅的身体,紧接着,他全身蓝光大炽,强烈的气息向外绽放。 That is not the Soul Power aura, but came from in the Mar­tial Soul blood­lines aura. 那不是魂力气息,而是源自于武魂的血脉气息。 Is Blue Sil­ver Em­peror! 是蓝银皇！ The body of Tang Ya shiv­ered fiercely, has sta­bi­lized then. Can clear see­ing, from her dant­ian po­si­tion, a small group blue color ray out­ward dif­fu­sion, but vine that Blue Sil­ver Em­peror re­leases, the bloom­ing ray is partly vis­i­ble, very strange. 唐雅的身体剧烈的颤抖了一下,然后就稳定了下来。能够清楚的看到,从她丹田位置,一小团蓝色光芒向外扩散开来,而蓝银皇所释放出的藤蔓,绽放光芒则是若隐若现,十分奇异。 Be­came? Huo Yuhao pleas­antly sur­prised looks to Beibei, Beibei is also so. They were too anx­ious. But at cru­cial mo­ment get­ting rid of Blue Sil­ver Em­peror, be­came most im­por­tant. 成了？霍雨浩惊喜的看向身边的贝贝,贝贝也是如此。他们都太紧张了。而关键时候蓝银皇的出手,成为了重中之重。 Huo Yuhao can feel that this time should re­ally the suc­cess be right. 霍雨浩能够感觉到,这次应该是真的成功了才对。 Re­ally, the Tang Ya aura has sta­bi­lized grad­u­ally, the body also no longer shiv­ered. Within the body started to have own Soul Power fluc­tu­a­tion. 果然,唐雅的气息渐渐稳定了下来,身体也不再颤抖了。体内已经开始有了属于自己的魂力波动。 The Blue Sil­ver Em­peror dis­tur­bance dis­perses in her vine qui­etly, it also re­turns side Huo Yuhao. 蓝银皇缠扰在她身上的藤蔓悄然散开,它也重新回到霍雨浩身边。 „Mar­tial Soul of her within the body had been awak­ened, is re­ally our Blue Sil­ver Grass purest lin­eage/vein. More­over, in her blood­lines, le­git­i­mate Blue Sil­ver Grass em­peror's clan blood­lines, thank you, Huo Yuhao. You helped me look for a very good host. In the fu­ture if I can fuse your spirit, in within the body, I should be able to help her, she can also help me. Thanks.” “她体内的武魂已经被唤醒了,果然是我们蓝银草最纯正的一脉。而且,在她的血脉之中,还有正统蓝银草皇族血脉,谢谢你,霍雨浩。你帮我找了一个很好的宿主。未来如果我能融合成你那种魂灵的话,在她体内,我应该可以帮到她,她也能够帮到我。谢谢。” Huo Yuhao and Beibei bow to salute to Blue Sil­ver Em­peror to­gether, „is we should be thank you right, with­out your help, pos­si­bly was a mo­ment ago dan­ger­ous.” 霍雨浩和贝贝一同向蓝银皇躬身行礼,“是我们应该谢谢您才对,没有您的帮助,刚才可能就危险了。” The Tang Ya aura was fi­nally steady, but the Soul Power fluc­tu­a­tion that her within the body re­leases also starts to be strength­ened. The scope of al­though in­creas­ing is not strong, at this time also looks like or­di­nary Soul Scholar. But feel­ing Huo Yuhao of this en­hance­ment can ac­tu­ally feel clearly, and through Spir­i­tual Shar­ing, en­abling Beibei also to dis­cover. 唐雅的气息终于平稳了,而她体内释放出的魂力波动也开始增强。虽然增加的幅度并不强,此时也只是像一名普通的魂士罢了。但这种增强的感觉霍雨浩却能清楚的感觉到,并且通过精神共享,让贝贝也能发现。 „It seems like, Lit­tle Ya Teacher also needs to close up some time. This time, after she closes up fin­ished, Soul Power should be able fully to re­store. When the time comes to Lit­tle Ya Teacher nu­tri­tious good. First Se­nior Brother, or goes to the Star Lou Em­pire mat­ter to make Third Se­nior Brother go. You re­main to ac­com­pany Lit­tle Ya Teacher.” “看来,小雅老师也需要闭关一段时间了。这一次,等她闭关结束之后,魂力就应该能够完全恢复了。到时候给小雅老师滋补一番就好。大师兄,要不前往星罗帝国的事情让三师兄去吧。你留下来陪小雅老师。” Beibei ac­tu­ally shook the head, said: „Every­body has every­body's mat­ter, I go to one to be quite good per­son­ally. I have the sta­tus of Sea God Pavil­ion mem­ber, is eas­ier to win trust. Yuhao, you write to me, I im­me­di­ately. I look for Nan­nan and Xiao Xiao first, ask­ing them to help to de­fend Lit­tle Ya.” 贝贝却摇了摇头,道:“大家有大家的事情,还是我亲自去一趟比较好。我有海神阁成员的身份,更容易取信于人。雨浩,你给我写信一封,我立刻出发。我先去找楠楠和萧萧,请她们帮忙守着小雅。” Beibei fight­ing in­tent in heart is very ex­u­ber­ant at this time. Tang Ya fi­nally re­stored, for him, on this world all haze as if had been scat­tered. But is Tang Sect leader First Se­nior Brother, his mood one good, the mind con­di­tion of whole per­son be­comes is dif­fer­ent. 贝贝此时心中的战意无比旺盛。唐雅终于恢复了,对他来说,这个世界上所有的阴霾仿佛都已经被驱散了似的。而身为唐门掌门大师兄,他的心情一好,整个人的精神状态也都变得不一样了。 „Good!” Does not wait for us, Huo Yuhao could not at­tend to at this time with Beibei is po­lite. “好!”时不我待,霍雨浩在这个时候也顾不得跟贝贝客气。 When Beibei looks for Xiao Xiao and Jiang Nan­nan, the Huo Yuhao let­ter has also writ­ten. Gives Beibei, Beibei has not rested, im­me­di­ately leaves Tang Sect, di­rectly soared Star Lou Em­pire. 贝贝找来萧萧和江楠楠时,霍雨浩的信也已经写好了。交给贝贝,贝贝也没有休息,立刻就出唐门,直奔星罗帝国去了。 After Huo Yuhao urged Jiang Nan­nan and Xiao Xiao, en­tered the Tang Sect Soul Guid­ance Hall un­der­floor area. Came to the Xuan Ziwen lab­o­ra­tory di­rectly. 霍雨浩叮嘱了江楠楠和萧萧之后,就进入了唐门魂导堂的地下区域。直接来到了轩梓文的实验室。 Be­fore clos­ing up, some of his also mat­ters must con­sult his Teacher Xuan. 在闭关之前,他还有些事情要请教他的轩老师。 „Bang and Bang!” Huo Yuhao knock­ing on gen­tly on the metal door of lab­o­ra­tory has struck two. “砰、砰！”霍雨浩在实验室的金属门上轻轻的叩击了两下。 In the metal door did not have any re­sponse, Huo Yuhao al­ready to be used to this sit­u­a­tion, the push­ing gate qui­etly en­tered. 金属门内没有任何回应,霍雨浩早就习惯了这种情况,悄悄的推门而入。 Re­ally, Xuan Ziwen in in­side, busily is man­u­fac­tur­ing Soul Guid­ance De­vice, looked that does not look at his one eyes. 果然,轩梓文就在里面,正在忙碌的制作一件魂导器,看都不看他一眼。 „Teacher Xuan. I came back.” Huo Yuhao said in a soft voice. “轩老师。我回来了。”霍雨浩轻声说道。 --------------------------------------------------- --------------------------------------------------- Dur­ing dou­ble, ask­ing the monthly ticket to sup­port! 双倍期间,求月票支持！

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #557 Came to understand


„I knew, heard you Tang Sect pro­duc­tion in­stalled Soul Guid­ance Can­non to shoot to use up surely al­most 60%?” “我知道了,听说你把唐门生产的定装魂导炮弹一下就用掉了差不多六成？” „, Has this mat­ter. Wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test “咳咳,有这回事儿。水印广告测试 The wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment tests Sec­ond Se­nior Brother to be­tray me! ” Huo Yuhao help­less [say / way]. 水印广告测试二师兄出卖我！”霍雨浩无奈的道。 Xuan Ziwen said in­dif­fer­ently: „Soul Guid­ance De­vice pro­duces to use, has any­thing to be­tray. How­ever did your ef­fect achieve re­ally? More than 10,000 in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely, one used up. Your this black sheep of the fam­ily. You not mixes with some dummy catridges? You clearly know that such at­tack is im­pos­si­ble to break through the Bright Cap­i­tal City de­fense.” 轩梓文淡然道:“魂导器生产出来就是为了用的,有什么出卖不出卖的。不过你的效果真的达到了吗？10000多枚定装魂导炮弹,一下就用掉了。你这个败家子。你就不会在其中夹杂一些假弹吗？你明知道那样的攻击是不可能攻破明都防御的。” Huo Yuhao smiles bit­terly, said: „At that time could not at­tend, at that time was very ner­vous. I have made a mis­take, Teacher Xuan.” 霍雨浩苦笑一声,道:“当时已经顾不得了,那时候情绪十分紧张。我错了,轩老师。” Xuan Ziwen beck­oned with the hand, said: „Our surely in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to be weak, more than 10,000 in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to con­sume their de­fense en­ergy surely. Most is makes the High En­ergy Com­pres­sion Array Soul Guid­ance De­vice en­ergy con­sump­tion of Bright Cap­i­tal City ex­ces­sive. Is re­ally un­wor­thy. I had ad­justed re­cently, we pro­duce in­stalled the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to start to clas­sify surely.” 轩梓文摆了摆手,道:“还是我们的定装魂导炮弹不够强,10000多枚定装魂导炮弹只是消耗了他们的防御能量。最多是让明都的高能压缩阵列魂导器能量消耗过度。实在是不值。我最近调整了一下,我们生产的定装魂导炮弹开始分类了。” „? How to clas­sify?” Huo Yuhao asked cu­ri­ously. “哦？如何分类？”霍雨浩好奇地问道。 Xuan Ziwen said: „Be­fore we, when the vol­ume pro­duc­tion in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely, al­most is pri­mar­ily the ex­plo­sion -type. Have the de­struc­tion through the high tem­per­a­ture, high fever as well as the ex­plo­sive force. For this rea­son, now al­most all Soul Guid­ance Pro­tec­tive Cover also aim at this forms of de­fen­sive ac­tion. Es­pe­cially link­age de­fense guard shield. Just Caitou asked me to re­port the processes of this fight. The re­sults that High­est Flat­terer pro­duces have sur­passed my an­tic­i­pated.” 轩梓文道:“以前我们在批量生产定装魂导炮弹的时候,几乎全都是以爆炸式的为主。通过高温、高热以及爆炸力产生破坏。正因如此,现在几乎所有的魂导护罩也都是针对这种攻击方式的。尤其是联动防御护罩。刚刚菜头来找我汇报了你们这次战斗的过程。太阿所产生的效果超出了我的预期。” High­est Flat­terer pen­e­trated that nine lev­els of Sun-Moon Em­pire im­pe­r­ial palace de­fense to in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely, was Xuan Ziwen per­son­ally de­vel­oped. 太阿就是穿透了日月帝国皇宫防御的那枚九级定装魂导炮弹,也就是轩梓文亲手研制出来的。 „There­fore I de­cided that in fol­low­ing in­stalls in the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball pro­duc­tion surely, we must pro­duce some types. Must have the range at­tack, must have the punc­ture at­tack. Every so often, the ef­fect of punc­ture at­tack is in­stead bet­ter. Re­cently I de­vel­oped one type to in­stall the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball surely. Is called Child and Mother Punc­ture Shell. The con­struc­tion cost in­stalls the Soul Guid­ance Can­non ball to want high about one time com­pared with that you study surely, be­cause must use the rare metal. But de­struc­tive power, hey! Be­fore was step­ping up to pro­duce. If you exit to take an ac­tion again, can take one batch.” “所以我决定,在接下来的定装魂导炮弹生产中,我们要多生产有些种类。要有范围攻击的,也要有穿刺攻击的。很多时候,穿刺攻击的效果反而更好。最近我又研制出来一种定装魂导炮弹。叫做子母穿刺弹。造价比你研究出的那种定装魂导炮弹要高一倍左右,因为必须要使用到稀有金属。但破坏力嘛,嘿嘿！之前就已经在加紧生产了。你们要是再出去有所行动的话,可以带上一批走。” Huo Yuhao said: „Per­haps tem­porar­ily we could not get away. At pre­sent sit­u­a­tion some are not won­der­ful. I had the new plan.” 霍雨浩道:“暂时我们恐怕是走不了了。目前局势有些不妙。我有了新的计划。” Xuan Ziwen lifts the hand, pre­vent­ing him to say. Said: „Out­side mat­ter do not tell me, so long as Tang Sect in one day, I have not left here, I also by all means my re­search. As for other mat­ters, that is your. You be­came nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer, I did not have any­thing to be good to teach you. You try hard. That side vol­ume pro­duc­tion Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice mat­ter I also heard. Hey, not nec­es­sar­ily cer­tainly is good deed, you and oth­ers I pon­der over well, after clear­ing off the men­tal­ity, I told you. By cur­rent Soul Guid­ance Tech­nol­ogy. Even if Mas­ter Kong, is not nec­es­sar­ily able to de­velop not to have Hu­manoid Soul Guid­ance De­vice of side ef­fect to come.” 轩梓文抬起手,阻止他说下去。道:“外面的事情不要跟我说,只要唐门还在一天,我就不离开这里,我也只管我自己的研究。至于其他事情,那是你们的。你已经成为九级魂导师,我也没什么好教你的了。你自己努力去吧。那边批量生产人形魂导器的事情我也听说了。嘿嘿,未必就一定是好事,你等我好好琢磨一下,理清思路后,我告诉你。以目前的魂导科技。就算是孔师,也未必能够研制出没有副作用的人形魂导器来。” „Mas­ter Kong? Is who?” [Say / Way] of Huo Yuhao doubts. “孔师？是谁？”霍雨浩疑惑的道。 Xuan Ziwen shot a look at Huo Yuhao one, said: „Is my Teacher, Sun-Moon Em­pire Im­pe­r­ial Fam­ily Wor­ship Hall Hall Mas­ter. Also is Sun-Moon Em­pire most for­mi­da­ble Soul En­gi­neer, your Mar­tial An­ces­tor.” 轩梓文瞥了霍雨浩一眼,道:“就是我的老师,日月帝国皇室供奉堂堂主。也是日月帝国最强大的魂导师,你的师祖。” „! Such, how has not lis­tened to you to say Ah?” Huo Yuhao sur­prised looks at Xuan Ziwen. “咳咳！还有这么一位,怎么从来没听您说过啊？”霍雨浩吃惊的看着轩梓文。 Xuan Ziwen stared his one eyes ill-hu­moredly, said: „That is you are silly. You think that at my age, ini­tially was eight lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer, if did not have the spe­cial rea­son, can be­come the Bright Virtue Hall se­nior re­search fel­low? I am the Mas­ter Kong dis­ci­ple. In Sun-Moon Em­pire all nine lev­els of Soul En­gi­neer, has al­most half to re­ceive the di­rec­tion of Mas­ter Kong. Mas­ter Kong is very fierce, his limit where I do not know. Ab­solutely is not in any case in­fe­rior in any Limit Douluo, is ab­solutely dan­ger­ous ex­is­tence. I looked that Xu Tian­ran as­cends the throne, had the sup­port of Mas­ter Kong, oth­er­wise, where is so easy!” 轩梓文没好气的瞪了他一眼,道:“那是你自己傻。你想想,以我的年纪,当初又还是八级魂导师,如果不是有特殊原因,能够成为明德堂的首席研究员吗？我是孔师的弟子。日月帝国所有九级魂导师之中,几乎有一半都受过孔师的指点。孔师很厉害,他老人家的极限在哪里我也不知道。反正绝对不逊色于任何一位极限斗罗,也是绝对危险的存在。我看,那徐天然登位,也是得到了孔师的支持,否则的话,哪有那么容易啊！” The Huo Yuhao cor­ners of the mouth twitched, al­though is Mar­tial An­ces­tor, but, this Mar­tial An­ces­tor ac­tu­ally stands in the hos­tile stand­point! The en­e­mies have such a pow­er­house, ab­solutely is not the good mat­ter. 霍雨浩嘴角抽搐了一下,虽然是自己师祖,可是,这位师祖却是站在敌对的立场上啊！敌人有这么一位强者,绝对不是什么好事情。 „Teacher Xuan, I have closed up, you are busy, but must take care.” Huo Yuhao said. “轩老师,那我去闭关了,您忙吧,但也要注意身体。”霍雨浩道。 Xuan Ziwen beck­oned with the hand, looks like catches up with fly, „goes, the im­por­tant mat­ter has not done a bit less to be tired of me. You could rest as­sured that since has eaten your Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill, I want dead now am not easy. Yeah, you sim­ply are prof­i­teers! Squeezes my labor force.” 轩梓文摆了摆手,就像是赶苍蝇似的,“去吧,没有重要的事情就少来烦我。你放心,自从吃了你们那乾坤造化丹,我现在想死都不容易。哎,你们简直就是奸商啊！压榨我的劳动力。” A help­less­ness of Huo Yuhao face, in heart the se­cret pas­sage, your this tem­pera­ment, wants, who can squeeze you! 霍雨浩一脸的无奈,心中暗道,就您这脾气,要不是自己愿意,谁能压榨的了您啊！ Left the Xuan Ziwen lab­o­ra­tory, Huo Yuhao en­tered own lab­o­ra­tory. Al­though he is not at these days, but here peo­ple have cleaned, in­door the re­search is very clean. 出了轩梓文的研究室,霍雨浩就进了自己的研究室。他虽然这段时间不在,但这里还是一直都有人打扫的,研究室内很干净。 Huo Yuhao the sin­cere iron gate clo­sure, will dead­lock from in­side, si­mul­ta­ne­ously turned on in­side warner, any­body ap­proaches, will re­ceive him to close up the warn­ing of re­search. 霍雨浩将厚重的铁门关闭,从里面锁死,同时开启了里面的警告装置,任何人接近,都会接到他在闭关研究的警告。 Here is Tang Sect rad­i­cally heavy, is peace­ful and safe. 这里乃是唐门根本重地,最是安静、安全。 Huo Yuhao walked in own lab­o­ra­tory, straight­ened out own men­tal­ity, then jumps, jumped on the Soul Guid­ance De­vice man­u­fac­ture stage, sat cross-legged to sit. 霍雨浩在自己的实验室内走了走,又理顺了一下自己的思路,然后腾身而起,跳到了魂导器制作台上,盘膝坐了下来。 „Gen­eral sit­u­a­tion can only tem­porar­ily, what­ever the sit­u­a­tion de­vel­oped. Does not pre­sent the re­sult truly, Acad­emy An­cient Elder is im­pos­si­ble to change the strat­egy. Dou Ling and Star Luo both coun­tries, I also made con­tri­bu­tion. Now looked how they make a de­ci­sion. But I must do now, is as far as pos­si­ble be­comes by one­self more for­mi­da­ble, in the cru­cial time, plays the role of re­verse war. I can be good, cer­tainly can be good.” “大局暂时就只能任由情况发展下去了。不真正出现结果,学院的诸位宿老是不可能改变策略的。斗灵、星罗两国,我也尽力了。现在就看他们自己如何决断。而我现在要做的,就是尽可能让自己变得更加强大,在关键的时刻,起到扭转战局的作用。我能行,一定能行。” Thought aloud spoke of here, Huo Yuhao gripped the tight dou­ble fist, dou­ble pupil slowly closed, the body also started to relax, within the body Soul Power nat­u­rally pasted. 自言自语的说到这里,霍雨浩攥紧双拳,双眸缓缓闭合,身体也开始放松,体内魂力自然流转起来。 Be­fore Tang Wu­tong, pro­posed Ul­ti­mate Sol­dier time, Huo Yuhao un­der­stood her mean­ing. His Soul Power card in 89 lev­els, can­not be­come Ti­tled Douluo even­tu­ally. From the strength, gen­eral Ti­tled Douluo is not his match. But re­gard­less of, re­gard­ing any Soul Mas­ter, be­comes the speed­ing up of Ti­tled Douluo strength enor­mous de­gree. Tal­ent higher Soul Mas­ter , to pro­mote is also big­ger. 唐舞桐之前提出极限单兵的时候,霍雨浩就明白了她的意思。他的魂力一直卡在89级,终究没能成为封号斗罗。从实力上来看,一般的封号斗罗绝不是他的对手。可是,无论对于任何魂师来说,成为封号斗罗实力都会极大程度的提高。天赋越高的魂师,提升的也就越大。 Let alone, Huo Yuhao had first Soul Nu­cleus, once his sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus con­denses suc­cess­fully, the Soul Power essence has not dis­tin­guished with Limit Douluo any­thing, in the fu­ture the rapid­ness of Soul Power wind­ing speed, will be hard to imag­ine. 更何况,霍雨浩已经拥有了第一魂核,一旦他第二魂核凝聚成功,魂力本质就和极限斗罗没什么区别了,未来魂力提升速度之快,是难以想象的。 Since these days, Huo Yuhao has been ac­cu­mu­lat­ing ac­tu­ally, ac­cu­mu­lated was very long. When he in the icy seas deep place, ob­tained one­self Spirit Eyes Mar­tial Soul eighth Soul Ring , after is own sixth spirit Mer­maid Princess, spir­i­tual sea once more qual­i­ta­tive change, Spir­i­tual Power sud­denly to in­crease. Later was af­fected by the plant, com­pre­hended more pro­found Minute Sub­tlety bound­ary. Pre­sent he, truly had has at­tacked the sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus pos­si­bil­ity. In the mind con­trol­ling force, he is not at least in­fe­rior in any 98 lev­els of Soul Mas­ter. 这段时间以来,霍雨浩其实一直都在积累,已经积累了很久。当他在冰海深处,获得了自己灵眸武魂的第八魂环,也是自己的第六个魂灵人鱼公主之后,精神之海再次质变,精神力暴增。之后又受到植物的影响,领悟了更深刻的入微境界。现在的他,确实是已经具备了冲击第二魂核的可能。至少在精神控制力上,他决不逊色于任何98级魂师。 Be­com­ing by one­self more for­mi­da­ble, can have many rights to speak, can have the change bat­tle­field abil­ity. This is place that Huo Yuhao thinks through. 让自己变得更加强大,才能拥有更多的话语权,才能拥有改变战场的能力。这就是霍雨浩想通的地方。 Al­though in­di­vid­ual strength is tiny, but, some­times, in­di­vid­ual can also skid the gen­eral sit­u­a­tion. Now can­not, pow­er­ful, per­haps was OK! Since does not have other good means now, then, strength­ens one­self is the best choice. 个人的力量虽然渺小,但是,在某些时候,个人也能够撬动大局。现在不能,实力强大了,或许就可以了！既然现在也没有其他好办法,那么,增强自身就是最好的选择。 Huo Yuhao has thought through, there­fore he de­cides to close up. 霍雨浩想通了,所以他决定闭关。 More­over, prac­tice way that he must carry on with the Tang Wu­tong imag­i­na­tion is dif­fer­ent. 而且,他要进行的修炼方式和唐舞桐想象中的还不一样。 It looks like in Tang Wu­tong, pre­sent he, cul­ti­vates own Soul Nu­cleus in the Equal Res­o­nance way is the best means. But, Huo Yuhao ac­tu­ally does not think. He knows that in the fu­ture must chal­lenge Beast God Di Tian such to exist. If in­fe­rior to Di Tian com­pletely, then, one­self achieve­ment pos­si­bly does not have. In this case, his only choice, walks with the Di Tian same road, even do him is bet­ter, is stronger than him. 在唐舞桐看来,现在的他,以同位共振的方式修炼自身魂核是最好的办法。可是,霍雨浩却不这么想。他知道,未来自己一定是要挑战兽神帝天那样存在的。如果在根本上就不如帝天,那么,自己就一点获胜的可能都没有。在这种情况下,他唯一的选择,就是走和帝天同样的路,甚至要比他做的更好,比他更强。 Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao has set firm re­solve, within the body Soul Power na­ture cir­cu­la­tion, the fore­head place, Soul Nu­cleus is sta­ble, Spir­i­tual Power is cen­tered on Soul Nu­cleus, is cir­cling sim­i­larly. 想到这里,霍雨浩已经下定决心,体内魂力自然流转,额头处,魂核稳定,精神力以魂核为中心,也同样盘旋着。 Huo Yuhao Soul Nu­cleus, is he now all strengths cen­ters, first around Soul Nu­cleus, is cir­cling is his Spir­i­tual Power, the sur­round­ing is Soul Power. 霍雨浩的魂核,就是他现在一切力量的中心,在魂核周围,首先盘旋着的就是他的精神力,外围才是魂力。 If ob­serves from spir­i­tual sea, will dis­cover that has a huge di­a­mond Sun in his spir­i­tual sea, this Sun, is his Soul Nu­cleus. His Spir­i­tual Power now is ex­is­tence of close solid state, but also as be­fore re­volves Soul Nu­cleus to cir­cle. 如果从精神之海去观察的话,就会发现,在他精神之海中有一颗巨大的菱形太阳,这颗太阳,就是他的魂核。他的精神力现在已经是接近固态的存在,但也依旧围绕着魂核盘旋着。 Huo Yuhao then must do, opens own sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus. 霍雨浩接下来要做的,就是开启自己的第二魂核。 Ac­cord­ing to Old Xuan, this first Soul Nu­cleus opens is not easy, but ac­tu­ally es­tab­lished sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus to open the rel­a­tively easy foun­da­tion, be­cause sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus in the dant­ian, the dant­ian stored up the Soul Power place, es­tab­lished Soul Nu­cleus be much eas­ier than in other places in the dant­ian. 按照玄老所说,他这第一魂核开启的不容易,但却奠定了第二魂核开启相对容易的基础,因为第二魂核在丹田之中,丹田本来就是储存魂力的地方,在丹田建立魂核就要比在其他地方容易得多。 But, Huo Yuhao after these days ac­cu­mu­lates, in the heart had other ideas. 可是,霍雨浩经过这段时间积累之后,心中却有了其他的想法。 The dant­ian opens Soul Nu­cleus is very no doubt good, is, not nec­es­sar­ily will be best re­gard­ing the de­vel­op­ment trend. 丹田开启魂核固然很好,可是,对于未来发展却未必是最佳的。 Be­cause he must choose, is not the Equal Res­o­nance prac­tice way, but must carry on the method of prac­tice Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment. 因为他要选择的,并不是同位共振的修炼方式,而是要进行阴阳互补之法修炼。 Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment, that is the pro and con goes against, prac­tice it­self for dif­fi­cult, once car­ries on the Soul Nu­cleus prac­tice by the dant­ian. First did not say suc­cess­fully, once he has suc­ceeded, then, in within the body two Soul Nu­cleus sur­round­ing strengths re­volve on the con­trary, each other haul­ing, each other is sup­ple­men­tary. From the dant­ian to be­tween the eye­brows, is Soul Power and Spir­i­tual Power rev­o­lu­tion place. 阴阳互补,那就是正反相逆,修炼本身即为困难,而一旦以丹田进行魂核修炼的话。先不说不成功,一旦他成功了,那么,体内两个魂核周围的力量相反运转,彼此牵引、彼此互补。从丹田到眉心,都是魂力和精神力运转的地方。 When then, later Huo Yuhao Soul Power is 98 lev­els of times what to do? 那么,等到以后霍雨浩魂力达到98级的时候怎么办？ Per­haps, at that time he had to com­pare fa­vor­ably with the Limit Douluo strength, but, that time he, ac­tu­ally as be­fore was not Limit Douluo! To break through to 99 lev­els, be­comes human Ab­solute, then, must be based on Soul Nu­cleus to break through. In other words, in the fu­ture Huo Yuhao must carry on the con­den­sa­tion of third Soul Nu­cleus. 或许,在那时候他已经拥有媲美极限斗罗的实力了,但是,那时候的他,却依旧不是极限斗罗啊！想要突破到99级,成为人类极致,那么,就必须要以魂核突破为基础。也就是说,未来霍雨浩还要进行第三魂核的凝聚。 As the mat­ter stands, if his first two Soul Nu­cleus oc­cu­pied in the Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment con­di­tion from the dant­ian to the be­tween the eye­brows com­plete place, where his third does Soul Nu­cleus open? 这样一来,如果他的前两个魂核已经在阴阳互补状态下占据了从丹田到眉心的全部地方,那他的第三魂核开启在什么地方？

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #558 The masculine and feminine elements is supplementary, the second soul nucleus


Hu­man­ity has three places to open Soul Nu­cleus, be­tween the eye­brows, chest and dant­ian. To that time, has wanted be­tween the chest from two big Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment Soul Nu­cleus to open third Soul Nu­cleus again, sim­ply is dream of a fool. That needs to in­ter­rupt two big Soul Nu­cleus re­la­tions orig­i­nally to be good di­rectly first. In that case, Huo Yuhao di­rectly from ex­plod­ing. 人类只有三个地方可以开启魂核,眉心、胸口和丹田。到了那时候,再想从两大阴阳互补魂核之间的胸口开启第三魂核,简直是痴人说梦。那需要直接先打断两大魂核原本的联系才行。那样的话,霍雨浩自己就直接自爆了。 In other words, if Huo Yuhao chooses sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus opens in the dant­ian, then, he will not have con­densed the third Soul Nu­cleus pos­si­bil­ity in the fu­ture, even if for­mi­da­ble, has not be­come the Limit Douluo strength. In that case, he could not in­herit God of Emo­tion God Po­si­tion. 也就是说,霍雨浩如果选择将第二魂核开启在丹田,那么,未来他就没有凝聚第三魂核的可能了,就算再强大,也没有成为极限斗罗的实力。那样的话,他就继承不了情绪之神的神位。 There­fore, in the Huo Yuhao heart early some plans, he al­ready had de­cided that own sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus not only need by form open­ing of Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment, but also the open­ing po­si­tion is the chest, va­cates the dant­ian, as the mat­ter stands, he also will have in the fu­ture in the dant­ian opens the third Soul Nu­cleus pos­si­bil­ity. At that time, third Soul Nu­cleus must face likely only then the chest lo­cated the dis­tur­bance of Soul Nu­cleus. 因此,霍雨浩心中早有打算,他早就已经决定,自己的第二魂核不但要以阴阳互补的形式开启,而且开启的位置是胸口,空出丹田来,这样一来,未来他就还有在丹田开启第三魂核的可能。那时候,第三魂核要面对的很可能就只有胸口处魂核的干扰。 „Ice Em­peror, Ice Em­peror you in?” Huo Yuhao ini­ti­ated sum­mon in the heart. “冰帝,冰帝你在吗？”霍雨浩在心中发起了呼唤。 „I, Yuhao, how?” Ice Em­peror sound along with it re­sound­ing. “我在,雨浩,怎么了？”冰帝的声音随之响起。 Huo Yuhao said: „I pre­pare to start to prac­tice my sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus, thus at­tacks the Ti­tled Douluo bound­ary. I must prac­tice in the Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment way. Must trou­ble you to help me. Be­cause I must es­tab­lish Soul Nu­cleus in the chest place. My within the body fused your Ice Jade Em­peror Scor­pion Torso Bone, your strength is strongest there. But sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus that this time I must con­dense, is pri­mar­ily our Ab­solute Ice Soul Power. I must strip from first Soul Nu­cleus Soul Power. In this case, once my sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus con­denses suc­cess­fully. Then. Is first Soul Nu­cleus con­trols Spir­i­tual Power, sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus grasps Soul Power. Both when each other are sup­ple­men­tary, Soul Power and Spir­i­tual Power na­ture com­mu­ni­ca­tion, thus forms the as­pect that Soul Power and Spir­i­tual Power fuse. My all Soul Abil­ity and abil­i­ties dis­play, si­mul­ta­ne­ously had two's char­ac­ter­is­tics.” 霍雨浩道:“我准备开始修炼自己的第二魂核,从而冲击封号斗罗境界。我要以阴阳互补的方式来进行修炼。要麻烦你帮我了。因为我要将魂核建立在胸口处。我体内融合了你的冰碧帝皇蝎躯干骨,你的力量在那里最强。而这次我要凝聚的第二魂核,也是以咱们极致之冰的魂力为主。我要将魂力从第一魂核那边剥离出来。这样的话,一旦我第二魂核凝聚成功。那么。就是第一魂核掌控精神力,第二魂核掌握魂力。两者在彼此互补的时候,魂力和精神力就会自然沟通,从而形成魂力与精神力融合的局面。我的一切魂技和能力施展的时候,就同时具备了二者的特点。” Lis­tened to the Huo Yuhao words silent, Ice Em­peror, then sighed one lightly, said: „You know that does this to be dif­fi­cult?” 听了霍雨浩的话,冰帝沉默了一下,然后轻叹一声,道:“你知道这样做有多么困难吗？” Huo Yuhao said: „I do not know dif­fi­cultly specif­i­cally. But in any event, I must at­tempt. Can you help me?” 霍雨浩道:“我不知道具体会有多困难。但无论如何,我都要尝试一下。你可以帮我吗？” Ice Em­peror said: „I nat­u­rally must help you. Has to say. You are the tal­ent dif­fer­ent re­ported, and is ex­tremely in­tel­li­gent. The road that you choose, is our Ab­solute Ice lin­eage/vein, or is in all pre­sent age fol­low­ers, most Ab­solute one prac­tice way. More­over whether there is po­ten­tial com­pletely.” 冰帝道:“我当然要帮你。不得不说。你真的是天赋异禀,并且绝顶聪明。你选择的这条路,是我们极致之冰一脉,或者说是所有当世修炼者之中,最极致的一种修炼方式。而且还有无尽的潜力。” „Ah?” Huo Yuhao has not thought of Ice Em­peror while does not favor one­self suc­ceed, ac­tu­ally also so es­teems it­self. “啊？”霍雨浩没想到冰帝在不看好自己成功的同时,竟然还如此推崇自己。 Ice Em­peror said: „In our Soul Beast world. Truly full of wis­dom big en­ergy, what al­most chooses is this road. How­ever, suc­ceeds has one. That is, Beast God Di Tian, there­fore, it is pre­sent age strongest Soul Beast.” 冰帝道:“在我们魂兽的世界。真正有智慧的大能,几乎都选择的是这条路。但是,成功的只有一个。那就是,兽神帝天,所以,它是当世最强的魂兽。” In the Huo Yuhao heart moves. Said: „Said that you also did choose have prac­ticed like this?” 霍雨浩心中一动。道:“这么说,你也选择过这样修炼了？” Ice Em­peror said: „No. I did not have this qual­i­fi­ca­tions. Be­cause my strength could not have achieved to be equal to your hu­man­ity Limit Douluo level, does not have the means to con­struct sec­ond Soul Ring. But Xue'er truly has tried.” 冰帝道:“不。我还没有这个资格。因为我的实力还达不到相当于你们人类极限斗罗的层次,没办法构建第二魂环。但雪儿确实是试过的。” „Snow Em­peror.” Huo Yuhao called one with amaze­ment. “雪帝。”霍雨浩惊讶的叫了一声。 Snow Em­peror sound along with it re­sound­ing, „! I have tried, if I have suc­ceeded, then, Di Tian is any­thing, at least my strength not weakly in him. But. I failed, re­sult of fail­ure. Causes my source to re­ceive heavy wound, is un­able to try the break­through next time bot­tle­neck and heav­enly power again. There­fore, can only choose to change into em­bryo, fi­nally cheap you.” 雪帝的声音随之响起,“是啊！我试过,如果我成功了,那么,帝天又算什么,至少我的实力就不会弱于他。可是。我失败了,失败的结果。就导致我的本源受到重创,再也无法去尝试突破下一次的瓶颈与天威了。所以,只能选择化为胚胎,最后便宜了你。” Huo Yuhao has not thought that also has such twists and turns, in the heart not star­tled counter- happy, Snow Em­peror has tried, that also means that she gained in cer­tain ex­pe­ri­ence, but re­gard­ing him, most valu­able also these ex­pe­ri­ences! 霍雨浩没想到还有这样的曲折,心中不惊反喜,雪帝试过,那也就意味着,她积累了一定的经验,而对于他来说,最宝贵的也正是这些经验啊！ Snow Em­peror said: „I have tried, there­fore I know this way the dif­fi­culty. Rea­son that Di Tian can be suc­cess­ful, is not be­cause his willpower is stronger than many me. But be­cause the body of his Golden Eyed Black Dragon King is tena­cious enough. To com­plete the prac­tice of Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment way, lets Spir­i­tual Power and Soul Power thor­ough sep­a­ra­tion, fuses again sup­ple­men­tar­ily. To the load of body is ex­tremely huge. More­over, but must have the strong con­trol­ling force.” 雪帝道:“我试过,所以我更加知道这种方式的艰难。帝天之所以能够成功,并不是因为他的意志力比我坚强多少。而是因为他那金眼黑龙王的身体足够强韧。想要完成阴阳互补方式的修炼,让精神力和魂力彻底分离,再重新互补融合。对身体的负荷是极其巨大的。而且,还要有超强的控制力。” „By your cur­rent Spir­i­tual Power, was enough. How­ever, you after all are only hu­man­ity, your body in­ten­sity, com­pared or misses with our Soul Beast. Rea­son that our Soul Beast does not choose the Equal Res­o­nance way to prac­tice , be­cause our body struc­tures are very dif­fi­cult such choice. Our merid­i­ans and your hu­man­ity are dif­fer­ent, with­out you that good hole hole. We have two po­si­tions to prac­tice Soul Nu­cleus. This is also doomed we un­able one of the to turn into a god rea­sons. But these two po­si­tions do not have the means to have res­onat­ing, there­fore we can only choose Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment. Yuhao, do you want such to do re­ally? If were de­feated, the con­se­quence will be very se­ri­ous.” “以你目前的精神力,是已经足够了。但是,你毕竟只是人类,你的身体强度,和我们魂兽相比还是差了许多。我们魂兽之所以不选择同位共振的方式进行修炼,是因为我们的身体构造很难那样选择。我们的经脉和你们人类不同,没有你们那么好的窍穴。我们只有两个位置能够修炼魂核。这也是注定我们不能成神的原因之一。而这两个位置是没办法产生共振的,所以我们只能选择阴阳互补。雨浩,你真的要这么做吗？如果失败了,后果会很严重。” Huo Yuhao not any hes­i­tant, with ex­tremely firm ex­pres­sion sink­ing sound track: „In any event, I must try. If this time has suc­ceeded, we es­tab­lished went to the God Realm foun­da­tion. If were de­feated......” 霍雨浩没有任何犹豫,用极其坚定的语气沉声道:“无论如何,我都要试一下。如果这次成功了,那么,我们就奠定了前往神界的基础。如果失败了……” Here, he has stopped slightly, in the eye was shin­ing, „, only if I died, was not de­feated!” 说到这里,他略微停顿了一下,眼中寒光四射,“除非我死,绝不失败！” Not the un­prece­dented courage and spirit, want to at­tack this human for­bid­den area gen­eral abil­ity, will have the suc­cess­ful pos­si­bil­ity? 没有一往无前的勇气和气概,想要冲击这人类禁区一般的能力,又怎么会有成功的可能？ Snow Em­peror and Ice Em­peror were silent. 雪帝、冰帝都沉默了。 A mo­ment later, Snow Em­peror said with the un­prece­dented dig­ni­fied sound: „Good, we ac­com­pany you to bet this. Our six spir­its, help you to­gether, I do not be­lieve that can­not suc­ceed. Yuhao, waits a minute you to prac­tice by all means that does not need to man­age us, we whole-heart­edly, must not re­main re­gret­tably.” 片刻之后,雪帝用前所未有的凝重声音道:“好,那我们就陪你赌这一把。我们六个魂灵,一起帮你,我就不信,不能成功。雨浩,稍候你只管修炼,不用管我们,我们会全力以赴,务必不留遗憾。” „Um.” Huo Yuhao has se­lected, closes eyes. “嗯。”霍雨浩点了下头,闭上双眼。 He does not have to start im­me­di­ately, but starts to ad­just own con­di­tion, only then makes the con­di­tion main­tain at best, can suc­ceed. Is this cru­cial time, more can­not be anx­ious. 他没有立刻开始,而是开始调整自己的状态,只有让状态保持在最佳,才能成功。越是这种关键的时刻,越是不能急切。 Rays sep­a­rate from Huo Yuhao within the body. 一道道光芒从霍雨浩体内分离出来。 First ap­pears, is Snow Em­peror and Ice Em­peror. In six big spir­its, is these two most for­mi­da­ble. 首先出现的,就是雪帝和冰帝。在六大魂灵之中,也是这两位最为强大。 Oc­tag­o­nal Mys­te­ri­ous Ice Grass and Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Lit­tle White), Day­dream Ice Silk­worm as well as Mer­maid Princess Li Ya also suc­ces­sively ap­pears. 八角玄冰草、冰熊王小白、天梦冰蚕以及人鱼公主丽雅也是先后出现。 Six big spir­its, all en­cir­cle side Huo Yuhao. 六大魂灵,全都围在霍雨浩身边。 Snow Em­peror looked at other five big spir­its, said: „The Yuhao words you heard a mo­ment ago. This clos­ing up, is very im­por­tant to him, to us, is sim­i­larly im­por­tant. We in Yuhao within the body, are based on his body is sur­viv­ing. If he had prob­lems, that also means that all our spir­its had prob­lems. Once he suc­ceeds, that was also we suc­ceeds. There­fore, this time, I re­quest every­body, does not hes­i­tate at all costs, how re­gard­less of must help him get through the dif­fi­cult time. Do not be wor­ried about our own con­sump­tions, once Yuhao has suc­ceeded, can make us ben­e­fit all one's life by the Soul Nu­cleus ex­change that the method of Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment forms. More­over, like him said that once this time suc­ceeds, truly will es­tab­lish us to ac­com­pany his to turn into a god pos­si­bil­ity in the fu­ture. After this is also we be­come the spir­its , the true goal.” 雪帝看了看其他五大魂灵,道:“刚才雨浩的话你们都听到了。这次闭关,对他很重要,对我们来说,也同样重要。我们都在雨浩体内,以他的身体为基础生存着。如果他出了问题,那也就意味着我们所有魂灵都出了问题。而一旦他成功,那也就是我们成功了。所以,这一次,我要求大家,不惜一切代价,无论如何也要帮他渡过难关。不要担心我们自身的消耗,一旦雨浩成功了,凭借阴阳互补之法形成的魂核交流就能够让我们受用不尽了。而且,就像他说的,这次一旦成功,就真正奠定了我们未来陪他成神的可能。这也是我们成为魂灵之后真正的目标。” Five big spir­its also nod. Day­dream Ice Silk­worm is a stim­u­lated color of face, „was good, I and other this day waited to be very long. Yuhao must take the foot­steps to­ward that place fi­nally. I fully sup­port cer­tainly him.” 五大魂灵同时点头。天梦冰蚕更是一脸的亢奋之色,“太好了,我等这一天已经等了很久。雨浩终于要朝着那个地方迈出脚步。我一定全力支持他。” Snow Em­peror shot a look at his one eyes, said: „Day­dream, I must warn that your, oth­ers can fully, you ac­tu­ally not use. You when Yuhao pre­vi­ous time has prob­lem, in­clud­ing own source with him fused in to­gether, this time, your con­ver­gence point. We can.” 雪帝瞥了他一眼,道:“天梦,我要警告你一句,别人可以全力,你却不用。你在雨浩上次出现问题的时候,已经连自己的本源都和他融合在一起了,这一次,你就收敛点吧。我们可以的。” Day­dream Ice Silk­worm gawked star­ing, the vi­sion looked to nearby Ice Em­peror, Ice Em­peror ac­tu­ally left goes not to visit him ex­ces­sively. 天梦冰蚕愣了愣,目光看向一旁的冰帝,冰帝却别过头去并不看他。 Snow Em­peror ill-hu­mored [say / way]: „You look at any­thing to look. Bing'er loves dearly you, good.” 雪帝没好气的道:“你看什么看。冰儿心疼你,行了吧。” The body of Day­dream Ice Silk­worm shiv­ered slightly, has not said any col­ored words to come, nod of gen­tly. 天梦冰蚕的身体略微颤抖了一下,却没有说出任何口花花的话来,轻轻的点了点头。 The Oc­tag­o­nal Mys­te­ri­ous Ice Grass gi­gan­tic Oc­tag­o­nal leave of grass rocks gen­tly, spreads own thought. Must say that in six big spir­its, weak­est was he. 八角玄冰草硕大的八角草叶轻轻晃动,传出自己的意念。要说六大魂灵之中,最弱的就是他了。 Snow Em­peror also said: „This Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment Soul Nu­cleus con­denses, Soul Nu­cleus that Yuhao must es­tab­lish is Ab­solute Ice at­tribute, in this case, needs the Ab­solute Ice strength spe­cially to be for­mi­da­ble. Li Ya, you are re­spon­si­ble for spir­i­tual sea that side mind Soul Nu­cleus, you must do, is as­sists Yuhao to­gether to main­tain that side sta­bil­ity, that side the nec­es­sary time, de­lays to our here dis­tur­bances.” 雪帝又道:“这次阴阳互补魂核凝聚,雨浩要重新建立的魂核是极致之冰属性的,在这种情况下,需要极致之冰的力量就特别强大。丽雅,你负责精神之海那边的精神魂核,你要做的,就是协助雨浩一起保持那边的稳定,必要时候,延缓那边对我们这边的干扰。” Li Ya nod­ded, al­though shortly after she just joined, but is Mer­maid Princess, she has to sur­pass the or­di­nary human the wis­dom, nat­u­rally un­der­stands that this time mat­ter is im­por­tant. 丽雅点了点头,她虽然刚加入不久,但身为人鱼公主,她有着超过普通人类的智慧,自然明白这次的事情有多么重要。 Snow Em­peror con­tin­ues to arrange the duty, sink­ing sound track: „Day­dream, you as­sist Li Ya in that side, Yuhao Spir­i­tual Source and your de­gree of poly­mer­iza­tion are very high, your source also, con­trols more con­ve­nient. Mean­while, you must pay at­ten­tion to ob­serve the Yuhao body con­di­tion, cer­tainly can­not let his body col­lapse, un­der­stood?” 雪帝继续安排任务,沉声道:“天梦,你在那边协助丽雅,雨浩的精神本源和你重合度很高,你的本源也在其中,控制起来方便一些。同时,你也要注意观察雨浩的身体状态,一定不能让他的身体崩溃,明白了吗？” Day­dream Ice Silk­worm nod­ded. 天梦冰蚕点了点头。 Snow Em­peror holds up the hand of Ice Em­peror, said: „Bing'er is the main force, Yuhao this time must con­dense the Soul Nu­cleus place in the chest place, that is also your Ice Jade Em­peror Scor­pion Torso Bone in the po­si­tion, I will as­sist you. Xiao Bai (Lit­tle White) and Oc­tag­o­nal, your also same place. Our four are the Ab­solute Ice Soul Power own­ers, we help Yuhao whole-heart­edly, con­denses Soul Nu­cleus. Oc­tag­o­nal, you are mainly re­spon­si­ble for sta­bi­liz­ing, Xiao Bai (Lit­tle White), you are re­spon­si­ble to the pro­tec­tion of Yuhao body. Trans­fers Soul Power to give me and Bing'er.” 雪帝拉起冰帝的手,道:“冰儿是主力,雨浩这次要凝聚魂核的地方在胸口处,那也是你的冰碧帝皇蝎躯干骨所在位置,我会辅助你。小白、八角,你们也一起。我们四个都是极致之冰魂力的拥有者,我们全力以赴帮助雨浩,凝聚魂核。八角,你主要负责稳定,小白,你负责对雨浩身体的守护。调动魂力交给我和冰儿。” „Yes!” Three big Ab­solute Ice spir­its si­mul­ta­ne­ously com­ply with one. “是！”三大极致之冰魂灵同时答应一声。 Dur­ing Snow Em­peror short sev­eral words, has arranged all ap­pro­pri­ately. 雪帝短短几句话之间,已经将一切都安排妥当。 Snow Em­peror looked at a five big spirit fi­nally, „this time, allow Cheng­gong, can­not only be de­feated. Let us work as one.” 雪帝最后看了一圈五大魂灵,“这次,只许成功、不许失败。让我们齐心协力。” „Works as one!” Five big spir­its si­mul­ta­ne­ously lowly drink one. “齐心协力！”五大魂灵同时低喝一声。 Snow Em­peror ar­rives at side Huo Yuhao, has pat­ted gen­tly his shoul­der. 雪帝来到霍雨浩身边,轻轻的拍了一下他的肩膀。 „Thank you, Snow Em­peror.” Di­a­log Huo Yuhao be­tween six big spir­its all heard, he opens eyes, in the eye had the mist twin­kle. “谢谢你,雪帝。”六大魂灵之间的对话霍雨浩全都听到了,他睁开双眼,眼中已经有雾气闪烁。 -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------- On Mon­day, three chap­ters of salvos asked monthly ticket and rec­om­men­da­tion ticket.( To be con­tin­ued. If you like this work, wel­come you to cast the rec­om­men­da­tion ticket and monthly ticket, your sup­port, is I biggest power.) 周一,三章连发求月票、推荐票。(未完待续。如果您喜欢这部作品,欢迎您来投推荐票、月票,您的支持,就是我最大的动力。)

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #558 The masculine and feminine elements is supplementary, the second soul nucleus


Snow Em­peror gives a calm smile, said: „What thanked? Your this body, al­ready in­ces­santly was your, but was our. A our seven body, but also there is a mat­ter that what can­not make? How­ever, be­fore start, you go to take carry back Life Guardian Knife, the huge vi­tal­ity that it con­tains should be use­ful to you. Ini­tially, Di Tian can con­dense Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus, in fill­ing the Lake of Life lake water of life aura com­pleted. Be­lieves you can also use.” 雪帝淡然一笑,道:“谢什么？你这身体,早就不止是你自己一个人的了,而是我们大家的。我们七位一体,还有什么做不成的事情呢？不过,在开始之前,你去把生灵守望之刃拿回来,它所蕴含的庞大生命力应该对你有用。当初,帝天能够凝聚出阴阳互补第二魂核,也是在充满生命气息的生命之湖湖水之中完成。相信你也会用的到。” Huo Yuhao eye one bright, yes! How one for­got this mat­ter. Lit­tle Ya Teacher started to re­store, Life Guardian Knife was use­less to her, but per­haps to one­self, can ac­tu­ally play the enor­mous role. 霍雨浩眼睛一亮,是啊！自己怎么把这件事忘了。小雅老师已经开始恢复,生灵守望之刃对她没用了,而对自己来说,或许却能够起到极大的作用。 The Huo Yuhao hur­ry­ing body, opens the lab­o­ra­tory front door, ran to look for Tang Ya. 霍雨浩赶忙弹身而起,重新开启实验室大门,跑出去找唐雅了。 Six big spir­its, in such short dis­tance, they tem­porar­ily have not left Huo Yuhao not to have any issue. 六大魂灵都没有跟着,在这么短的距离内,它们暂时离开霍雨浩是没有任何问题的。 The Snow Em­peror volt said sev­eral any­thing in the Ice Em­peror ear. In the Ice Em­peror blue beau­ti­ful pupil re­veals the color of shock, fierce turn­ing head looks to Snow Em­peror, „Xue'er, you......” 雪帝伏在冰帝耳边说了几句什么。冰帝碧蓝色的美眸中流露出震惊之色,猛的扭头看向雪帝,“雪儿,你……” Snow Em­peror shows a faint smile, in the eye pupil, full is proud in­tent! 雪帝微微一笑,眼眸中,满是傲意！ „I al­though in the past can­not suc­ceed, but this time, in any event, must help Yuhao suc­ceed!” “我当年虽然没能成功,但这一次,无论如何,也要帮着雨浩成功！” Ice Em­peror nod of gen­tly, „Snow Em­peror, I un­der­stood.” 冰帝轻轻的点了点头,“雪帝,我明白了。” Snow Em­peror el­e­gant face one red, „what did you un­der­stand?” 雪帝俏脸一红,“你明白什么了？” Ice Em­peror „pū” smiles, „un­der­stands that un­der­stands, I did not say!” 冰帝“噗哧”一笑,“明白就是明白,我就是不说！” In the free time who they spoke, Huo Yuhao from out­side was com­ing back, in the hand was grasp­ing Life Guardian Knife. 正在她们说话的工夫,霍雨浩已经从外面回来了,手中握着生灵守望之刃。 Since ab­sorb­ing that Gold of Life that ini­tially Golden Hawks­bill Tur­tle brought, Life Guardian Knife turned into Sword of Life. On the aqua­ma­rine sword blade is send­ing out the rich vi­tal­ity. The se­cret room gate clo­sure, in­door the en­tire re­search has filled with the strong life aura. 自从吸收了当初黄金玳瑁带出来的那块生灵之金后,生灵守望之刃就已经变成了生灵之剑。碧绿色的剑身上散发着浓郁的生命力。密室门关闭,整个研究室内就已经充满了浓烈的生命气息。 Al­though this life aura to hav­ing Huo Yuhao of body is use­ful, but re­gard­ing Spir­i­tual Con­scious­ness of six big spir­its, there is a cer­tain nour­ish­ing func­tion. There­fore on their faces also re­vealed the color of sat­is­fac­tion. 这生命气息虽然只是对拥有身体的霍雨浩有用,但对于六大魂灵的灵识来说,也有一定的滋养作用。所以它们脸上也都流露出了满足之色。 Snow Em­peror nod­ded to Huo Yuhao, said: „Prepa­ra­tion starts. I will tell you my ex­pe­ri­ence. Let you lit­tle de­tour, you said ac­cord­ing to me does.” 雪帝向霍雨浩点了点头,道:“准备开始吧。我会将我的经验都告诉你。让你少走弯路,你按照我说的去做。” „Good.” “好。” Huo Yuhao con­di­tion orig­i­nally ad­justed was sim­i­lar, brings back Sword of Life, under that rich life aura moist­ens. His body con­di­tion has also achieved best. 霍雨浩的状态本来就已经调整的差不多了,拿回生灵之剑,在那浓郁的生命气息滋润下。他的身体状态也达到了最佳。 Sits cross-legged to sit. Huo Yuhao the Sword of Life keep flat above own knees, closed eyes. Soul Power is re­volv­ing along with the Mys­te­ri­ous Heaven Skill op­er­a­tional route slowly. 盘膝坐好。霍雨浩将生灵之剑平放在自己双膝之上,闭合双眼。魂力缓缓随着玄天功的运行路线运转着。 He in six months ago, Soul Power cul­ti­vated to reach 89 lev­els. Al­though can­not break through, but he had not stopped and prac­tice be­tween Tang Wu­tong, Soul Power is quite deep. 他早在近半年前,魂力修为就达到89级了。虽然一直没能突破,但他也一直都没停过与唐舞桐之间的修炼,魂力极为深厚。 At this time Soul Power re­volves. Sim­i­lar to in within the body the ocean waves rushes gen­er­ally tur­bu­lently. Vis­cous is full of the sense of re­al­ity. 此时魂力运转起来。在体内如同海浪一般澎湃汹涌。粘稠又充满质感。 A week Sky Soul strength re­volves, within the body has pro­duced the re­sults of grow­ing con­tin­u­ally. The Spir­i­tual Power full, nat­u­rally re­volves, Soul Power to the fore­head, by the Soul Nu­cleus na­ture at­trac­tion, will be cir­cled and com­pressed in side. 一个周天魂力运转下来,体内已经产生了生生不息的效果。精神力充盈,自然运转,魂力到了头部附近,就会被魂核自然吸引,在旁边盘旋、压缩。 Six big spir­its all in­te­grate Huo Yuhao within the body, Li Ya and Day­dream Ice Silk­worm guard spir­i­tual sea. Other four big spir­its ar­rived in Soul Power of Huo Yuhao chest po­si­tion, is feel­ing his Soul Power change silently. 六大魂灵全都重新融入霍雨浩体内,丽雅和天梦冰蚕镇守精神之海。其他四大魂灵则是来到了霍雨浩胸口位置的魂力之中,默默的感受着他的魂力变化。 The Snow Em­peror sound re­sounds in the Huo Yuhao mind, „Yuhao, you must first do. Re­as­signs from Soul Nu­cleus own Soul Power, only main­tains that side Spir­i­tual Power.” 雪帝的声音在霍雨浩脑海中响起,“雨浩,你首先要做的。就是将自己的魂力从魂核那边抽调出来,只保持那边的精神力。” „Good.” Huo Yuhao com­plies with one, rev­o­lu­tion Soul Power, through lead of Soul Power, lo­cates Soul Power that around Soul Nu­cleus com­presses to lead be­tween the eye­brows out­ward. “好。”霍雨浩答应一声,运转魂力,通过魂力的带动,将自己眉心处魂核周围压缩的魂力向外带动。 This is not an easy mat­ter, be­cause his body bear­ing ca­pac­ity is lim­ited. After hav­ing Soul Nu­cleus, Soul Nu­cleus helps him com­press Soul Power, thus makes him be have many Soul Power. His trans­fers Soul Power, these Soul Power will flood in his merid­i­ans, quick, his merid­i­ans al­ready full not any crevice. 这可不是一件容易的事情,因为他的身体承受能力是有限的。拥有魂核之后,魂核就帮他压缩魂力,从而让他能够拥有更多的魂力。他这一将魂力调动出来,这些魂力就会充斥在他经脉之中,很快,他的经脉就已经饱胀的没有任何空隙了。 „Yuhao, con­tinue, do not stop.” The Snow Em­peror sound con­veys once more. “雨浩,继续,不要停。”雪帝声音再次传来。 Mean­while, the Huo Yuhao clear feel­ing, one­self chest and back skele­ton trem­ble slightly, on the skele­ton sent out the aqua­ma­rine ray. These sav­ings are started to ab­sorb by this Ice Jade Em­peror Scor­pion Torso Bone in huge Soul Power of his within the body im­me­di­ately, enter in Torso Bone, mak­ing his merid­i­ans have the idle place. 与此同时,霍雨浩清楚的感觉到,自己胸部和背部的骨骼微微一颤,紧接着,骨骼上就散发出了碧绿色的光芒。那些积蓄在他体内的庞大魂力立刻就被这冰碧帝皇蝎躯干骨开始吸收,进入躯干骨内,让他的经脉有了空余之处。 In Huo Yuhao heart one happy, he some­what un­der­stands that Ice Em­peror and Snow Em­peror must make any­thing. At that mo­ment does not dare to ne­glect, con­trols Soul Power that in mind Soul Nu­cleus is com­press­ing to out­put rapidly out­ward. 霍雨浩心中一喜,他已经有些明白冰帝和雪帝要做什么了。当下不敢怠慢,迅速控制着自己精神魂核内压缩的魂力向外输出。 What all these carry on is very smooth, Soul Mas­ter con­sumes Soul Power is very nor­mal mat­ter, in the fight can fre­quently so. That side mind Soul Nu­cleus fo­cus­ing on Spir­i­tual Power, clos­est Soul Nu­cleus, is highly com­pres­sion Spir­i­tual Power. 这一切进行的还是很顺利的,魂师消耗魂力是很正常的事情,在战斗中经常会如此。精神魂核那边又是以精神力为主的,最接近魂核的,都是高度压缩的精神力。 There­fore, after Soul Power was trans­ferred, Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nu­cleus ob­vi­ously be­came more ac­tive, spir­i­tual sea started to re­volve rapidly, Spir­i­tual Power re­lease out­ward nat­u­rally. 因此,魂力被调动出去之后,霍雨浩的精神魂核显然变得更加活跃了,精神之海开始迅速运转起来,精神力自然而然的向外释放。 If the nor­mal con­di­tion, Spir­i­tual Power that these re­lease out­ward nat­u­rally will in­spire heaven and earth el­e­men­tal en­ergy, after at­tract­ing in­come within the body, changes into Huo Yuhao Soul Power, sup­ple­mented his con­sump­tion. 如果是正常情况,这些向外释放出去的精神力就会自然而然的引动天地元力,吸收入体内后,重新化为霍雨浩的魂力,对他的消耗进行补充。 This is also the Soul Nu­cleus for­mi­da­ble place, so long as gives its enough time, does not carry on med­i­tate, can help Soul Mas­ter re­store Soul Power. 这也是魂核强大的地方,只要给它足够的时间,就是不进行冥想,也能够帮助魂师恢复魂力。 Just, at this time, Huo Yuhao ob­vi­ously did not need Soul Nu­cleus to help him re­store Soul Power now. 只不过,现在这个时候,霍雨浩显然是不需要魂核来帮他恢复魂力的。 A light halo ap­pears in the Huo Yuhao skin sur­face, this halo is Bai Se (White Color), what get­ting rid is Day­dream Ice Silk­worm. 一层淡淡的光晕出现在霍雨浩皮肤表面,这层光晕是白色的,出手的是天梦冰蚕。 The most fa­mil­iar Huo Yuhao body, is his Brother Day­dream! 最熟悉霍雨浩身体的,就是他的天梦哥啊！ Huo Yuhao ini­tially bumped into Day­dream Ice Silk­worm, Day­dream Ice Silk­worm and he fuses, be­comes his first Soul Ring. At that time, Huo Yuhao also likely is a white paper. These years, the Huo Yuhao abil­ity has been grow­ing, is Day­dream Ice Silk­worm looks that he walks step by step. There­fore, Brother Day­dream is nat­u­rally fa­mil­iar with his sit­u­a­tion. 霍雨浩当初碰到天梦冰蚕,天梦冰蚕和他进行融合,成为他的第一魂环。那时候,霍雨浩还像是一张白纸。这些年,霍雨浩的能力一直在成长,也是天梦冰蚕看着他一步步走过来的。所以,天梦哥对他的情况自然是再熟悉不过了。 Does not need Snow Em­peror to tell that Brother Day­dream has han­dled the most cor­rect mat­ter, trans­fers Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual Power, has blocked his own mind Soul Nu­cleus and com­mu­ni­ca­tion of out­side heaven and earth el­e­men­tal en­ergy. As the mat­ter stands, will not have heaven and earth el­e­men­tal en­ergy to enter around Soul Nu­cleus, formed Soul Power. 根本不需要雪帝吩咐,天梦哥已经做了最正确的事情,调动霍雨浩的精神力,封锁了他自身精神魂核与外界天地元力的沟通。这样一来,就不会有天地元力进入魂核周围,重新形成魂力了。 Spir­i­tual Power that mind Soul Nu­cleus re­leases out­ward will strengthen nat­u­rally, the re­sis­tance of out­side also sim­i­larly is the power that pro­motes it to re­volve. 精神魂核向外释放出的精神力自然而然会加强,外界的阻力也同样是促进它运转的动力。 Li Ya also moved at this time, gen­tle Spir­i­tual Power re­volves Soul Nu­cleus, slows down the speed of Soul Nu­cleus rev­o­lu­tion, car­ries on cer­tain sup­pres­sion. 丽雅也在这个时候动了,柔和的精神力围绕着魂核,减缓魂核运转的速度,对它进行一定的压制。 But Huo Yuhao as far as pos­si­ble speeds up Soul Power that re­as­signs in Soul Nu­cleus to com­press. 而霍雨浩则是尽可能的加快抽调魂核内压缩的魂力。 The re­bound of Soul Nu­cleus re­as­signs Soul Power to sur­pass 70% after Huo Yuhao started. The for­mi­da­ble suc­tion made Day­dream Ice Silk­worm arrange out­side mind bar­rier starts to drag, but Li Ya was con­trol­ling with every ef­fort, but also made this suc­tion pro­duce was slightly slow. 魂核的反弹从霍雨浩抽调魂力超过七成之后开始了。强大的吸力令天梦冰蚕布置在外面的精神屏障开始摇曳,而丽雅虽然在尽力控制,但也只是让这份吸力产生的略微慢一点而已。 This is the great strength of Soul Nu­cleus! Once Soul Nu­cleus forms, is the foun­tain­heads of Soul Mas­ter all strengths, so is can it be that easy to vac­il­late? 这就是魂核的强大！魂核一旦形成,就是魂师一切力量的源泉,又岂是那么容易动摇的？ The Huo Yuhao will is quite firm, al­though feels this change, does not have the mean­ing that any changes it­self to move, as in whole-heart­edly re­as­signs own com­pres­sion Soul Power. 霍雨浩的意志极为坚定,尽管感受到这种变化,却也没有任何改变自己行动的意思,依旧在全力以赴的抽调自己的压缩魂力。 At this time ap­peared the Mer­maid Princess su­pe­ri­or­ity, the Li Ya pri­or­ity did not make the rev­o­lu­tion of Soul Nu­cleus re­duce speed, but main­tained the sta­bil­ity of Soul Nu­cleus. 这个时候就显现出人鱼公主的优势了,丽雅的首要任务不是让魂核的运转减慢,而是保持魂核的稳定。 This makes Huo Yuhao un­nec­es­sary di­verts at­ten­tion. Must know that Soul Nu­cleus is not steady, has the pos­si­bil­ity of ex­plo­sion, al­though has formed Soul Nu­cleus, the re­sist­ing force is strong. But, Huo Yuhao this going all out re­as­signs the pro­ce­dure that does not let now re­store, will make Soul Nu­cleus tur­bu­lent, at that time, he needs to con­sume en­ergy to main­tain. But this mat­ter, Li Ya helped him do. 这就让霍雨浩不必要分心。要知道,魂核不稳,就有爆炸的可能,虽然已经形成了魂核,抗力还是较强的。可是,霍雨浩现在这种拼命抽调又不让恢复的做法,还是会让魂核动荡,那时候,他就需要消耗精力去维护。而这件事,丽雅帮他做了。 Day­dream Ice Silk­worm also in­creased to re­as­sign­ing of Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual Power , to con­tinue the for­eign iso­la­tion. 天梦冰蚕也加大了对霍雨浩精神力的抽调,继续对外隔绝。 At this time, no one dares to keep the strength, all in whole-heart­edly was car­ry­ing on. 这个时候,谁也不敢留力,全都在全力以赴的进行着。 Time one minute one sec­ond passed, Huo Yuhao can feel clearly own spir­i­tual sea under the re­as­sign­ment of Soul Nu­cleus un­ceas­ing trem­bling, is want­ing to re­lease to help him Spir­i­tual Power re­store Soul Power. But mat­ter that Li Ya han­dles now, looks like firmly grasps Soul Nu­cleus, does not make Soul Nu­cleus vi­brate. But Day­dream Ice Silk­worm wraps the body of Huo Yuhao from out­side, mak­ing him iso­late with world of out­side. 时间一分一秒的过去了,霍雨浩能够清楚的感觉到自己精神之海在魂核的调动下正在不断的震颤,想要将精神力释放出去帮他恢复魂力。而丽雅现在做的事情,就像是牢牢的抱住魂核,不让魂核震动。而天梦冰蚕则是从外面包裹住霍雨浩的身体,让他与外面的世界隔绝。 An­other side, four big Ab­solute Ice spir­its did not have what sound, but Ice Em­peror is con­trol­ling Ice Jade Em­peror Scor­pion Torso Bone un­ceas­ingly, ab­sorbs Soul Power that Huo Yuhao shifts. 另一边,四大极致之冰魂灵则还没有什么动静,只是冰帝不断控制着冰碧帝皇蝎躯干骨,吸收霍雨浩转移过来的魂力。 At this time, the great strength of Ice Jade Em­peror Scor­pion Torso Bone ap­peared, from start to the pre­sent, it has al­most ab­sorbed Huo Yuhao 50% Soul Power, as be­fore has not ac­tu­ally ar­rived at end. It­self be­comes lush green, has not made Huo Yuhao feel slightly full. 这个时候,冰碧帝皇蝎躯干骨的强大就显现出来了,从开始到现在,它几乎已经吸收了霍雨浩五成的魂力,却依旧没有到尽头似的。本身只是变得更加青翠欲滴,却丝毫没有让霍雨浩感觉到饱胀。 Process Huo Yuhao that the help of six big spir­its, at least this just started felt that is quite re­laxed. At pre­sent has not come across the dif­fi­cult prob­lem. 有六大魂灵的帮助,至少这刚开始的过程霍雨浩感觉到还是较为轻松的。目前还没遇到难题。 Soul Power ab­sorp­tion many of more and more, ter­ri­fy­ing Soul Power fluc­tu­ates every time to trem­ble, Huo Yuhao Soul Nu­cleus will be­come the even more wild sev­eral points. Li Ya deals started be­comes dif­fi­cult. To con­trol mind Soul Nu­cleus, quite in the Huo Yuhao for­mi­da­ble Spir­i­tual Power re­sis­tance. 魂力吸收的越来越多,恐怖的魂力波动每一次震颤,霍雨浩的魂核都会变得越发狂暴几分。丽雅应对的已经开始变得困难了。想要控制精神魂核,就相当于更霍雨浩强大的精神力对抗。 „Yuhao, con­trols Soul Nu­cleus, mak­ing him slow.” Snow Em­peror said. “雨浩,控制魂核,让他慢下来。”雪帝说道。 The Huo Yuhao thought moves, own mind Soul Nu­cleus re­stores im­me­di­ately under one­self con­trol. En­tire Soul Nu­cleus wild be­came has also sta­bi­lized. 霍雨浩意念一动,自己的精神魂核立刻恢复在自己掌控之下。整个魂核的狂暴也变得稳定了下来。 Li Ya was lib­er­ated im­me­di­ately, rests in his spir­i­tual sea. But has con­trolled mind Soul Nu­cleus Huo Yuhao, now can­not di­vert at­ten­tion to re­as­sign own Soul Power again. 丽雅立刻被解放了出来,在他的精神之海中休息。而控制了精神魂核的霍雨浩,现在就不能再分心去抽调自己的魂力了。 He is sup­press­ing the Soul Nu­cleus in­stinct now. The Soul Nu­cleus in­stinct sup­pressed re­sult, will make the re­bound more in­tense. 他现在是在抑制魂核的本能。魂核本能被抑制的结果,就会让反弹变得更加强烈。 A pow­er­ful suc­tion trans­mits from the dant­ian po­si­tion, pulls out to Huo Yuhao Soul Nu­cleus around final Ab­solute Ice Soul Power. This strength nat­u­rally from Snow Em­peror, she fi­nally got rid. 一股强盛的吸力从丹田位置传来,抽离霍雨浩魂核周围最后的极致之冰魂力。这股力量自然是来自于雪帝的,她终于出手了。 Huo Yuhao can feel faintly that the di­a­mond ice crys­tal ap­pears in own dant­ian po­si­tion to­gether, is hav­ing very strong suc­tion, all ab­sorbed the past own Soul Power, and in the process of ab­sorp­tion, was com­press­ing these Soul Power un­ex­pect­edly, was play­ing and Soul Nu­cleus sim­i­lar role. 霍雨浩能够隐隐感觉到,一块菱形冰晶出现在自己丹田位置,产生着很强的吸力,将自己的魂力全都吸收过去,并且在吸收的过程中,居然在压缩这些魂力,起着和魂核类似的作用。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #558 The masculine and feminine elements is supplementary, the second soul nucleus


Aura that on that ice crys­tal trans­mits, is Snow Em­peror. Wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test 那冰晶上传来的气息,正是雪帝的。水印广告测试 Wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test 水印广告测试 What Snow Em­peror is this is mak­ing? 雪帝她这是在做什么？ Huo Yuhao is very clear, is Snow Em­peror of spirit, can con­trol Ab­solute Ice, but do not have the means ab­sorp­tion, she such com­presses, will be will be very cer­tainly big to own Spir­i­tual Con­scious­ness con­sump­tion. 霍雨浩很清楚,身为魂灵的雪帝,可以控制极致之冰,但自己却是没办法吸收的,她这么压缩,一定是会对自己灵识消耗很大。 How­ever, in op­por­tu­nity that this time he sim­ply has not asked. Started, can­not stop. 不过,在这个时候他根本没有问的机会。已经开始了,就不能停止。 Spir­i­tual Power cir­cu­la­tion, air in slight is shiv­er­ing. Huo Yuhao is mind Soul Nu­cleus con­trol, he con­trols be­fore Li Ya the con­trol ef­fect was much bet­ter . The mind sinks to mind Soul Nu­cleus, mak­ing it enter to half dor­mancy con­di­tion, what­ever Soul Power were re­as­signed. Part in­te­grates nearby dant­ian Snow Em­peror that side di­a­mond crys­tal, an­other part, was con­trolled Ice Jade Em­peror Scor­pion Torso Bone suc­tion by Ice Em­peror. 精神力流转,空气在轻微的颤抖着。霍雨浩是精神魂核的掌控者,他自己控制就要比丽雅之前控制效果好得多了。心神沉入精神魂核中,让它进入到半休眠的状态,任由魂力被抽调走。一部分融入丹田雪帝那边的菱形晶体附近,另一部分,则是被冰帝控制着冰碧帝皇蝎躯干骨吸走了。 Soul Power of Huo Yuhao within the body, starts be­comes fewer and fewer. 霍雨浩体内的魂力,也开始变得越来越少。 Fi­nally, has not known how long, around mind Soul Nu­cleus did not have any Soul Power fluc­tu­a­tion to exist fi­nally again. All Soul Power en­tered the body of Huo Yuhao. 终于,不知道过了多长时间,精神魂核周围终于再没有任何魂力波动存在了。所有的魂力都进入了霍雨浩的身体。 But at this time, the snow and ice two em­per­ors have not ac­tu­ally stopped, but con­tin­ues to ab­sorb, ab­sorbs the place that Soul Power one­self are at un­ceas­ingly. Soul Power of Huo Yuhao within the body grad­u­ally was also found time. 而这时候,冰雪二帝却并没有停止,而是继续吸收,不断将魂力吸收到自己所在的地方。霍雨浩体内的魂力也就被逐渐的抽空了。 Huo Yuhao grad­u­ally had guessed cor­rectly now the snow and ice two em­per­ors must do, had them to help, to con­dense this sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus re­ally to save the mas­sive en­ergy to one­self! Must suc­ceed! 霍雨浩现在已经逐渐猜到冰雪二帝要干什么了,有她们帮助,凝聚这第二魂核果然是给自己节省了大量的精力啊！一定要成功！ Snow Em­peror and Ice Em­peror are al­most si­mul­ta­ne­ous ac­cel­er­a­tion ab­sorb, Soul Power of Huo Yuhao within the body is van­ish­ing at an ex­cep­tional pace, quick, all was in­haled that two places. Huo Yuhao own body is empty. Even has the in­ter­mit­tent weak trans­mis­sion. But mind Soul Nu­cleus shiv­ers was also fiercer. It longs to the ab­sorp­tion of en­ergy, al­though it is mind Soul Nu­cleus, may ab­solutely not be small to the hope of Soul Power. 雪帝和冰帝几乎是同时加速吸收,霍雨浩体内的魂力以惊人的速度消失着,很快,就全都被吸入到那两个地方。霍雨浩自己的身体空荡荡的。甚至有阵阵虚弱感传来。而精神魂核颤抖的也更加剧烈了。它渴望对能量的吸收,尽管它是精神魂核,可对魂力的渴望也绝对不小。 The Snow Em­peror sound re­sounds, „Yuhao, I must start. Then, will have the pain to ar­rive. When me starts to con­dense sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus for you. The re­sis­tance of your side mind Soul Nu­cleus will be greatly strength­ened. Be­cause it can the feel­ing of sub­con­scious some peo­ple prob­a­bly de­stroy its do­main, def­i­nitely will stick out sud­denly the counter-at­tack. You must do, is in any event must stand firm it, makes it to me do not dis­turb as far as pos­si­ble. Li Ya. You are ready. When nec­es­sary helps him. Day­dream, you con­tin­ued to pro­tect out­side on the line.” 雪帝的声音响起,“雨浩,我要开始了。接下来,将会有痛苦到来。当我这边开始为你凝聚第二魂核的时候。你那边精神魂核的抗拒会极强。因为它会潜意识的感觉到有人要来破坏它的地盘,必然会暴起反击。你要做的,就是无论如何都要稳住它,尽可能让它不要给我干扰。丽雅。你做好准备。必要的时候帮他。天梦,你继续在外面护好就行了。” Huo Yuhao trans­mits to a Snow Em­peror af­fir­ma­tive thought. Si­mul­ta­ne­ously hits own Spir­i­tual Power. 霍雨浩传递给雪帝一个肯定的意念。同时击中自己的精神力。 One re­strain their body in­stinct, is not a com­fort­able mat­ter. Ac­com­plish­ing a task with ease when Huo Yuhao ac­tu­ally makes now, this is the for­mi­da­ble mind con­trol­ling force. 自己克制自己的身体本能,绝不是一件舒服的事情。当霍雨浩现在却做的游刃有余,这就是强大的精神控制力。 In the Huo Yuhao empty body, qui­etly pre­sented Soul Power. 霍雨浩空荡荡的身体之中,悄然出现了一丝魂力。 This Soul Power. By the dant­ian po­si­tion, the di­a­mond ice crys­tal place of Snow Em­peror in­car­na­tion trans­mits. 这一丝魂力。正是由丹田位置,雪帝化身的菱形冰晶处传来的。 Around the di­a­mond ice crys­tal, Ab­solute Ice Soul Power just likes the galaxy cir­cles gen­er­ally, ex­treme con­geal­ing re­al­ity. After branch­ing out this, does not have any in­flu­ence. 菱形冰晶周围,极致之冰魂力犹如星河一般盘旋,极为的凝实。分出这一丝之后,也没有任何影响。 This Soul Power sur­faces the boat slowly, has hov­ered to the Huo Yuhao chest po­si­tion, first has stopped there. Then starts to re­volve qui­etly. 这一丝魂力徐徐上浮,一直游动到霍雨浩胸口位置,先是在那里停顿了一下。然后开始悄然旋转。 Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nu­cleus ac­cord­ing to clock­wise has re­volved, but this Soul Power, after the stop, changed into, only then mil­let grain of rice big lit­tle. Po­si­tion of stop cen­ter the Huo Yuhao chest, but di­rec­tion that he re­volves, is ac­tu­ally anti-clock­wise. 霍雨浩的精神魂核一直都是按照顺时针方向旋转的,而这一丝魂力,在停顿之后,就化为了只有小米米粒大的一点点。停顿在霍雨浩胸口正中位置,而他旋转的方向,却是逆时针。 Slight re­volv­ing, has not caused any­thing to fluc­tu­ate. 轻微的旋转,并没有引起什么波动。 How­ever, be­hind this lit­tle Soul Power, is ac­tu­ally con­nect­ing a Soul Power silk to dant­ian, there, be­fore is Snow Em­peror, ab­sorbed past Soul Power. 但是,这一点点魂力后面,却连接着一条通往丹田的魂力丝,那里,全都是雪帝之前吸收过去的魂力。 In other words, is re­volv­ing this point Soul Power, con­stantly strength­ens under the con­trol of Snow Em­peror. 也就是说,正在旋转着的这一点魂力,是在雪帝的控制下不断增强的。 Its ve­loc­ity of whirl is not fast, the self-en­ergy am­pli­fi­ca­tion speed is not fast, re­volv­ing is very steady and is very steady. But at this time, on Ice Jade Em­peror Scor­pion Torso Bone under Ice Em­peror con­trol, the green jade light clear twin­kle, forms an in­su­la­tion, has iso­lated the sen­sa­tion of out­side to this chest place en­ergy slightly. 它的旋转速度不快,本身能量增幅的速度也不快,旋转的很稳、很稳。而此时,在冰帝控制下的冰碧帝皇蝎躯干骨上,碧光晶莹闪烁,形成一个隔层,略微隔绝了外界对这胸口处能量的感知。 „Yuhao. We can­not iso­late coun­ter­clock­wise ro­ta­tion Ab­solute Ice Soul Power com­pletely, in that case, once the iso­la­tion opens, your mind Soul Nu­cleus will have the erup­tion -type con­flict with it, your body can­not with­stand ab­solutely, will ex­plode di­rectly. There­fore, we can only make your mind Soul Nu­cleus con­tin­u­ally adapt to its ex­is­tence, from repel to ac­cep­tance for­ma­tion. This process, is most dif­fi­cult. The im­pact must start im­me­di­ately, you are ready.” “雨浩。我们不能完全对逆时针旋转的极致之冰魂力进行隔绝,那样的话,一旦隔绝开启,你的精神魂核与它就会产生爆发式的冲突,你的身体是万万承受不起的,直接就会爆掉。所以,我们只能让你的精神魂核去不断适应它的存在,从排斥向接受法阵。这个过程,也是最难的。冲击马上就要开始了,你做好准备。” „Good, come.” Huo Yuhao com­plies with one, he com­pletely does not man­age the sit­u­a­tion in one­self dant­ian and chest place now, com­pletely mind will cen­tral­ized above own mind Soul Nu­cleus. “好,来吧。”霍雨浩答应一声,他现在完全不去管自己丹田和胸口处的情况,将全部精神意志都集中在自己的精神魂核之上。 Ab­solute Ice Soul Power re­volv­ing of chest place starts to ac­cel­er­ate, Huo Yuhao, mind Soul Nu­cleus as if started to feel that is not right. It first is slight is trem­bling, then starts to strug­gle in the thought con­trol of Huo Yuhao. 胸口处的极致之冰魂力旋转开始加速,霍雨浩这边,精神魂核似乎已经开始感觉到不对了。它先是轻微的震颤着,然后开始在霍雨浩的意念控制中挣扎。 This is own Soul Nu­cleus, the Huo Yuhao nat­u­rally feel­ing it must do, it wants the ex­treme twist, dares to chal­lenge the dig­ni­fied fel­low that by one­self for­mi­da­ble Spir­i­tual Power to tear into shreds thor­oughly. 这是自己的魂核,霍雨浩当然感觉的出它要干什么,它是要急速旋转,凭借自己强大的精神力将那个敢于挑战自己威严的家伙彻底撕碎。 Huo Yuhao con­trol­ling force also along with it en­hance­ment. Trem­bling of mind Soul Nu­cleus also started to be get­ting more and more fierce. Ab­solute Ice Soul Power of chest place in­creased to grad­u­ally had the grain of rice size. 霍雨浩的控制力也随之加强。精神魂核的震颤也开始越来越剧烈了。胸口处的极致之冰魂力渐渐增加到了有米粒大小。 The Huo Yuhao strong con­trol, is not mak­ing mind Soul Nu­cleus dis­turb. 霍雨浩强硬的控制着,不让精神魂核去干扰。 That side Snow Em­peror, very sta­ble is con­tinue in­crease the con­den­sa­tion of Ab­solute Ice Soul Power, does not ac­cel­er­ate. Such that just like it is said, she is mak­ing mind Soul Nu­cleus grad­u­ally adapt. Just, this adap­ta­tion starts from the in­tense repel. 雪帝那边,也很稳定的在持续增加极致之冰魂力的凝聚,并不加速。正如它所说的那样,她是在让精神魂核在慢慢适应。只不过,这份适应是从强烈排斥开始的。 The dizzy feel­ing was get­ting more and more in­tense, one­self re­sist their mind Soul Nu­cleus , is re­sist­ing own Spir­i­tual Source! 晕眩的感觉越来越强烈了,自己抵抗自己的精神魂核,也就是在抵抗自己的精神本源啊！ Huo Yuhao mind world starts to pre­sent il­lu­sion, al­though he in strong con­trol, but this con­trol start has made his spir­i­tual sea also shiver. 霍雨浩的精神世界开始出现幻觉,他虽然在强硬的控制,但这种控制已经开始让他的精神之海也随之颤抖了。 At this mo­ment, the in­ter­est­ing to lis­ten to singing sound re­sounds, Li Ya Spir­i­tual Power re­leases qui­etly out­ward. Her Spir­i­tual Power was full of the charm­ing con­fu­sion might, charm­ing con­fu­sion spir­i­tual sea has been sta­bi­liz­ing, charm­ing con­fu­sion was mak­ing the Huo Yuhao pain re­duce, Soul Nu­cleus to strug­gle to weaken. 就在这时,动听的歌声响起,丽雅的精神力悄然向外释放。她的精神力充满了魅惑的威力,魅惑着精神之海稳定下来,也魅惑着让霍雨浩的痛苦减轻、魂核挣扎变弱。 Re­volv­ing of Ab­solute Ice Soul Power, is not only strength­en­ing, but also the ve­loc­ity of whirl is also in­creas­ing. 极致之冰魂力的旋转,不但在增强,而且旋转速度也在增加。 As­sis­tance of Li Ya, but let Huo Yuhao tran­quil a while, the pow­er­ful im­pact feel­ing once more has trans­mit­ted. 丽雅的辅助,只是让霍雨浩这边平静了一会儿,强烈的冲击感就已经再次传来了。 „Yuhao, you can relax points the con­trol to Soul Nu­cleus, can­not sup­press com­pletely, this is dis­ad­van­ta­geous to the later fu­sion.” “雨浩,你可以放松一点对魂核的控制,不能完全压制,这对之后的融合不利。” „Um.” “嗯。” Re­laxes? After Huo Yuhao such has done, he dis­cov­ered that like this makes the con­se­quence that causes, even be more dif­fi­cult than to re­sist be­fore­hand her­metic mind Soul Nu­cleus. 放松一点？当霍雨浩真的这么做了之后,他就发现,这样做带来的后果,甚至要比之前全封闭精神魂核更加难抗。 After hav­ing a slit. Spir­i­tual Power surge, does not dis­si­pate out­ward, but di­rectly soared the chest place im­pact in the past, at­tempted there was re­volv­ing the grain of rice size Ab­solute Ice Soul Power smash­ing. 有了一丝缝隙之后。精神力彭湃而出,也不向外逸散,而是直奔胸口处冲击过去,试图将那里正在旋转着的米粒大小极致之冰魂力粉碎。 green jade light dodges. The chest po­si­tion was blocked com­pletely. Ice Em­peror got rid. Ab­solute Ice Soul Power re­sists Spir­i­tual Power out­side. Pro­tects the cen­tral source. 碧光一闪。胸口位置被全部封死。冰帝出手了。极致之冰魂力将精神力抵挡在外。保护住中央的本源。 When Spir­i­tual Power and flash of Ab­solute Ice col­li­sion, the Huo Yuhao whole body fiercely shiv­ered. The whole body blood­lines in that flick­ered as if are the ad­verse cur­rent gen­er­ally, dis­com­fort that could not say. 当精神力和极致之冰碰撞的一瞬间,霍雨浩全身都剧烈的颤抖了一下。全身血脉在那一瞬仿佛是逆流了一般,说不出的难受。 Huo Yuhao lets loose slit mind Soul Nu­cleus to start the crazy rhythm to get up, want­ing many Spir­i­tual Power to re­lease, at­tacks the pro­tec­tion of Ice Em­peror. But Huo Yuhao must guar­an­tee that has the Spir­i­tual Power out­put. Also must con­trol can­not be too many. Com­pares the be­fore­hand block­ade, im­me­di­ately be­came more dif­fi­cult. 霍雨浩放开一丝缝隙的精神魂核开始疯狂的律动起来,想要将更多的精神力释放出去,去冲击冰帝的守护。而霍雨浩既要保证有精神力输出。又要控制不能太多。相比之前的封锁,顿时变得更加困难了。 The Ice Em­peror de­fense, Snow Em­peror is con­tinue con­trol. The speed of Ab­solute Ice Soul Power out­put, fi­nally started to in­crease. 冰帝防御,雪帝则在继续控制。极致之冰魂力输出的速度,终于开始增加了。 Ab­solute Ice Soul Power of grain of rice size quickly turned into the yel­low piso­lite size. But that Spir­i­tual Power, is also the de­fense of even more crazy im­pact Ice Em­peror. 米粒大小的极致之冰魂力很快就变成了黄豆粒大小。而那一股股精神力,则是也越发疯狂的冲击冰帝的防御。 The fierce pain con­tin­u­ously ap­pears, Huo Yuhao must bear the body pain, but must con­trol mind Soul Nu­cleus. Also must with­stand the weak feel­ing that spir­i­tual sea trans­mits un­ceas­ingly. 剧烈的痛苦不断出现,霍雨浩既要承受身体痛苦,还要控制精神魂核。又要承受精神之海不断传来的虚弱感。 He is re­ly­ing on the for­mi­da­ble willpower, under so pain, un­ex­pect­edly in­sis­tence stiffly, more­over does not have the tremor of half minute. 他凭借着自己强大的意志力,在如此痛苦之下,竟然硬生生的坚持住了,而且没有半分的颤动。 Tena­cious­ness of Huo Yuhao. Also has given six big spirit full con­fi­dence. 霍雨浩的顽强。也给了六大魂灵充分的信心。 The light Bai Se (White Color) halo starts to ap­pear above the skele­ton and merid­i­ans of Huo Yuhao whole body, the cool feel­ing made the stab­bing pain that the im­pact brought be weaken im­me­di­ately. 淡淡的白色光晕开始出现在霍雨浩全身的骨骼和经络之上,清凉的感觉让冲击带来的刺痛顿时减弱了许多。 This was from the Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Lit­tle White) strength, Xiao Bai (Lit­tle White) starts is Huo Yuhao pro­tects his body. 这是来自于冰熊王小白的力量,小白开始为霍雨浩守护他的身体了。 The pain re­duces slightly, Huo Yuhao does not have the least bit to relax, be­cause of mind Soul Nu­cleus in con­geal­ment of Ab­solute Ice Soul Power along with chest, but pro­motes con­tin­u­ally. 痛苦略微减轻,霍雨浩却没有半点放松,因为精神魂核正在随着胸口内极致之冰魂力的凝结而持续提升。 De­fends stub­bornly the mind thought that the Huo Yuhao con­fi­dence is also get­ting more and more full, one­self have the help of six big spir­its, if was un­able to suc­ceed, that is un­fair to fa­vor­ing that as­cends the sky? 固守精神意念,霍雨浩的信心也越来越足,自己有六大魂灵的帮助啊,如果还不能成功,那岂不是对不起上天的厚待？ The men­tal­ity is sta­ble, as if makes the pain that he feels also re­duce. Con­den­sa­tion Spir­i­tual Power silently, is con­trol­ling mind Soul Nu­cleus, mak­ing its op­er­a­tion even more slow, but out­put Spir­i­tual Power also sta­bi­lizes to con­tinue, qui­etly im­pact. 心态稳定,似乎让他感受到的痛苦也在降低。默默的凝聚精神力,控制着精神魂核,让它的运行越发缓慢起来,而输出的精神力也稳定而持续,悄然冲击。 Be­cause Ab­solute Ice Soul Power of chest place main body is in­creas­ing un­ceas­ingly, its ve­loc­ity of whirl and ab­sorbs the Ab­solute Ice Soul Power speed to be also strength­ened. It, started to take to the feel­ing of Huo Yuhao pain. 胸口处的极致之冰魂力因为本体在不断变大,它的旋转速度和吸收极致之冰魂力的速度也都在增强。它本身,也开始带给霍雨浩痛苦的感觉了。 That must be is re­vers­ing un­ex­pect­edly! The feel­ing of this re­ver­sal di­rectly ap­pears on one­self, Huo Yuhao must with­stand, is the dual pain. 那必竟是在逆转啊！这种逆转的感觉又是直接出现在自己身上,霍雨浩要承受的,就是双重痛苦。 The in­tense prick­ing trans­mits from the front un­ceas­ingly, has the feel­ing of suf­fo­ca­tion grad­u­ally. But this pain re­gard­ing Huo Yuhao is also not any­thing. 强烈的刺痛感不断从胸前传来,渐渐有着窒息的感觉。但这点痛苦对于霍雨浩来说还不算什么。 How­ever, he has dis­cov­ered quickly the sur­prised mat­ter. In own dant­ian po­si­tion, Snow Em­peror that di­a­mond ice crys­tal, started slow up­ward to in­crease un­ex­pect­edly. 不过,他很快就发现了吃惊的事情。在自己丹田位置,雪帝所化的那枚菱形冰晶,竟然开始缓慢的向上攀升了。 This di­a­mond ice crys­tal and Ab­solute Ice Soul Power of chest place con­den­sa­tion form­ing, has had the Soul Power re­la­tion, but this time mu­tual at­trac­tion had the trans­for­ma­tion, in­stead likely is above under the ab­sorp­tion, that small Soul Power has af­fected Snow Em­peror strength el­e­va­tion un­ex­pect­edly. 这菱形冰晶与胸口处凝聚成形的极致之冰魂力,一直都是有魂力联系的,而此时的相互吸引发生了转变,反而像是上面吸收下面,那小小魂力竟然牵动了雪帝的力量向上提升似的。 This...... 这…… What is Snow Em­peror this is mak­ing? 雪帝这是在做什么？ Huo Yuhao some are not clear, but at this time, the trust was all foun­da­tions, he will cer­tainly not ask that will not ques­tion. 霍雨浩有些不明白,但在这个时候,信任是一切的基础,他当然不会去问,更不会去质疑。 ----------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------------------- The peer­less Tang Sect car­toon launches in salvos, Wang Dong en­ters the stage to pre­sent, met with the Huo Yuhao dor­mi­tory. Every­body con­sults in our pres­tige plat­form. Joins the book friend in plat­form to trans­mit newly: Peer­less Tang Sect 126 con­sult. Be­fore 125 trig­ger­ing key­words in­creased, sorry. Can ex­am­ine. Trans­mis­sion: Peer­less Tang Sect 125. A con­sult ear­lier car­toon, changed the fig­ure on the line. From peer­less Tang Sect one, starts. 绝世唐门漫画连发,王冬出场亮相,和霍雨浩宿舍相遇。大家在我们威信平台进行查阅。新加入平台的书友发送:绝世唐门126进行查阅。之前125的触发关键词已经添加了,抱歉。可以查看了。发送:绝世唐门125。查阅更早的漫画,更改数字就行了。从绝世唐门一,开始。 Joins our pres­tige plat­form to be very sim­ple, pres­tige - top right-hand cor­ner plus sign - in­creases friend - search pub­lic num­ber, has the au­then­ti­ca­tion, is our fam­i­lies. Watches the charm­ing car­toon quickly! Lis­tens re­spect­fully to the third child newest con­di­tion quickly. Later, we will have the ex­clu­sive short story to de­liver, for ex­am­ple, be­yond Douluo Con­ti­nent! Hey. 加入我们威信平台很简单,威信-右上角加号-添加朋友-查找公众号,带认证的,就是我们的家喽。快来看帅气漫画吧！快来聆听老三最新的状态吧。之后,我们还会有独家短篇小说送上,譬如,斗罗大陆番外哦！嘿嘿。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #559 Mu protects


Is up­ward with the Snow Em­peror ice crys­tal, the Soul Power con­den­sa­tion speed of his chest place also starts to be strength­ened, the body pain is strength­ened, mind Soul Nu­cleus strug­gles even more is also fierce. Two feel­ings put to­gether, that is not one plus one equal to two so is sim­ple! 伴随着雪帝冰晶向上,他胸口处的魂力凝聚速度也开始增强,身体痛苦增强,精神魂核挣扎的也越发厉害。两种感觉加在一起,那可不是一加一等于二那么简单啊！ The strength de­fense of Ice Em­peror is very as be­fore sta­ble, Huo Yuhao is cen­tered on the ver­te­bra, the front and back rib is a sup­port, the whole has formed a safety mask. But Huo Yuhao ac­tu­ally dis­cov­ered that Ice Em­peror also starts no longer to pre­vent com­plete Spir­i­tual Power out­side, but puts one, a small silk, wants slen­der hun­dred times com­pared with the hair silk. Let this Spir­i­tual Power fall on that Ab­solute Ice Soul Power. 冰帝的力量防御依旧十分稳固,霍雨浩以脊椎为核心,胸前和背后的肋骨为支架,整体形成了一个防护罩。但霍雨浩却发现,冰帝也开始不再是将全部的精神力阻挡在外,而是放进去一丝,一小丝,比头发丝都要纤细百倍。让这一丝精神力落在那极致之冰魂力上。 This Spir­i­tual Power falls on above, the Ab­solute Ice Soul Power ve­loc­ity of whirl is af­fected, ab­sorbed Soul Power to want com­pared with be­fore slowly, but as be­fore was firm and is re­volv­ing con­tin­u­ally, that Spir­i­tual Power re­ceived its haul­ing, by un­ceas­ing im­pact. 这一丝精神力落在上面,极致之冰魂力的旋转速度就受到了影响,比之前吸收魂力要慢了一些,但却依旧坚定而持续的旋转着,那一丝精神力受到它的牵引,被不断的冲击。 This is true each other ap­proach­ing, de­vel­ops to the fu­sion from the re­sis­tance. Just, this two's col­li­sion, takes to Huo Yuhao, only then more in­tense pain. 这才是真正的彼此接近,从对抗向融合发展。只不过,这二者的碰撞,带给霍雨浩的,只有更加强烈的痛苦。 Soul Nu­cleus is in­creas­ing, Spir­i­tual Power that Ice Em­peror re­leases is also strength­en­ing, the speed of but strength­en­ing wants to be slower to the speed that Soul Nu­cleus in­creases. But the pain that Huo Yuhao bears even more was also fierce. 魂核在增大,冰帝释放进来的精神力也在增强,但增强的速度相对于魂核增大的速度要缓慢一些。而霍雨浩承受的痛苦也就越发剧烈了。 Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Lit­tle White) is re­leas­ing own strength con­tin­u­ally, is con­sol­i­dat­ing the merid­i­ans and skele­ton of Huo Yuhao. The skele­ton is bet­ter, has Ice Em­peror Torso Bone as the sup­port, af­fects not in a big way. But in the chest, is human body lung and heart site, nu­mer­ous main merid­i­ans. These are re­ceiv­ing two high pulse en­er­gies of re­ver­sal to at­tack con­tin­u­ally, can be imag­ined to the pain that Huo Yuhao brings. 冰熊王小白持续的释放着自己的力量,巩固着霍雨浩的经脉和骨骼。骨骼还好一些,有冰帝躯干骨作为支撑,影响不大。但胸部内,乃是人体肺脏和心脏所在地,还有众多主要经络。这些都在受到逆转的两大能量持续冲击,给霍雨浩带来的痛苦可想而知。 The Snow Em­peror ice crys­tal in ris­ing that slightly rolled Soul Power also to the dis­tance less than three cuns (2.5cm) place to stop, stopped under the chest gallery along po­si­tion. As the mat­ter stands, her input speed to that Soul Nu­cleus is joy­ful. 雪帝冰晶在上升到距离那一小团魂力还有不到三寸的地方停了下来,停在胸廓下沿的位置。这样一来,她对那魂核的输入速度就更是快乐许多。 After the Ab­solute Ice Soul Power vol­ume in­creases to hav­ing the el­lip­ti­cal size, tem­porar­ily stopped in­crease of it­self vol­ume, but ac­tu­ally be­comes in un­ceas­ing re­volv­ing more and more bright. 极致之冰魂力的体积增大到有枣核大小之后,就暂时停止了本身体积的增加,但却在不断的旋转中变得越来越亮。 Now even if ob­serves Huo Yuhao in the out­side, can dis­cover that his torso po­si­tion is the aqua­ma­rine. But the chest place, a small group blue Bai Se (White Color) ray is strength­ened con­tin­u­ally. 现在哪怕是在外界观察霍雨浩,都能发现他的躯干位置全都是碧绿色的。而胸口处,还有一小团蓝白色的光芒持续增强。 The pain is pro­mot­ing, but Huo Yuhao con­trol is very as be­fore steady. Has traded gen­eral Soul Mas­ter, must be hard to with­stand to this de­gree at pre­sent. At least did not have the means to con­trol such well. But he ac­tu­ally as be­fore is main­tain­ing, with­out any tremor. 痛苦在提升,而霍雨浩控制的依旧很稳。换了一般魂师,到眼前这种程度就已经要难以承受。至少没办法控制得这么好了。但他却依旧保持着,没有任何颤动。 While Huo Yuhao closes up. En­tire Shrek City also starts to bus­tle about, in Shrek City, var­i­ous arrange­ment started. The as­sis­tance from Tang Sect is also many. 就在霍雨浩闭关的同时。整个史莱克城也都开始忙碌起来,史莱克城内,各种布置都开始了,其中。来自唐门的辅助也是不少。 „What? Did Yuhao close up? That Shrek three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp? Where?” Xian Lin'er stands in front of Xu San­shi, in eye is re­veal­ing the anx­ious color. “什么？雨浩闭关了？那史莱克三大魂导师团呢？在哪里？”仙琳儿站在徐三石面前,眼中流露着焦急之色。 „This......” Xu San­shi some­what was also dumb­founded. Just re­turned to Acad­emy time, Huo Yuhao has put them, three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp also re­cu­per­a­tion in his un­dead Demi-plane. “这个……”徐三石也有些哑口无言了。刚刚回到学院的时候,霍雨浩只是将他们放了出来,三大魂导师团都还在他的亡灵半位面中休整。 At this time Huo Yuhao closes up, Beibei and Tang Wu­tong are not, in fact, Xu San­shi does not know that what hap­pened. 此时霍雨浩闭关,贝贝和唐舞桐也都不在,实际上,徐三石都不知道发生了什么事情。 Xian Lin'er aura ob­vi­ous some are not uni­form. „Does Yuhao this boy be­come so is not when rea­son­able? This when? Also closes up un­ex­pect­edly? Is this must do?” Xian Lin'er air/Qi is pac­ing back and forth same place. 仙琳儿的气息明显有些不匀了。“雨浩这小子什么时候变得这么不靠谱了？这都什么时候了？竟然还闭关？他这是要干什么？”仙琳儿气的在原地徘徊。 Xu San­shi some­what is also help­less, Beibei and Huo Yuhao are not, Tang Sect only then he has man­aged a house­hold, but he ac­tu­ally must face the Xian Lin'er anger. 徐三石也有些无奈,贝贝和霍雨浩都不在,唐门就只有他来当家了,可他却要面对仙琳儿的怒火。 „Walks. Leads me to look for Yuhao to go, if his clos­ing up de­gree is not deep, first makes him make three Soul En­gi­neer Corp, our good to arrange. Do you know that now out­side Shrek City hun­dred li (0.5km), the Sun-Moon Em­pire main army 600,000, Soul En­gi­neer Corp at least eight, eyes cov­etously there, has any­time to us launches the at­tack the pos­si­bil­ity.” “走。带我去找雨浩去,如果他的闭关程度不深,先让他把三个魂导师团弄出来,我们好进行布置。你知不知道,现在史莱克城外百里,日月帝国主力大军600000,魂导师团至少有八个,在那里虎视眈眈,随时都有向我们发动进攻的可能。” Xu San­shi stayed, he has not known. Lis­tened to a Xian Lin'er such say­ing, thought im­me­di­ately scalp got goose­bumps, „, but, Dean Xian, Yuhao was clos­ing up. If dis­turbs him, what to do caus­ing him to over­state?” 徐三石呆了呆,他还真不知道。听仙琳儿这么一说,也顿时觉得头皮一阵发乍,“可是,仙院长,雨浩在闭关。万一打扰他,导致他走火入魔怎么办？” Xian Lin'er was even more de­pressed, her con­cern to the Huo Yuhao has been ex­tremely nu­mer­ous, is, at this time, the Huo Yuhao choice evaded clos­ing up, and has not re­leased Shrek Acad­emy three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp, can she not be anx­ious? 仙琳儿越发的郁闷了,她对霍雨浩的关爱一直都是极多的,可是,在这种时候,霍雨浩选择逃避似的闭关,而且还没有将史莱克学院三大魂导师团释放出来,她怎能不急？ Huo Yuhao ac­tu­ally also is re­ally not in­ten­tion­ally, he for­got. At that time, he was in the in­ner­most feel­ings cul­mi­na­tion per­son to bat­tle, had been pon­der­ing how must cope at pre­sent the as­pect. After hav­ing found out the law of bro­ken bu­reau, im­me­di­ately starts to take ac­tion, has ac­tu­ally for­got­ten three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp re­gard­ing the Shrek City im­por­tance. 霍雨浩其实还真不是故意的,他忘了。那时候,他正处于内心中天人交战,一直在思考着要如何来应对眼前局面。后来想出了破局之法后,就立刻开始行动起来,却忘了三大魂导师团对于史莱克城的重要性。 „I have not known that he does close up im­por­tantly? But, ar­rived at the Acad­emy crit­i­cal mo­ment now. If Sun-Moon Em­pire at­tacks a city, we do de­fend to be un­der­strength, what to do?” Say­ing that Xian Lin'er ablazes with anger, „this Huo Yuhao, is he up to mis­chief? Beibei and Tang Wu­tong are not , is their three this must go crazy?” “我还不知道他闭关重要？可是,现在已经到了学院生死存亡关头。万一日月帝国攻城,我们防御力量不足,怎么办？”仙琳儿怒气冲冲的说道,“这个霍雨浩,他到底在搞什么鬼？贝贝和唐舞桐也不在,他们三个这是要发疯吗？” „Dean Xian, do not worry. This mat­ter per­haps anx­i­ety can serve no pur­pose at all.” Nearby Jiang Nan­nan opened the mouth. She ar­rives in front of Xian Lin'er, said: „Dean Xian, is in­fe­rior to this, we lead you place that goes to Yuhao to close up to have a look first. Takes your cul­ti­vat­ing as, cer­tainly can feel the con­di­tion that he closes up. If you thought that his con­di­tion can awaken, we first awaken him. If can­not, I be­lieve that you will not in­sist. After all, if Yuhao over­stated, he has no way to re­cite that in­can­ta­tion to com­mu­ni­cate un­dead Demi-plane, when the time comes is the same can­not make three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp come back.” “仙院长,您别着急。这件事恐怕急也没有用。”一旁的江楠楠开口了。她走到仙琳儿面前,道:“仙院长,不如这样,我们先带您去雨浩闭关的地方看看。以您的修为,一定能够感受到他闭关的状态。如果您觉得他的状态能够唤醒,那我们就先叫醒他。如果不能的话,我相信您也不会坚持。毕竟,要是雨浩走火入魔了,他就没法念动那个咒语来沟通亡灵半位面,到时候一样不能让三大魂导师团回来。” Xian Lin'er stamps the feet, „also can only so. Led me to have a look in the past.” 仙琳儿一跺脚,“也只能如此了。带我过去看看。” If changed oth­ers to pre­sent this care­less mis­take, by the Xian Lin'er tem­pera­ment, al­ready flushed. But to Tang Sect, she also some­what has no al­ter­na­tive. 要是换了别人出现这种纰漏,以仙琳儿的脾气,早就冲进去了。但对唐门,她也有些无可奈何。 The Tang Sect these years de­vel­op­ment, have the ex­tremely vital sig­nif­i­cance to Shrek City, with­out Tang Sect Soul Guid­ance De­vice, Shrek Acad­emy in beast tide that in that Star Dou For­est starts is very dif­fi­cult to in­sist. There­fore, sta­tus of Tang Sect in Shrek City con­tin­u­ously in to de­velop ac­cord­ing to the sit­u­a­tion. 唐门这些年的发展,对史莱克城来说有着极其重要的意义,没有唐门魂导器,史莱克学院在那次星斗大森林发动的兽潮之中就很难坚持下来。因此,唐门在史莱克城之中的地位一直都在水涨船高之中。 Let alone, be­fore more than one year, Huo Yuhao re­fined Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill with var­i­ous Heaven and Earth Trea­sure, ac­tu­ally self­less put out part to give Acad­emy, this made Old Xuan be able to break through smoothly, be­came Limit Douluo, she and Yan Shaozhe have also con­sol­i­dated own foun­da­tion, had the fu­ture shock Limit Douluo pos­si­bil­ity. These favours they in heart! 更何况,一年多前,霍雨浩用各种天材地宝炼制出了乾坤造化丹,却无私的拿出一部分给了学院,这才让玄老能够顺利突破,成为极限斗罗,她和言少哲也是巩固了自身基础,拥有了未来冲击极限斗罗的可能。这些人情他们都记在心中啊！ There­fore, even if Huo Yuhao gives her feel­ing now is not rea­son­able, Xian Lin'er also has to sup­press own anger. 所以,哪怕现在霍雨浩给她的感觉是那么不靠谱,仙琳儿也不得不压制自己的怒气。 Under the lead­er­ship of Xu San­shi and Jiang Nan­nan, Xian Lin'er fol­lowed them to ar­rive in Tang Sect un­der­ground Soul Guid­ance Hall. 在徐三石和江楠楠的带领下,仙琳儿跟随他们来到了唐门的地下魂导堂之中。 Huo Yuhao lab­o­ra­tory where, Xu San­shi and Jiang Nan­nan clear. Quick, they ar­rived here. How­ever, not close, was blocked. Blocks their, is He Caitou. 霍雨浩的研究室在什么地方,徐三石和江楠楠都清楚的很。很快,他们就来到了这里。不过,还没接近,就被拦住了。拦住他们的,正是和菜头。 „San­shi and Nan­nan, why is your this goes? Lit­tle Ju­nior Brother closes up in­door that side re­search, no one can ap­proach, ac­ci­den­tally what to do oth­er­wise dis­turbs him?” “三石、楠楠,你们这是干什么去？小师弟在那边研究室内闭关呢,谁都不能靠近,不然万一打扰到他怎么办？” In the Xuan Ziwen sur­face closes up to Huo Yuhao shows nei­ther ap­proval nor dis­ap­proval, may in fact, Huo Yuhao just now start to close up, an­other side, he has in­formed He Caitou. He Caitou puts down in the hand im­me­di­ately all mat­ters, here ar­rives for his pro­tec­tor. 轩梓文表面上对霍雨浩闭关不置可否,可实际上,霍雨浩这边才刚开始闭关,另一边,他就通知了和菜头。和菜头立刻放下手里所有事情,来到这边为他护法。 The Xu San­shi forced smile said: „Caitou, left the im­por­tant mat­ter. Sun-Moon Em­pire army at­tack­ing army has reached the city. Lit­tle Ju­nior Brother for­got that put three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp. Dean Xian then looks. What de­gree does Lit­tle Ju­nior Brother close up to now?” 徐三石苦笑道:“菜头,出大事了。日月帝国大军兵临城下。小师弟忘记将三大魂导师团放出来了。仙院长这才找来。小师弟现在闭关到什么程度了？” He Caitou has gawked, hav­ing a look at an­gry-look­ing Xian Lin'er, the forced smile say­ing: „I do not know that he closes up to any de­gree. How­ever, can­not dis­turb him. You can feel silently, the aura that the Lit­tle Ju­nior Brother that side lends are very fear­ful.” 和菜头愣了一下,看看一脸怒气的仙琳儿,苦笑道:“我也不知道他闭关到什么程度。但是,绝不能打扰他。你们可以默默的感受一下,小师弟那边散发出的气息很可怕。” At the same time was say­ing, he has re­ferred to be­hind the gate of not far away Huo Yuhao lab­o­ra­tory. 一边说着,他指了指身后不远处霍雨浩研究室的门。 Xian Lin'er eyes nar­rows the eyes, Spir­i­tual Power re­leases qui­etly, draws close to the di­rec­tion of Huo Yuhao lab­o­ra­tory. 仙琳儿双眼微眯,精神力悄然释放,朝着霍雨浩研究室的方向贴近。 Xu San­shi and Jiang Nan­nan stand side He Caitou, al­though in the sur­face has not made any­thing, but is sub­con­scious, with He Caitou to­gether, has ac­tu­ally blocked the Xian Lin'er way. If this Dean Xian has a fit of tem­per, plans to over­run to look for Huo Yuhao, they also well stop. 徐三石和江楠楠站到和菜头身边,虽然表面上没做什么,但下意识的,却是与和菜头一起,挡住了仙琳儿的去路。万一这位仙院长发脾气,打算冲过去找霍雨浩,他们也好阻拦。 At this crit­i­cal mo­ment, one­self broth­ers for­ever are most im­por­tant. 在这种关键时刻,自家兄弟永远是最重要的。 How­ever, their these move­ments did with­out charge ob­vi­ously. Felt slightly, Xian Lin'er is the com­plex­ion big change, even retro­ceded sub­con­sciously one step. 不过,他们这些动作显然是白做了。只是略微感受了一下,仙琳儿就已是脸色大变,甚至下意识的后退了一步。 The seal of that lab­o­ra­tory is very good, the sin­cere metal door has al­most iso­lated in­side most aura, but, even if there is lit­tle aura to re­lease, by the Xian Lin'er Tran­scen­dent Douluo strength, can feel in­side change in­dis­tinctly. 那实验室的密封很好,厚重的金属门几乎隔绝了里面绝大多数气息,但是,哪怕只是有一点点气息释放出来,以仙琳儿超级斗罗的实力,也能隐约感受到里面的变化。 Yes, in­side aura is very fear­ful, the fear­ful­ness of dis­or­der! 是的,里面的气息很可怕,紊乱的可怕！ „How can so the dis­or­der? What is Yuhao mak­ing? Did he over­state in­ad­e­quately?” Xian Lin'er loses one's voice to call out in alarm said. “怎么会如此紊乱？雨浩在做什么？难道他已经走火入魔了不成？”仙琳儿失声惊呼道。 Her such say­ing, the He Caitou three peo­ple were also the com­plex­ion change, if Huo Yuhao over­stated, that was the en­tire Tang Sect dis­as­ter. 她这么一说,和菜头三人也同时是脸色一变,要是霍雨浩走火入魔了,那可是整个唐门的灾难。 Xu San­shi anx­ious [say / way]: „Over­stated? Dean Xian, is your judg­ment ac­cu­rate?” 徐三石急切的道:“走火入魔？仙院长,您的判断准确吗？” Xian Lin'er stayed, the brow tight wrin­kle , to con­tinue to feel silently. Is the feel­ing, her com­plex­ion changed is big­ger, a mo­ment later, her look sud­denly changes, „I know that he was doing. This boy is at­tack­ing sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus un­ex­pect­edly. No won­der and no won­der can so aura dis­or­der. His is feel­ing of this im­pact not quite how same as Old Xuan?” 仙琳儿呆了呆,眉头紧皱,继续默默感受。越是感受,她的脸色变化越大,片刻之后,她的神色骤然一变,“我知道他在干什么了。这小子竟然在冲击第二魂核。难怪、难怪会如此气息紊乱。只是,他这冲击的感觉怎么和玄老不太一样？” Has changed oth­ers, per­haps was un­able so to af­firm, but Xian Lin'er is dif­fer­ent, don't for­get, she closed up with Old Xuan to­gether, when felt Old Xuan has at­tacked Limit Douluo aura change per­son­ally. 换了别人,或许还不能如此肯定,但仙琳儿不一样,别忘了,她是跟玄老一起闭关的,亲自感受过玄老冲击极限斗罗时身上的气息变化。 At that time the Old Xuan choice let her and Yan Shaozhe ac­com­pa­nies it­self to close up , be­cause they will be most likely to at­tack that level in the fu­ture. Takes Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill is the best ef­fect. 当时玄老选择让她和言少哲陪伴自己闭关,就是因为他们两个在未来最有可能冲击那个层次。服用乾坤造化丹是最好的效果。 There­fore Xian Lin'er can judge in­dis­tinctly at this time. 所以仙琳儿在这个时候才能隐约判断出来。 ------------------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- Asked the monthly ticket and rec­om­men­da­tion ticket. Today is dou­ble monthly ticket last day, whether every­body in­spects the ticket ware­house, has a look also to have the monthly ticket, if any, ad­ju­ra­tion sup­port, thanks. 求月票、推荐票。今天是双倍月票最后一天,大家可否检查一下票仓,看看还有没有月票,如果有的话,恳请支持,谢谢。

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #559 Mu protects


Huo Yuhao had mind Soul Nu­cleus this mat­ter, in Shrek Acad­emy, only then few sev­eral peo­ple know. The wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test wa­ter­mark ad­ver­tise­ment test re­gard­ing this, Old Xuan nat­u­rally has not con­cealed to Yan Shaozhe and Xian Lin'er. After all, they and Huo Yuhao are the main­stays of fu­ture Acad­emy. 霍雨浩已经拥有精神魂核这件事,在史莱克学院中,也只有极少数的几人知道而已。水印广告测试水印广告测试对此,玄老向言少哲、仙琳儿自然没有隐瞒。毕竟,他们和霍雨浩都是未来学院的中流砥柱。 Speed that re­cently for these years, Huo Yuhao grew was re­ally too quick, to must ap­proach their this gen­er­a­tion of de­grees quickly. 最近这几年,霍雨浩成长的速度实在是太快了,快到已经要接近他们这一代人的程度。 At this time at­tacks sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus? If at­tacks suc­cess­fully, Huo Yuhao very prob­a­bly in his­tory first has the sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus per­son when into Ti­tled Douluo! 此时冲击第二魂核？如果冲击成功,那么,霍雨浩很可能就是有史以来第一位在成为封号斗罗时就拥有第二魂核的人啊！ In this case, he in the fu­ture def­i­nitely be­comes 98 lev­els of Tran­scen­dent Douluo . More­over the time needed will be very short. To Tran­scen­dent Douluo that level, will not have any bot­tle­neck to pre­vent him. Can af­fect him to go for­ward only, has 98 lev­els at­tack 99 lev­els of times, be­cause at that time he will need third Soul Nu­cleus, un­prece­dented third Soul Nu­cleus. 这样的话,他未来是必然会成为98级超级斗罗的,而且所用的时间会很短。到了超级斗罗那个层次,根本不会有什么瓶颈能够阻挡他。唯一能够影响他前进的,就只有98级冲击99级的时候,因为那时候他将需要第三魂核,史无前例的第三魂核。 No one knows that Huo Yuhao can suc­ceed at that time. But Xian Lin'er is very clear, once sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus es­tab­lishes, re­gard­less of Huo Yuhao Soul Power is many lev­els, when the time comes will have the Tran­scen­dent Douluo strength. More­over Ab­solute Mar­tial Soul Tran­scen­dent Douluo. Re­pairs to even be pos­si­ble to ex­ceed her. 谁都不知道霍雨浩那时候会否成功。但仙琳儿却很清楚,一旦第二魂核建立,霍雨浩无论魂力是多少级,到时候都将具备超级斗罗实力。而且还是极致武魂的超级斗罗。修为甚至有可能超越她。 In the heart the anger re­turns to nor­mal grad­u­ally, Huo Yuhao breaks through sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus, this mat­ter re­gard­ing Shrek Acad­emy, has the ex­tra­or­di­nary sig­nif­i­cance sim­i­larly! His pre­sent aura so dis­or­der, what to do if over­states? 心中怒气渐渐平复下来,霍雨浩突破第二魂核,这件事对于史莱克学院来说,同样有着非凡的意义啊！只是,他现在气息如此紊乱,万一是走火入魔怎么办？ Xian Lin'er brow tight wrin­kle, said: „Yuhao is cer­tainly at­tack­ing sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus, but his pre­sent sit­u­a­tion I a lit­tle can­not un­der­stand. You well are de­fend­ing here, do not make any­body ap­proach him, do not dis­turb him. Soul Mas­ter at­tacks sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus time, the sit­u­a­tion will be com­plex, fast chang­ing. I in­vited Old Xuan im­me­di­ately, only then he had enough ex­pe­ri­ence in this as­pect.” 仙琳儿眉头紧皱,道:“雨浩一定是在冲击第二魂核,但他现在的情况我有点看不懂。你们在这里好好守着,不要让任何人接近他,也不要打扰他。魂师冲击第二魂核的时候,情况会非常复杂,瞬息万变。我马上去请玄老,只有他老人家在这方面有足够的经验。” Xian Lin'er is al­ways the vig­or­ous and res­olute style. Said that walks. 仙琳儿一向是雷厉风行的风格。说完就走。 Breaks through sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus? 突破第二魂核？ He Caitou, Xu San­shi and Jiang Nan­nan also look at each other in blank dis­may. They now are also 80 mul­ti­stage Soul Power, but also has the dis­par­ity from the Ti­tled Douluo level. But they when at­tack Ti­tled Douluo, only needs first Soul Ring. 和菜头、徐三石和江楠楠也是面面相觑。他们现在也都是80多级魂力,但距离封号斗罗层次都还有差距。而他们在冲击封号斗罗的时候,就只需要第一魂环罢了。 At pre­sent in Shrek Seven Dev­ils, Beibei and Xu San­shi is away from 90 lev­els of re­cent. Then is He Caitou, Jiang Nan­nan and Xiao Xiao. 目前在史莱克七怪中,贝贝和徐三石距离90级最近。然后才是和菜头、江楠楠、萧萧。 Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill re­ally has the en­ergy of uni­verse good for­tune. They took to be very long, but until now. The Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill ef­fect is con­tin­u­ing the ef­fect as be­fore. The speed that there­fore the Tang Sect peo­ple prac­tice must be faster than gen­eral Soul Mas­ter. 乾坤造化丹确实是有乾坤造化之能。他们已经服用完很久了,但直到现在。乾坤造化丹的功效依旧在持续起效着。所以唐门众人修炼的速度要远比一般魂师更快。 He Caitou sighed, said: „Yuhao widens our dis­par­i­ties is be­com­ing more and more greatly!” 和菜头叹息一声,道:“雨浩拉开我们的差距正在变得越来越大啊！” Xu San­shi also sim­i­larly smiles bit­terly, „now I still re­mem­ber, ini­tially when first time met. When he was tram­pled to fly the ap­pear­ance by my foot. But that time was black­mailed by Beibei that fel­low.” 徐三石也同样苦笑,“现在我还记得,当初第一次见面时。他被我一脚踹飞时的样子呢。只不过那次被贝贝那家伙讹诈了。” Jiang Nan­nan el­e­gant face one red, said: „Did you also feel all right to say? Black­mails you to be light, should punch your.” 江楠楠俏脸一红,道:“你还好意思说？讹诈你是轻的,就应该揍你一顿。” Xu San­shi hey said with a smile: „Do you give up? Ac­tu­ally at that time had you se­cretly also liked me are?” 徐三石嘿嘿笑道:“你舍得吗？其实那时候你也已经暗暗喜欢我了是不是？” „Hello, is con­cerned about face? At that time hated you also with­out enough time, was good.” “喂,要脸吗？那时候恨你还来不及呢,好不好。” Xu San­shi said: „Hop­ing Lit­tle Ju­nior Brother can be suc­cess­ful. If this time he has suc­ceeded, our Tang Sect strength is re­ally dif­fer­ent. Wu­tong is Ti­tled Douluo, if Lit­tle Ju­nior Brother is also. Then. They col­lab­o­rate, bat­tle ef­fi­ciency con­tin­u­ally will be en­hanced. In my opin­ion, per­haps sur­passed or­di­nary Tran­scen­dent Douluo di­rectly. Even at­tacks Limit Douluo that to cul­ti­vate to have pos­si­bly.” 徐三石道:“希望小师弟能够成功吧。这次他要是成功了,那我们唐门的实力就真的不一样了。舞桐已经是封号斗罗,如果小师弟也是。那么。他们联手的时候,战斗力就会持续增强。依我看,恐怕直接就超过普通超级斗罗了。甚至去冲击极限斗罗那等修为都不是没可能的。” Old Xuan comes quickly, after Xian Lin'er walks, is less than ten min­utes. With Old Xuan to­gether hur­riedly caught up. 玄老来得很快,仙琳儿走后不到十分钟。就和玄老一起风风火火的赶来了。 Old Xuan stands in the Huo Yuhao lab­o­ra­tory en­trance, is feel­ing silently. No one has him to be ex­pe­ri­enced, in at­tack­ing the sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus this process, Old Xuan ex­pe­ri­enced too has been de­feated re­peat­edly. There­fore is also fa­mil­iar with this type of aura. 玄老站在霍雨浩的实验室门口,默默的感受着。谁都没有他有经验,在冲击第二魂核这个过程中,玄老经历过太多次的失败了。所以对这种气息也是再熟悉不过。 Stands in the time of there quar­ter, Old Xuan has turned around. On the face the look is dig­ni­fied, „right, Lin'er said right, Yuhao is at­tack­ing sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus. From now on, I for his pro­tec­tor, no one must ap­proach per­son­ally here, no one must dis­turb him. Even can­not make the too big sound in the nearby.” 足足站在那里一刻钟的时间,玄老才转过身来。脸上神色凝重,“没错,琳儿说得对,雨浩正在冲击第二魂核。从现在开始,我亲自在这里为他护法,谁也不许靠近,谁也不许打扰他。甚至不许在附近发出太大的声音。” At the same time was say­ing, Old Xuan sat cross-legged to sit in the Huo Yuhao lab­o­ra­tory en­trance place un­ex­pect­edly. 一边说着,玄老竟然就那么在霍雨浩的实验室门口处盘膝坐了下来。 Xian Lin'er is sur­prised, looks at Old Xuan say­ing: „Old Xuan, that side that Acad­emy what to do? Sun-Moon Em­pire at­tack­ing army has reached the city!” 仙琳儿大吃一惊,看着玄老道:“玄老,那学院那边怎么办？日月帝国兵临城下啊！” Old Xuan sighed one lightly, said: „Lin'er, haven't you looked clearly? Judg­ment Yuhao that dur­ing the meet­ing Wu­tong makes is the ap­proval. Be­cause of the Acad­emy rea­son, he has not said that the Acad­emy safety we looked heav­ily, we can­not be­lieve his judg­ment. He knows that he could not make any­thing, there­fore then came back to close up the prac­tice. As for three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp mat­ters, he has two pos­si­bil­i­ties not to have it to put. One type is he in spite­ful, but I be­lieve that this pos­si­bil­ity is very low. As for an­other type, he for must pre­serve the ef­fec­tive strength.” 玄老轻叹一声,道:“琳儿,你还看不明白吗？开会时舞桐所作出的判断雨浩是认可的。只是因为学院的缘故,他没有说出来,学院的安危我们看得太重了,我们根本不敢相信他的判断。他知道自己做不了什么,所以这才回来闭关修炼。至于三大魂导师团的事情,他只有两种可能才会没有将其放出来。一种是他在赌气,但我相信,这种可能性很小。至于另一种,他就是为了要保存有生力量。” [Say / Way] of Xian Lin'er doubts: „It is not right. If his judg­ment is cor­rect, Sun-Moon Em­pire will not at­tack us. Three big Soul En­gi­neer Corp nat­u­rally will not be dam­aged.” 仙琳儿疑惑的道:“不对吧。如果他的判断是正确的,那么,日月帝国根本就不会来攻击我们。三大魂导师团自然就不会受损了。” Old Xuan shook the head, said: „Your vi­sion is not very long-term. I asked you, if Star Luo and Dou Ling two big em­pires helped, at this time, their one of them was at­tacked. Then, can Acad­emy sit by and do noth­ing? To that time, we have sim­ply had no rea­son not to dis­patch Soul En­gi­neer Corp to exit to as­sist. Has the strength not to dis­patch, with sim­ply does not have Soul En­gi­neer Corp, that is two mat­ters. Yuhao such does, cer­tainly has the mean­ing of deep level.” 玄老摇了摇头,道:“你的目光还不够长远。我问你,如果星罗和斗灵两大帝国来援,在这个时候,他们其中之一受到攻击。那么,学院能够坐视不管么？到了那时候,我们根本没有理由不派遣魂导师团出去相助。有力量不派遣,和根本没有魂导师团,那是两回事。雨浩这么做,一定是有深层次的意思。” How Old Xuan knows that time Huo Yuhao has not thought these many, he real, for­got...... 玄老又怎么知道,那时候的霍雨浩还真没想这么多,他是真的,忘了…… Xian Lin'er low­ered the head, silent after long time, „Old Xuan, but we can­not be neg­li­gent. Even if only then 1/1000 pos­si­bil­i­ties, we must be ready that deals with fully. Acad­emy ten thou­sand years of base in­dus­try!” 仙琳儿低下头,沉默半晌后,“玄老,可我们还是不能大意。哪怕只有1的可能,我们也要做好全力应对的准备。学院万年基业啊！” Old Xuan said: „You go back. In Acad­emy, by you and Chan­cel­lor Shaozhe. I must de­fend here, if Yuhao can break through com­pletes, then, per­haps, all will be eas­ily solved.” 玄老道:“你回去吧。学院里,以你和少哲主事。我要在这里守着,雨浩如果能够突破完成的话,那么,说不定,所有的一切都将迎刃而解。” In the Xian Lin'er eye flashes through one to be star­tled, can the Huo Yuhao break­through be eas­ily solved? This pos­si­bil­ity? How to say again that he is also only a strength of per­son! It is not good by the Old Xuan Limit Douluo strength, he has Dual Soul Nu­cleus, can­not com­pared with Old Xuan. 仙琳儿眼中闪过一丝吃惊,霍雨浩突破就能迎刃而解？这可能吗？再怎么说,他也只是一个人的力量啊！以玄老极限斗罗的实力都不行,他就算有双魂核,也不能和玄老相比吧。 How­ever, she has not said doubts in one­self heart, saw that the Old Xuan will must re­main firmly, she can only quickly go back, told other Sea God Pavil­ion mem­bers here sit­u­a­tion. 不过,她没有说出自己心中的疑惑,眼看玄老意志坚定要留下来,她只能赶快回去,将这边的情况告诉其他海神阁成员。 Xian Lin'er walked, the Xu San­shi three peo­ple were also ex­pelled by Old Xuan. Old Xuan sit out Huo Yuhao, on the old face is re­veal­ing the dis­ap­pointed color. 仙琳儿走了,徐三石三人也被玄老赶走了。玄老自己坐在霍雨浩门外,苍老的面庞上流露着怅然之色。 Yuhao Yuhao, you may re­ally be bold. You chose un­ex­pect­edly took that road! 雨浩啊雨浩,你可真是胆大包天。你竟然选择了走那条路！ By the un­der­stand­ing of Old Xuan sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus, how also un­able to see that Huo Yuhao is not using the method of Equal Res­o­nance to prac­tice! The po­lar­ity, he looks is very clear. 以玄老对第二魂核的了解,又怎会看不出霍雨浩并不是在用同位共振之法修炼啊！正相反,他看的很清楚。 Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment, will cause aura such dis­or­der. How­ever, in the dis­or­der, has a firm strength to sup­port as be­fore. In other words, dan­ger that at least cur­rently speak­ing, Huo Yuhao has not over­stated. 阴阳互补,才会导致气息如此的紊乱。但是,在紊乱之中,却依旧有种坚定的力量在支撑。也就是说,至少目前来看,霍雨浩还没有走火入魔的危险。 Al­though Old Xuan had not prac­ticed the method of Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment to con­dense the Soul Nu­cleus pos­si­bil­ity again. But re­gard­ing this prac­tice way, he has filled the hope and cu­rios­ity, there­fore he de­cides to re­main. More­over, a mo­ment ago he said also right. If Huo Yuhao can prac­tice suc­cess­ful sec­ond Soul Nu­cleus by the method of Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment, then, he in the fu­ture likely is an­other Beast God. 玄老虽然已经再没有修炼阴阳互补之法凝聚魂核的可能了。但对于这种修炼方式,他充满了渴望与好奇,所以他决定留下来。而且,他刚才说的也没错。如果霍雨浩能够凭借阴阳互补之法修炼成功第二魂核,那么,他未来很可能就是另一个兽神。 Comes com­pared with the tal­ent, Huo Yuhao does not have Beast God Di Tian to be so for­mi­da­ble **, but, he has the ex­cel­lent tal­ent that Soul Beast does not have, Twin Mar­tial Souls and Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment Dual Soul Nu­cleus, once suc­ceeds. Old Xuan be­lieves that even if Huo Yuhao is un­able to break through the Limit Douluo level in the fu­ture, but was lim­ited in 98 lev­els, his strength also as be­fore may over­take Beast God. 比起天赋来,霍雨浩没有兽神帝天那样强大的**,但是,他却有着魂兽所不具备的绝佳天赋,双生武魂、阴阳互补双魂核,一旦成功。玄老相信,就算霍雨浩未来无法突破极限斗罗层次,只是被限制在98级,那么,他的实力也依旧有可能追上兽神。 Don't for­get, Huo Yuhao ex­cels at the hide­away, for­mi­da­ble Spir­i­tual Power quan­tity that he has, per­haps re­ally has the change en­tire war pos­si­bil­ity! 别忘了,霍雨浩那么擅长于隐藏,他所拥有的强大精神力量,说不定真的有改变整个战局的可能啊！ Re­ally in­tel­li­gent young peo­ple! In is so chaotic and is under the pas­sive as­pect, can make the most cor­rect choice as be­fore. Worthily is Old Mu final dis­ci­ple. Old Mu, you may know that I envy you very much. 真是聪明的年轻人啊！在如此混乱并且是被动的局面下,依旧能够做出最正确的选择。不愧是穆老的关门弟子。穆老,您可知道,我很羡慕您。 Huo Yuhao does not know re­gard­ing all of out­side that pre­sent he, the body ac­tu­ally neared the brink of col­lapse. 霍雨浩对于外界的一切都不知道,现在的他,身体却已经接近了崩溃的边缘。 The chest place, the speed of Ab­solute Ice en­ergy re­volv­ing is get­ting more and more fast, Ice Em­peror put that Spir­i­tual Power of past not to have the means to pre­vent it, in­stead also turned into re­ver­sion re­volv­ing under its lead. 胸口处,极致之冰能量旋转的速度越来越快,冰帝放过去的那一丝精神力根本没办法阻止它,反而是在它的带动下也变成了逆向旋转。 As the mat­ter stands, Spir­i­tual Power it­self started to twist, mind Soul Nu­cleus was touched, started the angry erup­tion. 这样一来,精神力本身就开始扭曲了,精神魂核被触动,已经开始愤怒的爆发。 Al­though Huo Yuhao in doing ut­most to pre­vent, Spir­i­tual Power that but in mind Soul Nu­cleus bursts out even links his willpower not to have the means to pre­vent com­pletely. 霍雨浩虽然在竭尽全力阻止,但精神魂核中迸发出的精神力甚至连他的意志力都没办法完全阻挡下来。 Ice Em­peror and Snow Em­peror ac­tu­ally main­tain sta­ble, was main­tain­ing for­merly con­di­tion. But Huo Yuhao ac­tu­ally felt that own body as if must be torn into shreds by these two ter­ri­fy­ing strengths. That pain, non­de­scrip­tive. But has when ac­tu­ally sur­passed ini­tially he and Ice Em­peror fused the feel­ing ab­solutely. 冰帝、雪帝却一直保持稳定,保持着先前的状态。而霍雨浩却感觉到自己的身体仿佛要被这两股恐怖的力量撕碎了似的。那种痛苦,难以名状。但却绝对超过了当初他和冰帝融合时的感觉。 Can I un­able to sup­port re­ally? The huge pain, mak­ing the Huo Yuhao willpower first time pre­sent some vac­il­la­tions. 难道,我真的要支撑不住了吗？巨大的痛苦,让霍雨浩的意志力第一次出现了些许动摇。 This time he, if ob­serves from out­side, cer­tainly will make peo­ple feel very ter­ri­fy­ing. The skin sur­face, seeps out the close blood bead un­ceas­ingly, but these blood beads just ap­peared, im­me­di­ately freezes changes into the ice dregs to drop. 此时的他,如果从外面观察,一定会让人感到非常恐怖。皮肤表面,不断渗出细密的血珠,而这些血珠才刚刚出现,就立刻冻结化为冰渣跌落。 In the en­tire lab­o­ra­tory, the aura be­comes ex­tremely chaotic and wild, var­i­ous rare met­als that around the lab­o­ra­tory piles up make noise. 整个实验室内,气息变得极为混乱而狂暴,实验室周围堆积的各种稀有金属都在扎扎作响。 The tem­per­a­ture in lab­o­ra­tory, dropped a hun­dred de­gree cel­sius below zero about. Even starts to have the ice flower to dance in the air in the air. 实验室内的温度,也已经下降到了零下一百度左右。甚至开始有冰花在空气中飞舞。 In­sist­ing! In any event I must in­sist! 坚持住！无论如何我都要坚持住！ Huo Yuhao bites the tip of tongue, by the stab­bing pain on tip of tongue trans­mit­ting, mak­ing own mind pro­mote. Once again sup­pressed the erup­tion of one­self mind Soul Nu­cleus force­fully. 霍雨浩一咬舌尖,凭借舌尖上传来的刺痛,让自己的精神提升了一下。又一次强行抑制住了自己精神魂核的爆发。 -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------- In­sist­ing! Must shoul­der. The plea monthly ticket and rec­om­men­da­tion vote sup­port, the new week, Tang Sect needs every­body's joint ef­fort! 坚持住！一定要扛过去。恳求月票、推荐票支持,新的一周,唐门需要大家的共同努力！

To display comments and comment, click at the button





DD2 - V.#12 - #559 Under Mu protection


His Soul Nu­cleus enough has sta­bi­lized, the in­tense counter-at­tack in this pro­voked sit­u­a­tion, it­self ac­tu­ally had not been vac­il­lated. This is also un­for­tu­nate lucky. 他的魂核已经足够稳定了,在这种被挑衅的情况下也只是强烈反击,本身却没有被动摇。这也是不幸中的万幸。 Mer­maid Princess Li Ya has done ut­most is as­sist­ing Huo Yuhao, her singing sound some­what hoarse, but is ac­tu­ally con­tin­u­ing. Has her extra help, can make Huo Yuhao own mind will all use in the con­trol. 人鱼公主丽雅已经竭尽全力在辅助霍雨浩,她的歌声都有些嘶哑了,但却在持续。正是有她的额外帮助,才能让霍雨浩自己的精神意志全都用在控制上。 Huo Yuhao does not dare to imag­ine, if be­fore one­self and Mer­maid Princess fuses, tries method of prac­tice this Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment to be any sit­u­a­tion. But what he can af­firm, he is im­pos­si­ble to in­sist at pre­sent this step. 霍雨浩不敢想象,如果在自己和人鱼公主融合之前,尝试这阴阳互补之法修炼会是什么情况。但他可以肯定的是,他不可能坚持到眼前这一步。 The in­tense ray glit­ters on him un­ceas­ingly, Ab­solute Ice Soul Power that Ice Em­peror re­leases is ex­tremely ex­u­ber­ant and strong, every time is stiffly pre­vents the Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual Power major part. 强烈的光芒在他身上不断闪烁,冰帝释放出的极致之冰魂力极其旺盛而强硬,每一次都是硬生生的将霍雨浩的精神力绝大部分阻挡住。 This in­ces­santly is the Ab­solute Ice strength, Ice Em­peror Spir­i­tual Source strength, only then holds through the Spir­i­tual Power in ad­di­tion, such smooth that she can re­sist. 这已经不止是极致之冰的力量了,还有冰帝精神本源的力量,只有通过精神力加持,她才能抵御的如此顺利。 Snow Em­peror ice crys­tal sur­round­ing Soul Power out­puts con­tin­u­ally, she ex­cep­tion­ally is sta­ble. At this time, she as if has ne­glected pain that Huo Yuhao might with­stand. Is han­dling own mat­ter in one­self com­pletely. 雪帝冰晶周围的魂力持续输出,她本身却异常稳定。在这个时候,她似乎已经忽略了霍雨浩有可能承受的痛苦似的。完全是在自己做着自己的事情。 The Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Lit­tle White) quick close limit, his strength has also been pro­tect­ing the merid­i­ans, skele­ton and the in­ter­nal or­gans Huo Yuhao. But, that two re­ver­sion rev­o­lu­tions strength, im­pact is re­ally ex­tremely in­tense! 冰熊王小白也快接近极限了,他的力量一直在守护霍雨浩的经脉、骨骼和内脏。可是,那两股逆向运转的力量,冲击的实在是太过强烈啊！ That side Huo Yuhao Spir­i­tual Power can also in­sist, but his body ac­tu­ally started some to un­able to shoul­der. 霍雨浩的精神力那边还能坚持,但他的身体却已经开始有些要扛不住了。 Al­though his body after the im­prove­ment of Gold of Life, is hav­ing the huge vi­tal­ity of far su­per­nor­mal per­son. But in within the body cruel strength is not the human body can shoul­der even­tu­ally. 尽管他的身体经过生灵之金的改善,拥有着远超常人的庞大生命力。但体内暴戾的力量终究不是人类身体所能扛下来的。 Within the body merid­i­ans as if must start to break, the in­ter­nal or­gans must col­lapse in the ex­tru­sion and dis­tor­tion. But Huo Yuhao now be­sides in­sist­ing, any­thing could not do, his cor­ners of the mouth place started to have the blood to over­flow, this was the sign that the tiny blood ves­sel burst. This way, his body di­rectly was likely torn into shreds by the strength in within the body. But own mind Soul Nu­cleus will there­fore also pro­duce the large ex­plo­sion. 体内经脉仿佛要开始断裂了,内脏也在挤压和扭曲中要崩溃。可霍雨浩现在除了坚持下去之外,根本什么都做不了,他的嘴角处已经开始有鲜血溢出,这是细小血管破裂的迹象。继续这样下去,他的身体很可能直接被体内的力量撕碎。而自己的精神魂核也将因此而产生大爆炸。 The Snow Em­peror ice crys­tal has glis­tened qui­etly, while it pre­pares to take an ac­tion time. 雪帝冰晶悄然闪亮了一下,正当它准备有所行动的时候。 Sud­denly, the Huo Yuhao dant­ian place has shone, a golden ray rapid in to rush forth by dant­ian, spreads to the Huo Yuhao whole body rapidly. 突然间,霍雨浩的丹田处亮了一下,紧接着,一层金色光芒迅速由丹田之中奔涌而出,迅速蔓延到霍雨浩全身。 Spir­i­tual Power that in mind Soul Nu­cleus re­leases, is the Ab­solute Ice strength of chest place, can­not pre­vent the emer­gence of this golden strength. 无论是精神魂核中释放出的精神力,还是胸口处的极致之冰力量,都没能阻止这股金色力量的出现。 Be­cause, this golden en­ergy in­te­grates com­pletely in the Huo Yuhao blood­lines. The time that sev­eral times breathe, the merid­i­ans of Huo Yuhao within the body com­pletely turned into the golden color, the blood is so. The in­ter­nal or­gans are also so. 因为,这金色的能量完全是融入在霍雨浩血脉之中的。只是几次呼吸的时间,霍雨浩体内的经脉就已经完全变成了金色,就连血液都是如此。内脏也是如此。 Look­ing from out­side, Huo Yuhao bud­dhist image is dig­ni­fied at this time, whole body golden light blooms. More­over, in his body sur­face, starts to pre­sent a close scale, the scale is the golden color, pure golden color. The close scale in­creases grad­u­ally, cov­ers the whole body. Only the face is also main­tain­ing human ap­pear­ance. 从外面看,霍雨浩此时宝相庄严,全身金光绽放。而且,在他身体表面,开始出现一层细密的鳞片,鳞片是金色的,纯正的金色。细密的鳞片渐渐变大,覆盖全身。只有面部还保持着人类模样。 This scale, is dragon scales! Right, dragon scales, Light Sa­cred Dragon dragon scales! 这鳞片,是龙鳞！没错,龙鳞,光明圣龙的龙鳞！ Within the body fierce pain one re­laxed. Huo Yuhao are also very sur­prised, ac­tu­ally this golden color came from where. This golden in­jec­tion, lets his merid­i­ans, skele­ton and in­ter­nal or­gans, be­comes even more for­mi­da­ble. More­over, these golden color are still car­ry­ing on the most di­rect fu­sion with his body, be­comes his true part. 体内剧烈的痛苦一下就缓和了。霍雨浩自己也很惊讶,这金色究竟从何而来。这金色的注入,让他的经脉、骨骼、内脏,都变得越发强大。而且,这些金色还在与他的身体进行最直接的融合,成为他真正的一部分。 This strength is...... 这股力量是…… This pure Light aura, that fa­mil­iar. It is not Wang Qiu'er that gold Dragon Power, does not come from Three Eyed Golden Lion. But is...... 这纯正的光明气息,是那么的熟悉。并不是王秋儿那种黄金龙的力量,也不是来自于三眼金猊。而是…… Light Sa­cred Dragon, yes! This clearly is Light Saint Dragon Power. 光明圣龙,是啊！这分明就是光明圣龙的力量。 More­over, this is also not Light Sa­cred Dragon Mar­tial Soul that First Se­nior Brother can trans­form, purely and vig­or­ous than the First Se­nior Brother strength. Is this, this is the Teacher strength? But, is this pos­si­ble? 而且,这还不是大师兄能够转化的光明圣龙武魂,要比大师兄的力量更加纯粹而浑厚。难道,这是、这是老师的力量？可是,这怎么可能？ Shrek Acad­emy, Sea God Is­land , Sea God Pavil­ion, Golden Tree! 史莱克学院,海神岛,海神阁,黄金树！ Gen­tle golden ray, on the Golden Tree tree trunk slight is bloom­ing, that gen­tle fluc­tu­a­tion of en­ergy made every­one on en­tire Sea God Is­land be able to feel clearly. 柔和的金色光芒,在黄金树树身上轻微的绽放着,那柔和的能量波动令整个海神岛上的每一个人都能清楚的感受到。 Nu­mer­ous po­si­tion An­cient Elder go out of Sea God Pavil­ion in abun­dance, ar­rives in front of Golden Tree, these also in­cluded just hur­ried back soon Xian Lin'er. 众位宿老纷纷走出海神阁,来到黄金树面前,这其中也包括刚刚赶回来不久的仙琳儿。 One group of golden light, raise from the Golden Tree tree trunk sud­denly, float above Sea God Pavil­ion. 一团金光,骤然从黄金树树身上升起,悬浮在海神阁上方。 „That is......” the Old Song vi­sion con­cen­trates, al­though she can­not see in golden light is any­thing, but, can ac­tu­ally feel in golden light that fa­mil­iar aura. “那是……”宋老目光一凝,她虽然看不到金光之中是什么,但是,却能够感受到金光中那熟悉的气息。 golden light in air­borne has stopped slightly, seems is greet­ing to An­cient Elder, that golden light changed into to­gether the flow­ing light, flies to­ward Shrek City and in the Tang Sect di­rec­tion. 金光在空中略微停顿了一下,似乎是在向诸位宿老打招呼,紧接着,那金光已经化为一道流光,朝着史莱克城、朝着唐门的方向飞去。 Old Xuan sit­ting silently is pro­tect­ing out the Huo Yuhao lab­o­ra­tory, when Huo Yuhao within the body that golden color strength bursts out. Old Xuan sat out­side also im­me­di­ately feels. 玄老默默的坐在霍雨浩实验室门外守护着,当霍雨浩体内那金色力量迸发的时候。玄老坐在外面也立刻感受到了。 This is...... 这是…… Good strength Light strength. But, when did Yuhao have the strength of such strong Light? 好强的光明力量。可是,雨浩什么时候拥有这么强的光明之力了？ Huo Yuhao will cer­tainly not give his an­swer, in the Old Xuan eye is re­veal­ing the sur­prised un­cer­tain color. 霍雨浩当然不会给出他答案,玄老眼中流露着惊疑不定之色。 In this time, sud­denly, an aus­pi­cious aura is head­ing on. The golden light twin­kle, light shadow emerges out of thin air to­gether in front of Old Xuan. 正在这时,突然间,一股祥和气息扑面而来。金光闪烁,一道光影凭空出现在玄老面前。 „Old Mu?” Old Xuan is al­most the in­stan­ta­neous body, sur­prised looks at front light shadow. “穆老？”玄老几乎是瞬间弹身而起,吃惊的看着面前光影。 Old Mu shows a faint smile to Old Xuan, nod­ded to him, then floats to him in front, has pat­ted his shoul­der gen­tly. A thought also spreads to the Old Xuan mind. 穆老向玄老微微一笑,向他点了点头,然后漂浮到他面前,轻轻的拍了拍他的肩膀。一个意念也随之传入玄老脑海之中。 „After Shrek, de­pended on you. Xuan Zi, takes care.” “史莱克以后就靠你了。玄子,多保重。” Has not waited for Old Xuan to say any­thing, Old Mu the golden form has passed through from him, sub­merged in his be­hind metal front door. 没等玄老说什么,穆老所化的金色身影就已经从他身上穿过,没入了他身后的金属大门之中。 The body of Old Xuan shiv­ered fiercely, one un­lucky pre­mo­ni­tion also ap­pears. Could not bear lose one's voice to call out: „Old Mu!” 玄老的身体剧烈的颤抖了一下,紧接着,一种不祥的预感也随之出现。忍不住失声叫道:“穆老！” He has turned around sud­denly, looks one be­hind the gi­gan­tic iron gate, sud­denly, the mood some­what are un­able to re­strain one­self. 他猛然转过身,看着自己身后硕大的铁门,一时间,情绪有些不能自已。 Old Mu golden light shadow qui­etly ap­pears in the lab­o­ra­tory, ap­pears in front of Huo Yuhao. 穆老所化的金色光影悄然出现在实验室内,出现在霍雨浩面前。 Looks that sits cross-legged to sit Huo Yuhao that in­sists there with hard­ship, on his face re­veals a ge­nial color. 看着盘膝坐在那里苦苦坚持的霍雨浩,他脸上流露出一丝和煦之色。 „Child, you have cho­sen the most dif­fi­cult path. How­ever, for Shrek, for we be­long to the Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries. What you do is right. Hu­man­ity wants to com­plete method of prac­tice Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment, is al­most im­pos­si­ble, makes Teacher help you, steps onto one.” “孩子,你选择了一条最为艰难的道路。但是,为了史莱克,为了我们原属斗罗大陆三国。你做的是对的。人类想要完成阴阳互补之法修炼,几乎不可能,就让老师帮你,走上一段。” golden light dodges, Old Mu changed into golden bright sphere, broke in the fore­head of Huo Yuhao di­rectly. 金光一闪,穆老已经重新化为一个金色光球,直接冲入了霍雨浩的头部。 Gen­tle and warm, spreads over the Huo Yuhao whole body in­stan­ta­neously. Just in­com­pa­ra­bly fierce pain, but at this mo­ment, ac­tu­ally such as met the timely rain. 柔和与温暖,瞬间传遍霍雨浩全身。刚刚还是无比剧烈的痛苦,而这一刻,却如逢甘霖。 Huo Yuhao big re­lax­ing, on mind re­laxes in­stan­ta­neously makes him nearly faint. But that warm ge­nial strength the gable lives in his Spir­i­tual Power im­me­di­ately, mak­ing him be able to main­tain the pre­sent con­di­tion. Spir­i­tual Power re­turned to nor­mal im­me­di­ately. 霍雨浩大大的松了口气,精神上的瞬间放松令他险些昏过去。但那温暖和煦的力量立刻包覆住他的精神力,让他能够维持住自己现在的状态。精神力立刻就平复了许多。 „Teacher, is re­ally you!” “老师,真的是您！” When Huo Yuhao sees Old Mu in own spir­i­tual sea, mood im­me­di­ately fierce surges. The Spir­i­tual Power con­den­sa­tion form­ing, changes into his form, to the end does obei­sance. 当霍雨浩在自己的精神之海中看到穆老时,情绪顿时剧烈的激荡起来。精神力凝聚成形,化为他自己的身影,倒头就拜。 Old Mu smile looks at own final dis­ci­ple, shows a faint smile, what­ever he has done obei­sance. Be­fore the per­sonal ap­pear­ance flut­ters, ar­rives in front of Huo Yuhao, gen­tly is touch­ing his head, „child, gets up.” 穆老微笑的看着自己的关门弟子,微微一笑,任由他拜了下去。身形前飘,来到霍雨浩面前,轻轻的抚摸着他的头,“孩子,起来吧。” Huo Yuhao stands up, looks at Old Mu, the mind body is un­able to sob, but on him ac­tu­ally spreads the im­mea­sur­able joy the mood. 霍雨浩站起身,看着穆老,精神体无法哭泣,但他身上却传出无比喜悦的情绪。 The peo­ple when are most painful, sud­denly saw the most in­ti­mate per­son, that feel­ing, does not have the means to de­scribe. Some Teacher in the side, that is a pro­tected feel­ing! 人在最痛苦的时候,突然见到了自己最亲近的人,那种感觉,是没办法形容的。有老师在身边,那是一种被守护的感觉啊！ „Teacher......” the Huo Yuhao sound sobbed. “老师……”霍雨浩的声音哽咽了。 Old Mu said with a smile: „Do not make this lit­tle chil­dren con­di­tion. Yuhao, you have grown up. You do is very good. Com­pared with being bet­ter that also in the Teacher imag­i­na­tion makes. Teacher, takes you as the honor.” 穆老微笑道:“别做这种小儿女态。雨浩,你已经长大了。你做的很好。比老师想象中做的还要好。老师,以你为荣。” „These years, al­though Teacher not side you, mat­ter that but, has on you, my ma­jor­ity heard from Xuan Zi there, saw per­son­ally. You do is very good.” “这些年来,虽然老师不在你身边,但是,在你身上发生的事情,我大多数都从玄子那里听说了,也亲自看到了一些。你做的真的很好。” „Teacher.” Huo Yuhao sum­moned again. “老师。”霍雨浩再次呼唤。 Old Mu said: „This time, you choose the method of prac­tice Yin-Yang Sup­ple­ment, al­though was rash. How­ever, in some sense, ac­tu­ally not wrong. Shrek needs one to be able by the pow­er­house who strength of the changes the course of events. Such pow­er­house, had not ap­peared for a long time. Ten thou­sand years ago, an­ces­tor Tang San, changes the course of events by strength of the, the dou­ble god fights the dou­ble god, has es­tab­lished the Shrek ten thou­sand years of base in­dus­try. But ten thou­sand years later, I be­lieve that you have such po­ten­tial.” 穆老道:“这次,你选择阴阳互补之法修炼,虽然莽撞了。但是,从某种意义上来说,却并没有错。史莱克需要一个能够以一己之力扭转乾坤的强者。这样的强者,已经许久没有出现了。万年前,先祖唐三,凭借一己之力扭转乾坤,双神战双神,奠定了史莱克万年基业。而万年之后,我相信,你也拥有这样的潜能。” „If were not you have in­spired within the body Dragon Pill strength, I have not known that you can achieve this step. Since you have done, Teacher helps you walk a reg­u­la­tion again.” “如果不是你引动了体内龙丹的力量,我还不知道你能做到这一步。既然你已经做了,那么,老师就帮你再走一程。” „Dragon Pill?” Huo Yuhao sur­prised looks at Old Mu. “龙丹？”霍雨浩惊讶的看着穆老。 Old Mu nod­ded, said: „Should be Xi­aoyao helps you take. You should see him one time to be right be­fore.” 穆老点了点头,道:“应该是逍遥帮你服用的吧。你应该在之前见过他一次才对。” „What you said is Dragon Em­peror Douluo Long Xi­aoyao?” Huo Yuhao sur­prised looks at Old Mu. “您说的是龙皇斗罗龙逍遥？”霍雨浩一脸惊讶的看着穆老。 Old Mu said: „Yes! Is I asks him, at proper time, gives you Dragon Pill.” 穆老道:“是啊！是我拜托他,在合适的时候,将龙丹给你的。” Huo Yuhao said: „But, isn't he Holy Spirit Cult per­son? Is that side Evil Soul Mas­ter. How to help us?” 霍雨浩道:“可是,他不是圣灵教的人么？是邪魂师那边的。怎么会帮我们？” Old Mu shakes the head say­ing: „Xi­aoyao is not Evil Soul Mas­ter, he is also a poor man. Was stranded by the sen­ti­ment. I have to the past from clashes, but his con­tin­u­ously ac­tu­ally set­tle­ment in. Some wrong things that be­cause he ini­tially did, chose have for­given. There­fore can so. How­ever, he after is we be­longs to Soul Mas­ter of Douluo Con­ti­nent three coun­tries'. Be­fore I ini­tially ** suf­fers a de­feat and flees, had seen one side him, gives him Dragon Pill. Then makes him take to you at proper time. Also makes him in hav­ing the pos­si­bil­ity sit­u­a­tion, pro­tects your safety.” 穆老摇头道:“逍遥并不是邪魂师,他也是个可怜人。被情所困。我当年不得不从其中冲出来,可他一直却沉陷其中。并且因为他当初做的一些错事,选择了自我恕罪。所以才会如此。但是,他毕竟是我们原属斗罗大陆三国的魂师。在我当初**败亡之前,曾经见过他一面,将龙丹交给他。然后让他在合适的时候给你服用。同时也让他在有可能的情况下,保护你的安危。” „Pro­tects me?” Huo Yuhao also deep re­mem­ber­ing, ini­tially pain in that nine blade ten Badong! “保护我？”霍雨浩还深深的记得,当初那九刀十八洞的痛苦啊！ The Old Mu smile nods the head, said: „If he wants to kill you, you al­ready died. If not he pro­tects in se­cret. Per­haps Holy Spirit Cult copes with you are not the pre­sent this. In the fu­ture you will un­der­stand. As for Dragon Pill......” 穆老微笑颔首,道:“如果他想要杀你,你早就已经死了。如果不是他暗中保护。恐怕圣灵教对付你也不会是现在这样。未来你会明白的。至于龙丹……” ---------------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------------------- Asked the monthly ticket and rec­om­men­da­tion ticket. 求月票、推荐票。 The quick­est re­newal, non- ball win­dow read­ing in­vited. 最快更新,无弹窗阅读请。

To display comments and comment, click at the button
